[First urinary tract infection in healthy infants: epidemiology, diagnosis and treatment].Urinary tract infection (UTI) is one of the most common infections in infants. It presents certain peculiarities compared with other pediatric age groups in terms of symptomatology, diagnosis and the therapeutic approach employed to prevent sequels.To analyze the epidemiology, clinical and laboratory findings, etiology, diagnosis and treatment of first-time UTI in healthy infants.Between January and December 1999, we performed a retrospective study of 131 previously healthy infants admitted to our hospital with a diagnosis of first-time UTI. Demographic data, clinical characteristics, urine dipstick, urinalysis and urine culture (vesical catheterization), blood cell count and PCR, kidney ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrogram and DMSA scintigraphy were reviewed.We studied 131 patients (median age: 90 days). In infants younger than 30 days, UTI was more prevalent in males. The most frequent symptom was fever (73.3 %). Seventy-one patients fulfilled the criteria for acute pyelonephritis. The presence of nitrituria was low. Escherichia coli was isolated in 90.1 % of the patients. Voiding cystourethrogram detected vesicoureteric reflux in 18.4 % of the patients. Scintigraphy revealed renal scarring in 15.1 %. No significant correlations were found between renal scarring in late scintigraphy and a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and/or alterations in the cystourethrogram.Fever was the main symptom. E. coli was the most commonly isolated microorganism. Nitrituria had low sensitivity in infants. Ultrasonography had low specificity. Scintigraphy showed the highest sensitivity and specificity in the detection of renal scarring. Predictability improved when scintigraphy was performed a few months after acute infection.Association of P and other fimbriae with clinical pyelonephritis in children.196 episodes of urinary tract infection in children were analysed. 74 were classified as pyelonephritic (PN), 61 as cystitis (C), and 61 as asymptomatic bacteriuria (ABU) on the basis of three clinical signs (elevated temperature, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and/or white blood cell count). The frequency of P-fimbriae was found high in PN (77%), and significantly lower in C (23%), ABU (20%) and among fecal strains (16%). The common, type 1 fimbriae were also more frequent in PN (92%) than in the other groups (84-76%), whereas other, so-called X-fimbriae, were relatively rare in all the patient groups (15-6%). P-fimbriation was not significantly associated with the presence or absence of reflux or obstructive anomalies. By contrast, the frequency of P-fimbriation increased with increasing severity of the clinical symptoms of pyelonephritis (95% in episodes of elevated temperature, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and white blood cell count).[Laboratory parameters as a guide for the radiologic study of infections of the urinary tract in childhood].Forty-nine children with urinary tract infection aged between 15 days and 10 years were studied. Thirty-three of them (67.3%) had urinary tract malformations. We valued the following parameters: a) White Blood Cells; b) Leukocyte differential; c) ESR at the first hour; d) CRP; e) Concentration ability; f) Body temperature. We wanted to investigate the usefulness of these parameters to predict which patients should be studied by X-ray of urinary tract. Single parameters did not prove very sensitive; the highest correlations were found with ESR and CRP, which were positive in 76% of the cases of malformations. Furthermore we valued the sensitivity and specificity of the tests grouped together: the highest values of sensitivity (97%) and specificity (31%) were obtained coupling the ESR and concentration ability.Procalcitonin as a marker of acute pyelonephritis in infants and children.In the absence of specific symptomatology in children, the early diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis is a challenge, particularly during infancy. In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin (PCT) levels and compared these with other commonly used inflammatory markers. We evaluated the ability of serum PCT levels to predict renal involvement, as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. Serum C-reactive protein (CRP), leukocyte counts, and PCT levels were measured in 64 children admitted for suspected UTI. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m)Tc-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 7 days after admission. In acute pyelonephritis, the median PCT level was significantly higher than in the lower UTI group (3.41, range 0.36-12.4 microg/l vs. 0.13, range 0.02-2.15 microg/l, P<0.0001). In these two groups, respectively, median CRP levels were 120 (range 62-249 mg/l) and 74.5 (range 14.5-235 mg/l, P=0.012) and leukocyte counts were 15,910/mm(3) (range 10,200-26,900) and 14,600/mm(3) (range 8,190-26,470, P=0.34). For the prediction of acute pyelonephritis, the sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 94.1% and 89.7%, respectively; CRP had a sensitivity of 100%, but a specificity of 18.5%. We conclude that serum PCT may be an accurate marker for early diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.Imaging strategy for infants with urinary tract infection: a new algorithm.We analyzed clinical data for prediction of permanent renal damage in infants with first time urinary tract infection.This population based, prospective, 3-year study included 161 male and 129 female consecutive infants with first time urinary tract infection. Ultrasonography and dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy were performed as acute investigations and voiding cystourethrography within 2 months. Late scintigraphy was performed after 1 year in infants with abnormality on the first dimercapto-succinic acid scan or recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. End point was renal damage on the late scan.A total of 270 patients had end point data available, of whom 70 had renal damage and 200 did not. Final kidney status was associated with C-reactive protein, serum creatinine, temperature, leukocyturia, non-Escherichia coli bacteria, anteroposterior diameter on ultrasound and recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. In stepwise multiple regression analysis C-reactive protein, creatinine, leukocyturia, anteroposterior diameter and non-E.coli bacteria were independent predictors of permanent renal damage. C-reactive protein 70 mg/l or greater combined with anteroposterior diameter 10 mm or greater had sensitivity of 87% and specificity of 59% for renal damage. An algorithm for imaging of infants with first time urinary tract infection based on these results would have eliminated 126 acute dimercapto-succinic acid scans compared to our study protocol, while missing 9 patients with permanent renal damage.C-reactive protein can be used as a predictor of permanent renal damage in infants with urinary tract infection and together with anteroposterior diameter serves as a basis for an imaging algorithm.Diagnostic role of initial renal cortical scintigraphy in children with the first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Assessment of the first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) in children has been the subject of debate for many years. Diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) is usually based on clinical and biological data. The clinical usefulness of early Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy remains controversial, although it may influence the type and duration of treatment. The aim of this study was to assess the role of initial cortical scintigraphy in the detection of early renal parenchymal damage in children highly suspected of having APN and to compare the scintigraphic findings with selected clinical/laboratory parameters and ultrasonography.A prospective study was conducted in 34 infants and young children (18 boys, 16 girls), aged 1.5-36 months (mean 9.8 ± 8.7 months), hospitalized with a first episode of clinically suspected APN. Within the first 5 days after admission, Tc-99m DMSA renal scintigraphy, ultrasonography (US), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), white blood cell count (WBC) and urine analyses were performed.DMSA scintigraphy showed changes consistent with APN in 27/34 (79%) patients, with a mean age of 10.9 months, including 12 males (44%) and 15 (56%) females. Out of 9 febrile children with negative urine culture and supportive evidence of UTI, scintigraphy showed parenchymal involvement in 8 children (24% in the whole group, 30% in scintigraphically documented APN). There were no statistically significant correlations between the frequency or size of the initial scintigraphic abnormalities and age, sex, body temperature, CRP levels or ESR. A CRP level of >54 mg/L and a WBC of >13,300/mm³ had sensitivities of 56 and 59% and specificities of 86 and 71%, respectively. US showed changes consistent with APN in 7/34 (21%) in the whole group and in 7/27 (26%) patients with positive cortical scan (p < 0.05).Initial DMSA renal scintigraphy is a sensitive method for the early diagnosis of APN in young children and is useful in the assessment of the severity of kidney injury even in patients with negative urine culture. Clinical, biological and ultrasound parameters do not identify children with renal damage. Normal DMSA study, excluding parenchymal involvement and late sequelae, could minimize the use of scintigraphy in the follow-up and reduce the redundancy of cystography.Bacterial attachment and inflammation in the urinary tract.The mechanism whereby attachment enhances Escherichia coli virulence in the urinary tract was studied by a detailed analysis of the host response to bacteriuria. Episodes of bacteriuria in 1473 children were followed prospectively from 1970 to 1984. To study the inflammatory response to the bacteriuric epidoses, we recorded body temperature, C-reactive protein, microsedimentation rate, urinary leukocyte count, and renal concentrating capacity. Bacterial isolates from each episode were identified and saved, and the adhesive capacity of 2669 E. coli strains was defined by their binding to galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-containing receptors. Inflammatory response was significantly higher and renal concentrating capacity significantly lower during episodes caused by attaching strains. There was a linear relation between the number of indicators of inflammation and the proportion of galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-binding strains present. Vesicoureteric reflux potentiated the inflammatory response. Attaching strains of E. coli thus appeared to be more capable of causing inflammation than were other bacteria. The potentiating effect of attachment on inflammation explains the over-representation of galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-recognizing bacteria in patients with acute pyelonephritis.Urinary tract infection in febrile infants younger than eight weeks of Age.To assess the usefulness of laboratory parameters, including peripheral white blood cell (WBC) count, C-reactive protein (CRP) concentration, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and microscopic urinalysis (UA), for identifying febrile infants younger than 8 weeks of age at risk for urinary tract infection (UTI), and comparison of standard UA and hemocytometer WBC counts for predicting the presence of UTI.A total of 162 febrile children <8 weeks of age were enrolled in this prospective study. All underwent clinical evaluation and laboratory investigation, including WBC count and differential; ESR; CRP; blood culture; a lumbar puncture for cell count and differential, glucose level, protein level, Gram stain, and culture; and a UA and urine culture. All urine specimens were obtained by suprapubic aspiration and microscopically analyzed with standard UA as well as with hemocytometer WBC counts. Quantitative urine cultures were performed. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were determined for each of the screening tests.There were 22 positive urine culture results of at least 100 colony-forming unit/mL. Eighteen of these 22 patients were males, and all were uncircumcised. There were significant differences for pyuria >/=5 WBCs/hpf, pyuria >/=10 WBC/microL, CRP >20 mg/L, and ESR >30 mm/hour between culture-positive and culture-negative groups (P <.05). The ROC area for hemocytometer WBC count, standard UA, peripheral WBC count, ESR, and CRP concentration were.909 +/-.045,.791 +/-.065,.544 +/-.074,. 787 +/-.060, and.822 +/-.036, respectively. The ROC curve analysis indicates that the CRP, ESR, and standard UA were powerful but imperfect tools with which to discriminate for UTI in potentially infected neonates. Hemocytometer WBC counts had the highest sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and likelihood ratios for identifying very young infants with positive urine culture results. For all assessments, hemocytometer WBC counts were significantly different, compared with the standard urinalysis. ESR, CRP, and peripheral WBC counts were not helpful in identifying UTI in febrile infants.UTI had a prevalence of 13.6% in febrile infants <8 weeks of age. The CRP, ESR, and standard UA were imperfect tools in discriminating for UTI, and the sensitivity of these laboratory parameters was relatively low. Hemocytometer WBC count was a significantly better predictor of UTI in febrile infants.Evaluation of DMSA scintigraphy and urography in assessing both acute and permanent renal damage in children.To evaluate dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy and urography in the detection of renal involvement in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) in order to identify patients with a high risk of developing renal damage.A total of 157 children (median age 0.4 years, range 5 days to 5.8 years) with first-time symptomatic UTI were examined scintigraphy (with an assessment of renal area involvement) and urography at the time of UTI and 1 year later. All evaluations were made blindly.Of the total 314 kidneys, 80 (25%) were abnormal at initial scintigraphy. Of these 80 kidneys, 44 (55%) had normalized at follow-up. Of the 234 initially normal kidneys, 29 (12%) were abnormal at follow-up. One year after UTI, abnormalities were seen in 59 children at scintigraphy and in 18 children at urography. Renal area involvement was larger and split function abnormalities more common in kidneys that were abnormal at both scintigraphy and urography than in kidneys with only scintigraphic abnormalities.Quantitation of renal area involvement and split renal function at early scintigraphy would seem to be useful in identifying patients at risk of developing renal damage. Urography at 1 year after infection identified mainly those with the most severe scintigraphic abnormalities. The clinical importance of scintigraphic abnormalities that are not confirmed by urography is not known.Functional parameters and 99mtechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in acute pyelonephritis.The diagnostic value of 99mtechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy, ultrasonography and renal functional parameters [urine N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase (NAG)/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients] in acute pyelonephritis (APN) were studied in 39 children (28 girls, 11 boys, median age 9 months, range 2 weeks to 9.4 years, 28 patients < 1 year, 11 patients > 1 year) with first-time urinary tract infection. Ultrasonography of the urinary tract was performed on admission and together with DMSA scintigraphy (< 10 days from admission). Urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were measured daily and after 6-8 weeks. Ultrasonography revealed abnormalities in 12 of 39 (31%) patients [11/32 patients (34%) with positive DMSA scintigraphy], while DMSA uptake defects were present in 32 of 39 (82%) patients [21/28 < 1 year (75%), 11/11 > 1 year (100%), P = 0.08]. Urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were significantly higher in children < 1 year with APN, as well as in non-renal fever controls, than in older children. However, in both age groups the urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were significantly higher in APN than in non-renal fever. The urine NAG and albumin excretion decreased rapidly after the initiation of antimicrobial therapy and had normalized at 6-8 weeks. The size and grade of the DMSA uptake defect (DMSA score) did not correlate with duration of disease at admission, maximum C-reactive protein or maximum fever. The urine NAG/creatinine quotient in the children < 1 year showed, however, a significant correlation with the DMSA score (r = 0.58, P < 0.05), while no correlation was found in the older children. We conclude that DMSA scintigraphy is a sensitive method to confirm the clinical diagnosis of APN, although a substantial number of infants appear to have normal scans. Early determination of the urine NAG/creatinine and albumin/ creatinine quotients may further improve the diagnostics in the infant.Five-year study of medical or surgical treatment in children with severe vesico-ureteral reflux dimercaptosuccinic acid findings. International Reflux Study Group in Europe.The results of serial dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) imaging over 5 years are reported in 287 children with severe vesico-ureteral reflux entered into the European Branch of the International Reflux Study in Children. The children were randomly allocated to medical (n=147) or surgical (n=140) management and DMSA studies were performed during the follow up period at least 6 months after any urinary tract infection. Abnormal images were classified into four types: (1) large polar hypodensity with normal renal outline; (2) peripheral photon deficient defect(s) in a non-deformed kidney; (3) small renal image with normal contour; and (4) peripheral defect(s) with resultant irregularity of the renal outline. The DMSA findings were abnormal at entry in 235 (82%) with no difference in incidence or severity between the two treatment groups. During follow up, deterioration was observed in 25 medically and 23 surgically treated patients and comprised image deterioration alone in 17, image deterioration with corresponding reduction in differential function in 16 and reduction in relative function without image change in 15, with similar distribution between the two treatment groups. Deterioration was more frequent in children entering the study under the age of 2 years and in those with grade IV rather than grade III reflux. These findings, showing no difference in outcome between children managed surgically or medically, are consistent with the radiological results already published.In the International Reflux Study the DMSA scintigraphic data showed no difference in outcome between children managed surgically or medically.Procalcitonin and pyelonephritis in children.In the past few years, procalcitonin has been proposed as a sensitive and specific inflammatory marker in various fields of medicine, especially in infectivology, where it has been used to discriminate between bacterial infections, viral infections and inflammation processes. Recently, different studies have emerged in the literature on the use of this marker to identify renal involvement in febrile urinary tract infections.Procalcitonin seems to be a valid biological marker, with an acceptable sensitivity and specificity, which predicts a renal involvement of the infection (pyelonephritis), in comparison with the low specificity of C-reactive protein. Procalcitonin also seems to be correlated with the degree of the involvement at the moment of diagnosis of febrile urinary tract infections and with scarring.Renal involvement has always been the main diagnostic objective in children with febrile urinary tract infections. If more studies confirm the correlation between procalcitonin, renal involvement during urinary infections and scar formation, we will finally have a noninvasive tool that can identify children at risk of complications and in need of a close follow-up as early as their first episode of febrile urinary tract infection.99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children: relation to clinical and radiological findings.Seventy-two children, 59 girls and 13 boys, 0.1-15.9 (median 1.1) years of age, with acute pyelonephritis (APN) were investigated with the aid of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasonography (US) and a desmopressin test within 5 days of admission. Sixty-two children were reinvestigated approximately 2 months later when intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cysto-urethrography were also performed. During infection, 92% of the children showed changes in the DMSA scan with 69% by US, and the two investigations agreed in 58% of the kidneys. At follow-up, 68% showed changes in the DMSA scan, 47% by US and 48% by IVU. The DMSA scan and IVU agreed in 60% of the kidneys. Twenty-nine percent of the children had vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). The presence of grade greater than or equal to 3 VUR was associated with greater defects on the DMSA scan during infection, and at follow-up with a higher frequency of persistent changes compared with no VUR (P less than 0.02 and 0.01, respectively). During infection the size of the defect on the DMSA scan correlated with renal volume and C-reactive protein and inversely with the glomerular filtration rate, and at follow-up it correlated inversely with the renal concentration capacity. The DMSA scan is a sensitive method for diagnosing and localizing APN in children, and findings on DMSA scan show a weak but significant correlation with routine clinical and radiological parameters. It is suggested that persistent renal damage after APN in children without VUR may be more common than previously assumed.Urinary levels of interleukin-6 and interleukin-8 in children with urinary tract infections to age 2.The aim of this study was to assess relations between the clinical course of UTI, IL-6 and IL-8 levels, and the presence of inflammatory changes detected by renal scintigraphy using 99mTc-DMSA (DMSA).We studied 33 children aged 1-24 months (mean 7.1+/-5.8 months) with first-time UTI. The subjects were divided in two groups: with fever (group I, n=10) and without fever (group II, n=23). Inflammatory markers (ESR, CRP, leukocyte count), urinary IL-6 and IL-8 level, and DMSA scan were evaluated in all children.Urinary IL-6 and IL-8 levels [IL-6, IL-8/creatinine (pg/mg)] were significantly higher in group I than in group II (Il-6 level: 39.4+/-41.1 vs. 6.3+/-13.7, p<0.01; IL-8 level: 791.1+/-1143.6 vs. 36+/-87.9, p<0.001). We found positive correlation between urinary IL-6 and IL-8 levels and ESR, CRP, and leukocyte count (IL-6: r=0.43, p<0.05; r=0.46, p<0.05; and r=0.59, p<0.001, respectively; IL-8: r=0.55, p<0.05; r=0.72, p<0.0001; and r=0.44, p<0.05, respectively). We found no relation between urinary cytokine levels and the presence of inflammatory changes detected by DMSA scanning, despite slightly higher mean urinary cytokine levels in children with inflammatory changes in DMSA scan.We found significantly higher IL-6 and IL-8 levels in children with febrile UTI and elevated inflammatory markers. IL-6 and IL-8 levels do not differentiate between acute pyelonephritis and UTI in children to age 24 months.The efficacy of ultrasound and dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in predicting vesicoureteral reflux in children below the age of 2 years with their first febrile urinary tract infection.We evaluated the efficacy of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasound (US) in comparison with voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in predicting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children below the age of 2 years. Medical records and radiologic studies of children (<2 years) suffering their first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) between January 2001 and May 2007 were retrospectively reviewed. We evaluated the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of US and DMSA scans in diagnosing VUR. Among 220 children with their first febrile UTI, VUR was detected in 67 (30.4%). The detection rate of VUR by US was 41.7% and 86% in the low (I, II) and high grade (III~IV) groups, respectively. Detection rate of VUR by DMSA scan was 37.5% and 88.4% in the low and high grade groups, respectively. Combining US and DMSA scan, we found that the detection rate of high grade VUR was 95.3% and that of low grade was 62.5%. During follow up, most of the low grade VURs with normal DMSA and US scans resolved or were downgraded. Most high grade VURs could be detected by US and DMSA scan, but the prediction rate was not as high in low grade VURs. However, we can anticipate spontaneous improvement without complications in patients with either low or high grade reflux and negative findings on US and DMSA scan.[Technetium 99m labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (99m Tc-DMSA) scintigraphy in the diagnosis and follow-up of urinary infections in children].The site of a urinary tract infection (UTI) is located by clinical findings plus imaging techniques. Renal imaging with technetium 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc-DMSA) has shown promise but its efficacy for detecting acute pyelonephritis is still debated as is its ability to differentiate between acute, potentially curable disease and scarring, definitive changes.The files of all the 166 patients that underwent one or two (32 patients) 99mTc-DMSA imaging sessions for UTI in 1989 and 1990 in our department were analysed. The results of this technique were compared with the clinical and laboratory data and with those of other imaging techniques (ultrasonography and retrograde voiding cystourethrogram). The patients (92 girls and 74 boys, mean age: 5 years, range 15 days-17 years) were assigned to one of 3 categories: 1) acute pyelonephritis (27 patients), 2) low UTI (60 patients) and 3) uncertain UTI (79 patients), on the basis of the clinical and laboratory data.The first 99mTc-DMSA imaging was normal in 110 children; changes were unilateral in 45 and bilateral in 11 children. Images suggesting either acute or chronic changes were observed respectively in 19 and 48 children. 4 of the 7 acute changes were normalized on the second radioisotope scanning while 2 became worse; 19 of the 23 chronic changes were unchanged at the second scanning. Radioisotope scanning changes were seen in 81% of the patients classified as acute pyelonephritis and in only 27% of those with lower UTI. Reflux was detected in 56% of abnormal kidneys and in 36% of normal kidneys. The results of radioisotope scanning and ultrasound scan findings were not correlated in 24 patients (19 only abnormal radioisotope imaging, 5 only abnormal ultrasound scan).DMSA scans are useful for investigating and following UTI. They help to distinguish acute pyelonephritis and lower UTI. It is a reliable method of detecting structural abnormalities and identifying children at risk of progressive renal damage.[Urinary tract infection and biological markers: C-reactive protein, interleukins and procalcitonin].Serum C reactive protein (CRP) remains a good marker of the severity of urinary tract infections in children, despite false negative results. Serum IL-6 is not a better marker; urinary IL-6 might have a better prognostic value as it is higher in patients with renal lesions due to infection, but low values are found in some cases. Serum procalcitonin levels are correlated with the importance of renal scars at scintigraphy, with less than 10% of false negative results. Further studies are needed to confirm the sensitivity and sensibility of these markers, especially for procalcitonin.Is procalcitonin useful in early diagnosis of serious bacterial infections in children?To compare diagnostic accuracy of procalcitonin for early diagnosis of serious bacterial infection (SBI) in children presenting with fever and no focus of infection.Prospective, observational study involving 72 children (1-36 mo) presenting to the paediatric units of two university hospitals. All children had blood cultures, urine cultures, white blood cell counts (WBC), chest X-ray, C-reactive protein (CRP) and procalcitonin (PCT) done at presentation.Eight (11.1%) children had SBI (1 pneumonia, 2 meningitis, 4 septicaemia/occult bacteraemia, 2 pyelonephritis), 19 (26.4%) had possible bacterial infection (received antibiotic treatment, but no organism grown) and 45 (62.5%) had viral or possible viral infection (virus isolated and/or uneventful recovery without antibiotics). PCT (>2 ng/l), CRP (>50 mg/l) and McCarthy's score (<9) had sensitivities and specificities of 50%/85.9%, 75%/68.7% and 87.5%/67.2%, respectively. Negative and positive likelihood ratios for CRP (>50 mg/l), PCT (>2 ng/l), white blood cells (>15 x 10(5)/l) and McCarthy's score (<9) were 0.36/2.4, 0.58/3.5, 0.94/1.1 and 0.19/2.7, respectively. A combination of PCT, CRP and WBC generated a positive likelihood ratio of 10.6, changing the post-test probability to 54%.For early diagnosis of SBI in children presenting with fever and no focus of infection, the diagnostic utility of procalcitonin is similar to the traditional markers infection and clinical scoring. While a low procalcitonin level cannot be used to exclude SBI in this population, a combination of PCT, CRP and WBC may be more useful in predicting SBI.[Evaluation of inflammatory and renal injury markers in youngest children with pyelonephritis].Pyelonephritis (PN) is frequent bacterial infections in young infants and very important because may cause parenchymal scarring. Early confirmation of bacterial infection and application the appropriate treatment before obtaining result of urine culture, reduce probability of parenchymal scarring.To evaluate the useful of inflammatory and renal injury markers: serum procalcitonin (PCT), tumor necrosis factor alpha (TNF-alpha) and injury renal marker alpha1--microglobulin (A1M) measurement, in comparison with C-reactive protein concentration and abnormal urinary tract, in neonates and young infants with pyelonephritis.Investigation was performed in two groups: I group--23 children with PN (1 to 24 weeks of age), and K group--30 healthy children aged from 1 to 24 weeks. Serum concentration of CRP was measured by immunonephelometric assay, PCT by immunoluminometric assay, TNF alpha by ELISA method, and urinary A1M by nephelometric assay.In control group (K) medians of all investigated markers were below minimum of detection. PN patients (I) had the highest PCT TNF-alpha, A1M and CRP concentration before treatment and normal results after antibiotic treatment. Using a cut-off: of 0.5 mg/dl for CRP, 0.5 ng/ml for PCT 15 pg/ml for TNF-alpha and 10 mg/g cr for A1M, sensitivity and specificity in children with pyelonephritis were: for CRP 100% and 62.5%, for PCT 81.8% and 87.2%, for TNF alpha 77.1% and 93.1% and A1M 70.4% and 56.1%, respectively. A positive correlation between serum PCT and CRP and TNF alpha was found. Very high concentration all markers were in patients with vesicoureteral reflux and 1 patient with hydronephrosis.In early diagnostics of PN (before obtaining results of urine culture) in youngest children, determination of concentration PCT and TNF alpha, has higher value than determination of CRP, taking into concentration high sensitivity and specificity for bacterial infection.Randomised controlled trial of three day versus 10 day intravenous antibiotics in acute pyelonephritis: effect on renal scarring.Acute pyelonephritis often leaves children with permanent renal scarring.To compare the prevalence of scarring following initial treatment with antibiotics administered intravenously for 10 or three days.In a prospective two centre trial, 220 patients aged 3 months to 16 years with positive urine culture and acute renal lesions on initial DMSA scintigraphy, were randomly assigned to receive intravenous ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg once daily) for 10 or three days, followed by oral cefixime (4 mg/kg twice daily) to complete a 15 day course. After three months, scintigraphy was repeated in order to diagnose renal scars.Renal scarring developed in 33% of the 110 children in the 10 day intravenous group and 36% of the 110 children in the three day group. Children older than 1 year had more renal scarring than infants (42% (54/129) and 24% (22/91), respectively). After adjustment for age, sex, duration of fever before treatment, degree of inflammation, presence of vesicoureteric reflux, and the patients' recruitment centres, there was no significant difference between the two treatments on renal scarring. During follow up, 15 children had recurrence of urinary infection with no significant difference between the two treatment groups.In children with acute pyelonephritis, initial intravenous treatment for 10 days, compared with three days, does not significantly reduce the development of renal scarring.Urinary tract infection in children.Two hundred and eighty-five children under 15 years old (169 boys and 116 girls) who had urinary tract infection (UTI) were admitted to our hospital during the period July 1995 to June 1998. Clinical presentation, laboratory data and image studies were recognized and analyzed. Most patients were younger than 2 years of age. Fever is the most common sign, especially in young children. With the urinary dipstick test a low positive rate of nitrite reaction (34.7%) was found. E. coli is the most common pathogen and exclusively resistant to ampicillin (90.2%). The E. coli is also relatively resistant to trimethoprim/sulfamethoxazole (57.1%). Voiding cystourethrogram was performed in 187 cases, in which 24.6% of those patients showed vesicoureteric reflux. Ninety-eight children received 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans and 62 cases (63.3%) had abnormal findings compatible with pyelonephritis. The positive predictive values by renal ultrasonography for vesicoureteric reflux and pyelonephritis are 30.7% and 78.9%, respectively. In pyelonephritis patients, only 37% also had a vesicoureteric reflux. The fever duration and clinical inflammatory parameters were evaluated in all patients. Longer febrile periods are the risk of vesicoureteric reflux and pyelonephritis, and a high C-reactive protein concentration indicates the risk of pyelonephritis. In conclusion, fever was the most common sign in young UTI children who had a low positive nitrite reaction rate in the dipstick test. E. coli was the most common pathogen with a high ampicillin resistance in Taiwan. Only 37% pyelonephritis patients had refluxing nephropathy. It is indicated that pyelonephritis is not always attributed to reflux of infected urine. A longer febrile period and a high C-reactive protein level are good indicators for prediction of the risk of pyelonephritis in UTI patients.Prophylaxis after first febrile urinary tract infection in children? A multicenter, randomized, controlled, noninferiority trial.Febrile urinary tract infections are common in children and associated with the risk for renal scarring and long-term complications. Antimicrobial prophylaxis has been used to reduce the risk for recurrence. We performed a study to determine whether no prophylaxis is similar to antimicrobial prophylaxis for 12 months in reducing the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections in children after a first febrile urinary tract infection.The study was a controlled, randomized, open-label, 2-armed, noninferiority trial comparing no prophylaxis with prophylaxis (co-trimoxazole 15 mg/kg per day or co-amoxiclav 15 mg/kg per day) for 12 months. A total of 338 children who were aged 2 months to <7 years and had a first episode of febrile urinary tract infection were enrolled: 309 with a confirmed pyelonephritis on a technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan with or without reflux and 27 with a clinical pyelonephritis and reflux. The primary end point was recurrence rate of febrile urinary tract infections during 12 months. Secondary end point was the rate of renal scarring produced by recurrent urinary tract infections on technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan after 12 months.Intention-to-treat analysis showed no significant differences in the primary outcome between no prophylaxis and prophylaxis: 12 (9.45%) of 127 vs 15 (7.11%) of 211. In the subgroup of children with reflux, the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections was 9 (19.6%) of 46 on no prophylaxis and 10 (12.1%) of 82 on prophylaxis. No significant difference was found in the secondary outcome: 2 (1.9%) of 108 on no prophylaxis versus 2 (1.1%) of 187 on prophylaxis. Bivariate analysis and Cox proportional hazard model showed that grade III reflux was a risk factor for recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. Whereas increasing age was protective, use of no prophylaxis was not a risk factor.For children with or without primary nonsevere reflux, prophylaxis does not reduce the rate of recurrent febrile urinary tract infections after the first episode.Early (99m)Tc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.Level diagnosis of symptomatic urinary tract infections in childhood.As no method for localization of urinary tract infection has been shown to be absolutely reliable, six procedures have been carried out simultaneously in 25 girls with acute symptomatic infections and the reliability of each method assessed. While clinical diagnosis of pyelonephritis or cystitis correlated well with the overall results of the battery of tests, the reliability of individual tests varied. Highest reliability was obtained with CRP determinations followed by antibody titration, sedimentation rate, and renal concentrating capacity. In the bladder washout test only 8 of the 14 patients with pyelonephritis had findings clearly indicating high infection. Intermittent or inadequate discharge of bacteria from the renal parenchyma is suggested as the major source for this inaccuracy. In fact, half of the 42 final washout specimens from girls with acute pyelonephritis contained less than 1000 bacteria per ml, indicating that low numbers of organisms in ureteric urine is common in childhood pyelonephritis.Bacterial virulence factors are associated with occurrence of acute pyelonephritis but not renal scarring.We evaluated the influence of patient factors and virulence factors of uropathogenic Escherichia coli on the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal parenchymal scarring.We evaluated 80 boys and 45 girls 1 to 180 months old with febrile urinary tract infections who underwent renal scan to diagnose acute pyelonephritis and followup dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy at least 6 months later. Urinalysis, white blood cell count, uropathogenic E. coli genotype and vesicoureteral reflux were measured. Voiding cystourethrogram was investigated after acute pyelonephritis was confirmed by renal scan and acute inflammation subsided, about 2 to 4 weeks later.Acute pyelonephritis was significantly more likely to develop in children with urinary tract infections and persistent fever before and after hospitalization, elevated C-reactive protein or positive renal ultrasound findings. E. coli strains with the papG II and iha genes were significantly more likely to occur in patients with acute pyelonephritis. Patients with a fever for more than 3 days and C-reactive protein levels greater than 90.8 mg/l were significantly more likely to have renal scarring. Age was not an independent predictor of acute pyelonephritis, but modified the effect of virulence factors on the development of acute pyelonephritis.Bacterial virulence factors and host factors are associated with the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis. Host factors such as patient age and vesicoureteral reflux severity modify the influence of virulence factors, although only host factors are associated with the occurrence of renal scarring.Prospective, randomized trial comparing short and long intravenous antibiotic treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children: dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphic evaluation at 9 months.We report a prospective, randomized, multicenter trial that compared the effect of 3 vs 8 days of intravenous ceftriaxone treatment on the incidence of renal scarring at 6 to 9 months of follow-up in 383 children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.After initial treatment with intravenous netilmicin and ceftriaxone, patients were randomly assigned to either 5 days of oral antibiotics (short intravenous treatment) or 5 days of intravenous ceftriaxone (long intravenous treatment). Inclusion criteria were age 3 months to 16 years and first acute pyelonephritis episode, defined by fever of >38.5 degrees C, C-reactive protein level of >20 mg/L, and bacteriuria at >10(5)/mL. All patients underwent 99m technetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy 6 to 9 months after inclusion. A total of 548 children were included, 48 of whom were secondarily excluded and 117 of whom were lost to follow-up or had incomplete data; therefore, 383 children were eligible, 205 of them in the short intravenous treatment group and 178 in the long intravenous treatment group.At inclusion, median age was 15 months, median duration of fever was 43 hours, and median C-reactive protein level was 122 mg/L. A total of 37% (143 of 383) of patients had a vesicoureteral reflux grades 1 to 3. Patient characteristics at inclusion were similar in both groups, except for a significantly higher proportion of girls in the short intravenous treatment group. The frequency of renal scars at scintigraphy was similar in both groups. Multivariate analysis demonstrated that renal scars were significantly associated with increased renal height at initial ultrasound and with the presence of grade 3 vesicoureteric reflux.The incidence of renal scars was similar in patients who received 3 days compared 8 days of intravenous ceftriaxone. Increased renal height at initial ultrasound examination and grade 3 vesicoureteric reflux were significant risk factors for renal scars.The importance of 99mTc DMSA scanning in the localization of childhood urinary tract infections.The use of 99mTechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc DMSA) scanning for the early diagnosis of upper urinary tract infections has been preferred for a few years. In this research we investigated the use of 99mTc DMSA scanning in the localization of renal parenchymal involvement in urinary tract infection. Twenty-four children presenting with first acute urinary tract infection were studied. Investigations included physical examination, white blood cell count (WBC), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), antibody-coated bacteria (ACB) and early 99mTc DMSA scanning. 99mTc DMSA scanning was taken as the gold standard method in determining renal parenchymal inflammation. According to the 99mTc DMSA scanning the sensitivity of clinical findings was 57.14%, WBC 23.80%, ESR 33.33%, CRP 14.28% and ACB 71.42% in the localization of urinary tract infection. We propose early 99mTc DMSA scanning performed around the time of infection as a good technique for localization of the level of infection in the urinary tract.[Usefulness of renal scintigraphy in the assessment of the first febrile urinary infection in children].The objective of this study was to compare the findings of renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection to determine which method is better in detecting patients at risk of renal injury or reflux.Thirty-three children between 0.2 and 12.3 years of age with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection were studied by means of clinical and laboratory assessment, renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy. In 24 patients (72.7%) a voiding cystourethrography was made. The patients were divided into two groups, those under 2 years of age (n = 14) and those over 2 years old (n = 19).Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 23 patients (69.7%) and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 2 (6.1%; p < 0.05). Children over 2 years of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (84.2% vs 50%; p < 0.05). There were no differences between girls and boys. Reflux was demonstrated in 13 patients (54.2%). Among those kidneys which presented abnormal cortical scintigraphy, vesicoureteral reflux was present in 76.5% of the studies. Furthermore, of those with abnormal ultrasonography vesicoureteral reflux was present in 17.6%.We found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection. The cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes. The incidence of vesicoureteral reflux in febrile urinary tract infection is high. When there is a renal cortical defect the risk of reflux is higher. This suggests that cortical scintigraphy should be added to the initial examination of children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection and this could be supplemented by voiding cystourethrography alone, with ultrasonography having a secondary role.Urinary proteins in children with urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to test our hypothesis that the urinary excretion of C-reactive protein (CRP), alpha 1-microglobulin (A1M), retinol-binding protein (RBP) and Clara cell protein (CC16) is increased in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) and relates to renal damage as measured by acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. Fifty-two children <2 years of age with UTI were enrolled in the study, 44 of whom were febrile. The control group consisted of 23 patients with non-UTI infection and elevated serum CRP (s-CRP) levels. Thirty-six patients had abnormal DMSA uptake, classified as mild, moderate or severe damage (DMSA class 1, 2, 3, respectively). There was a significant association between DMSA class and the excretion of urinary RBP (u-RBP) and u-CC16. There was also a significant difference in u-CRP levels between children with UTI and control children with non-UTI infections, although u-CRP excretion was not significantly correlated to DMSA class. In conclusion, the urinary excretion of the low-molecular-weight proteins RBP and CC16 showed a strong association with uptake defects on renal DMSA scans. The urinary level of CRP seems to distinguish between children with UTI and other febrile conditions. A combination of these biomarkers may be useful in the clinical assessment of children with UTI.Predictive factors for acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with first febrile urinary tract infection.We assessed predictive factors for acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.A total of 89 girls and 138 boys with a first febrile urinary tract infection were included in the study. We analyzed radiological (ultrasound, dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy, voiding cystourethrogram), clinical (age, gender, peak fever, therapeutic delay time) and laboratory (complete blood count with differential count, absolute neutrophil count, blood urea nitrogen, creatinine, urinalysis, Gram's stain, culture, C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate) variables. Dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy was performed within 5 days and at 6 months after diagnosis of urinary tract infection. Voiding cystourethrogram was performed after the acute phase of the urinary tract infection. Predictive factors for acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation were assessed using logistic regression analysis.Of 227 patients enrolled 140 had a refluxing and 87 a nonrefluxing urinary tract infection. On logistic regression analysis therapeutic delay time (p = 0.001) and presence of reflux (p = 0.011) were predictive of acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation (p = 0.001 and p = 0.0001, respectively) in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.Since vesicoureteral reflux is the common risk factor for acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation, voiding cystourethrogram must be considered as an initial study in patients with acute febrile urinary tract infection.Value of imaging studies after a first febrile urinary tract infection in young children: data from Italian renal infection study 1.We examined the diagnostic accuracy of routine imaging studies (ultrasonography and micturating cystography) for predicting long-term parenchymal renal damage after a first febrile urinary tract infection.This study addressed the secondary objective of a prospective trial evaluating different antibiotic regimens for the treatment of acute pyelonephritis. Data for 300 children < or =2 years of age, with normal prenatal ultrasound results, who completed the diagnostic follow-up evaluation (ultrasonography and technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning within 10 days, cystography within 2 months, and repeat technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning at 12 months to detect scarring) were analyzed. Outcome measures were sensitivity, specificity, and negative and positive predictive values for ultrasonography and cystography in predicting parenchymal renal damage on the 12-month technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans.The kidneys and urinary tracts were mostly normal. The acute technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans showed pyelonephritis in 54% of cases. Renal scarring developed in 15% of cases. The ultrasonographic and cystographic findings were poor predictors of long-term damage, showing minor sonographic abnormalities for 12 and reflux for 23 of the 45 children who subsequently developed scarring.The benefit of performing ultrasonography and scintigraphy in the acute phase or cystourethrography is minimal. Our findings support (1) technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy 6 months after infection to detect scarring that may be related to long-term hypertension, proteinuria, and renal function impairment (although the degree of scarring was generally minor and did not impair renal function) and (2) continued surveillance to identify recurrent urinary tract infections that may warrant further investigation.Symptomatic urinary tract infection in preschool Australian children.To describe the demographic and clinical features, short-term outcomes, microbiology and renal tract abnormalities of a cohort of young Australian children with symptomatic urinary tract infection.A total of 304 children < 5 years with their first documented symptomatic urinary tract infection who presented consecutively to the Emergency Department of a paediatric hospital between March 1993 and December 1994 and without a known predisposing cause were identified and details of their acute illness were recorded. Renal tract sonography, micturating cystourethrography and Tc-99 m dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA) were routinely performed.Of those who presented with urinary tract infection, 169 were boys and 135 girls; 64% were less than 1 year of age. For children from the local community, the cumulative incidence of urinary tract infection within the first 5 years of life was estimated to be 1.9% for boys and 1.8% for girls. There were no significant differences in illness characteristics according to mode of referral or geographical locality. Presenting symptoms were generally nonspecific and not referrable to the urinary tract. There were no deaths. One per cent of children required ventilatory support, and bacteraemia occurred in 6%, all of whom were under 6 months of age. E. coli was the causal organism in 84%, and a high in vitro resistance to ampicillin/ amoxycillin (54%) was demonstrated by the pathogens isolated. Bacteriuria was eradicated in 99% with antimicrobial treatment. In this setting, the sensitivities of dipstick urinalysis (leucocyte esterase+/-nitrites) and pyuria on microscopy (>10 x 10(6) white cells L(-1)) were 85%. Abnormal DMSA scintigraphy was detected in 39%, vesicoureteric reflux in 28%, and obstructive uropathy in 1%.This study provides current and local data on a large sample of children <5 years with urinary tract infection, which are useful to clinicians who manage children at risk of the condition.Cortical scintigraphy in the evaluation of renal parenchymal changes in children with pyelonephritis.We designed a prospective study to evaluate the ability of dimercaptosuccinic acid cortical scintigraphy and ultrasonography to detect renal parenchymal lesions in children with pyelonephritis. One hundred eleven patients 1 week to 16 years of age (median 5.5 months) with a urine culture positive for pathogens were included in the study; cortical scintigraphy and ultrasonography were repeated in 25 children after a mean follow-up of 10.5 months. Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 74 children (67%), and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 39 (35%) (p < 0.001); results of the two examinations were discordant in 49 patients (kappa = 0.19). Children more than 1 year of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (85% vs 66%; p = 0.04). The presence of inflammatory signs (erythrocyte sedimentation rate or C-reactive protein) had an 89% sensitivity and a 25% specificity in identifying renal lesions. Among children with renal changes, vesicoureteric reflux was present in 39%. At follow-up examination, 16 children (64%) had scars. Thus we found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with pyelonephritis. We found that cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes, and we believe that it should be added to the initial examination of children with suspected pyelonephritis.Diagnostic significance of 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in urinary tract infection.A total of 106 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (73 girls and 33 boys, 0-15.9 years of age) were studied by means of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasound, and a desmopressin test during infection and at follow up approximately two months later. At follow up they were also investigated by means of intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cystourethrography (MCU). During infection 23 children had a normal DMSA scan while 83 children had an abnormal one. The median C reactive protein and SD score for renal concentration capacity in the former group were 15 (range < 10-178) mg/l and -1.0 SD score (range -2.4 to 1.8), respectively, and in the latter group 98 (range < 10-320) mg/l and -3.1 SD score (range -5.7 to 1.1), respectively. In the former group there was no significant finding in any child on ultrasound or IVU and only one had significant vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) (grade 3). At follow up 51 children had a normal DMSA scan while 55 children showed persistent changes. The median SD score for renal concentration capacity in the former group was -0.9 SD score (range -3.2 to 1.4) and in the latter group -1.6 SD score (range -4.6 to 2.5). No significant changes were found in the former group on ultrasound or IVU and only two children had significant VUR (grade 3). In the latter group 20 children showed changes on ultrasound, 15 showed changes on IVU, and 23 had VUR. These results suggest that a normal DMSA scan during or approximately two months after urinary tract infection in children indicates a low risk of finding significant pathology of the urinary tract.Urinary lactic dehydrogenase and serum C-reactive protein as means of localizing the site of urinary tract infection in patients with ileal conduits.Many patients with ileal conduit urinary diversion have infected urine but far fewer have clinical pyelonephritis. A noninvasive diagnostic test to distinguish renal bacteriuria from conduit colonization in these patients would seem desirable. Urine total lactic dehydrogenase and lactic dehydrogenase isoenzymes, and serum C-reactive protein have been useful to distinguish pyelonephritis from cystitis in patients with intact urinary tracts. We used these tests in patients with ileal conduits who had urine containing more and less than 10(5) organisms per ml. All patients had elevated urine total lactic dehydrogenase-5 isoenzyme, and serum C-reactive protein. No statistically significant difference in any of these parameters existed between the groups. These results may indicate that all patients with conduits have pyelonephritis but only intermittently demonstrate bacteriuria, or that the conduit mucosa contributes lactic dehydrogenase to the urine. However, it does not appear that these tests alone can distinguish accurately renal bacteriuria from conduit colonization.Usefulness of procalcitonin and C-reactive protein rapid tests for the management of children with urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common problem in children. Because clinical findings and commonly used blood indices are nonspecific, the distinction between lower and upper urinary tract infection cannot be made easily in this population. However, this distinction is important because renal infection can induce parenchymal scarring. The objective of this study was to determine the accuracy of procalcitonin (PCT) compared with C-reactive protein (CRP) rapid tests to predict renal involvement in children with febrile UTI.PCT and CRP were measured in the blood of children admitted to the emergency room with fever, signs and symptoms of urinary tract infection and/or a positive urine dipstick analysis. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by a 99mTc-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan in the acute phase of infection in all children. Sensitivity, specificity and likelihood ratios were determined for both tests.Fifty-four children with a proven urinary tract infection were enrolled: 63% had renal involvement; and 37% had infection restricted to the lower urinary tract. No difference was found for age, sex and total white blood cell count between the groups. The calculated likelihood ratios of procalcitonin and C-reactive protein rapid tests were between 3.8 and 7 and 1.5 and 2.8, respectively. A positive PCT value predicted renal involvement in 87 to 92% of children with febrile UTI, compared with 44 to 83% using CRP values.A rapid determination of procalcitonin concentration could be useful for the management of children with febrile UTI in the emergency room.Cytokine profiles of pediatric patients treated with antibiotics for pyelonephritis: potential therapeutic impact.Urinary tract infections are common in infants and children. Pyelonephritis may result in serious complications, such as renal scarring, hypertension, and renal failure. Identification of the timing of release of inflammatory cytokines in relation to pyelonephritis and its treatment is essential for designing interventions that would minimize tissue damage. To this end, we measured urinary cytokine concentrations of interleukin-1 beta (IL-1 beta), IL-6, and IL-8 in infants and children with pyelonephritis and in healthy children. Children that presented to our institution with presumed urinary tract infection were given the diagnosis of pyelonephritis if they had a positive urine culture, pyuria, and one or more of the following indicators of systemic involvement: fever, elevated peripheral white blood cell count, or elevated C-reactive protein. Urine samples were obtained at the time of presentation prior to the administration of antibiotics, immediately after completion of the first dose of antibiotics, and at follow up 12 to 24 h after presentation. IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 concentrations were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Creatinine concentrations were also determined, and cytokine/creatinine ratios were calculated to standardize samples. Differences between pre-antibiotic and follow-up cytokine/creatinine ratios were significant for IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 (P < 0.01). Differences between pre-antibiotic and control cytokine/creatinine ratios were also significant for IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 (P < 0.01). Our study revealed that the urinary tract cytokine response to infection is intense but dissipates shortly after the initiation of antibiotic treatment. This suggests that renal damage due to inflammation begins early in infection, underscoring the need for rapid diagnosis and intervention.Color and power Doppler sonography versus DMSA scintigraphy in acute pyelonephritis and in prediction of renal scarring.Capabilities of color and power Doppler sonography (DS) were prospectively evaluated for diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and for prediction of scarring by comparison with 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA).Fifty-seven children (mean age, 5 +/- 3 y) with acute pyelonephritis were investigated by biologic testing, DS (DS 1), and DMSA (DMSA 1). Patients who were <6 mo old or had high-grade reflux or obstruction were excluded. Forty-five children had a clinical follow-up examination, biologic testing, DS (DS 2), and DMSA (DMSA 2) at a mean of 7 +/- 2 mo after acute infection. Sonography (gray-scale and DS) was performed by 1 experienced radiologist who was unaware of patient data. DMSA studies were interpreted by 2 physicians who were unaware of patient data.Temperature, neutrophil count, and C-reactive protein value were significantly higher in patients with abnormal DMSA 1 findings than in those with abnormal DS 1 findings (P < 0.05). When compared with DMSA 1, DS 1 had a sensitivity and specificity of 80% and 81%, respectively. At follow-up, all clinical and biologic data had normalized. Scarring after infection occurred in 51% of children. When compared with DMSA 2, DS 1 had positive and negative predictive values of 57% and 75%, respectively, and DMSA 1 had respective values of 62% and 100%. Reflux was not considered a good predictor of scarring.DS and DMSA results were concordant in 81% of kidneys with acute pyelonephritis. The predictive value of DS for renal scarring was not considered sufficiently high for DS to be used in routine practice.Procalcitonin is a marker of severity of renal lesions in pyelonephritis.In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin levels, a recently described marker of infection. We compared it with other commonly used inflammatory markers and evaluated its ability to predict renal involvement as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein, leukocyte counts, and procalcitonin levels were measured in 80 children, 1 month to 16 years of age, admitted for suspected pyelonephritis. Renal involvement was assessed by 99mTe-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 5 days after admission. The examination was repeated at least 3 months later if the first result was abnormal.In lower UTI, the mean procalcitonin (PCT) was 0.38 micrograms/L +/- 0.19 compared with 5.37 micrograms/L +/- 1.9 in pyelonephritis. In these two groups, respectively, leukocyte counts were 10939/mm3 +/- 834 and 17429/mm3 +/- 994, and C-reactive protein (CRP) levels were 30.3 mg/L +/- 7.6 and 120.8 mg/L +/- 8.9. When inflammatory markers were correlated to the severity of the renal lesion as ranked by DMSA scintigraphy, we found a highly significant correlation with plasma levels of PCT, but borderline significance with CRP and none with leukocyte counts. Patients without vesicoureteral reflux had a mean PCT of 5.16 micrograms/L +/- 2.33, which was not significantly different from that in patients with reflux who had a mean PCT of 5.76 micrograms/L +/- 3.49. For the prediction of renal lesions at admission, CRP had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 26.1%. The sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 70.3% and 82.6%, respectively.We conclude that serum PCT levels were increased significantly in children with febrile UTI when renal parenchymal involvement (assessed by DMSA scintigraphy) was present and allowed for prediction of patients at risk of severe renal lesions.99mTc-DMSA scintigraphy in acute urinary tract infection in children.24 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI) underwent systematically ultrasound studies (US) and 99mTc-DMSA renal scans. Among the 15 patients considered as acute pyelonephritis (APN) on clinical grounds, the scan was abnormal in 12 cases, in contrast with only 1 abnormal scan in the clinical subgroup of the lower UTI. Among the 10 abnormal scans that were repeated later on, 6 did completely normalize. US showed only once a parenchymal appearance suggestive for APN. Our findings suggest that the DMSA scan has to be considered at present as the most sensitive imaging technique for the detection of APN.Vesicoureteral reflux increases the risk of renal scars: a study of unilateral reflux.The aim of this study was to assess the impact of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on renal scar following acute pyelonephritis by comparing the refluxing renal units with nonrefluxing renal units in children with unilateral primary VUR. Forty-eight children with unilateral primary VUR diagnosed after the first pyelonephritis were enrolled. Mean age of patients was 1.0+/-1.6 years (29 boys and 19 girls). All patients underwent renal ultrasonography and renal 99 m-technetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan within three days following the diagnosis of pyelonephritis, and voiding cystourethrography (VCU) was performed soon after fever subsided and the infection was controlled. The DMSA scan was rechecked six months after the initial study when the first scan showed a renal defect. The first DMSA showed renal defects in 34 (70.8%) out of 48 of the refluxing renal units and in 13 (27.1%) out of 48 of the nonrefluxing renal units (P<0.01, OR: 6.54). At six months after the infection, 23 (47.9%) out of 48 refluxing renal units and seven (14.6%) out of 48 nonrefluxing renal units had renal scars on DMSA scan (P<0.01, OR: 5.39). The prevalence of renal scars did not vary significantly according to the grade of VUR. The CRP level on admission was significantly higher in patients with acute renal defect and scar. In conclusion, VUR increases the risk of post-pyelonephritic renal scars in children.Early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children fails to reduce renal scarring: data from the Italian Renal Infection Study Trials.The American Academy of Pediatrics recommendation for febrile infants and young children suspected of having a urinary tract infection is early antibiotic treatment, given parenterally if necessary. In support of this recommendation, data suggesting that delay in treatment of acute pyelonephritis increases the risk of kidney damage are cited. Because the risk was not well defined, we investigated renal scarring associated with delayed versus early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children.The research findings are derived from 2 multicenter, prospective, randomized, controlled studies, Italian Renal Infection Study 1 and 2, whose primary outcomes dealt with initial antibiotic treatment and subsequent prophylaxis, respectively. From the 2 studies, we selected the 287 children with confirmed pyelonephritis on acute technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans who underwent repeat scanning to detect scarring 12 months later. The children were 1 month to <7 years of age when they presented with their first recognized episode of acute pyelonephritis in northeast Italy.Progressive delay in antibiotic treatment of acute pyelonephritis from <1 to >/=5 days after the onset of fever was not associated with any significant increase in the risk of scarring on technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans obtained 1 year later. The risk of scarring remained relatively constant at 30.7 +/- 7%. Clinical and laboratory indices of inflammation were comparable in all groups, as was the incidence of vesicoureteric reflux.Early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in infants and young children had no significant effect on the incidence of subsequent renal scarring. Furthermore, there was no significant difference in the rate of scarring after acute pyelonephritis when infants and young children were compared with older children.Lack of association between hemolysin production and acute inflammation in human urinary tract infection.Hemolysins are cytolytic proteins which have been extensively characterized at the molecular level, however, their in vivo functions remain unclear. This study analyzed the association of hemolysin production with the inflammatory response in patients with urinary tract infection (UTI). Infants and children with their first episode of UTI (n = 644) were followed prospectively. The body temperature, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), urinary leucocyte count and renal concentrating capacity were used as measures of the inflammatory response. The hemolytic genotype (hly) of the Escherichia coli strain from each UTI episode was defined by DNA-DNA hybridization, and the phenotype by hemolysis in blood agar. There was no significant increase in the level of fever, CRP, ESR, or decrease in renal concentrating capacity during UTI episodes caused by hly positive compared to hly negative E. coli. Multiple regression analysis did not demonstrate significant associations of hly with elevated fever, CRP, ESR or reduced renal concentrating capacity. In contrast, patients infected with P fimbriated E. coli strains had higher fever, CRP, ESR and lower renal concentrating capacity than those infected with other strains. This association was not influenced by the hly genotype of the P fimbriated strains. The frequency of hly+ strains was not significantly higher in the subset of patients assigned a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis compared to asymptomatic bacteriuria. This was in contrast to P fimbriae, which were accumulated in acute pyelonephritis. The results suggested that the acute inflammatory response to E. coli UTI is independent of hemolysin production. The inflammatogenic potential of uropathogenic E. coli clones was better described by the presence or absence of P-fimbriae than by hemolysin.Urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase and beta-2-microglobulin in the diagnosis of urinary tract infection in febrile infants.Urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase (NAG) and beta-2-microglobulin (B2M) concentrations were measured in 24 pediatric patients with febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) and compared with the technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan results, in order to evaluate a noninvasive means to localize the site of UTI. Increased urinary B2M and NAG were not associated with renal inflammation (pyelonephritis), as defined by positive dimercaptosuccinic acid scan. Median NAG concentrations were 114.2 mumol/hour/mg creatinine (CR) (range, 5.7 to 305.4) in 17 febrile UTI patients vs. 13.8 (range, 3.4 to 104.3) in 17 age and sex-matched febrile controls with negative urine cultures, P = 0.0001. The sensitivity and specificity of NAG > or = 40 mumol/hour/mg of CR in predicting UTI in febrile patients, regardless of the site of infection, were 88 and 88%, respectively. Increased urinary NAG is associated with UTI in febrile patients regardless of the level of infection (scan status), and may be an informative indicator of UTI.Early 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.During a 2 year period, 175 children below 6 years of age (median 0.4 year) with non-obstructive symptomatic urinary tract infection were studied by 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. DMSA scintigraphy was performed at a median of 10 days after the start of treatment and was abnormal in 73 children (42%), equivocal in 29 (16%) and normal in 73 (42%). Reflux was seen in 27% of all children and in 38% of the renal units that were abnormal at DMSA scintigraphy. A decreasing frequency of abnormalities at DMSA scintigraphy was seen within the first 14 days after the start of treatment. C-reactive protein and grade of reflux correlated significantly with abnormal DMSA studies. To demonstrate renal involvement in acute urinary tract infection, DMSA scintigraphy should be performed within days after the start of treatment. It is noteworthy that reflux was seen in less than half of renal units with abnormal DMSA scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein and the site of urinary tract infections.Elevated surum levels of C-reactive protein have been found regularly in girls with acute clinical pyelonephritis but only infrequently in those with clinical cystitis. Based on these data, the suggestion has been made that elevated serum CRP concentrations may be useful in identifying patients with upper urinary tract infections. In a study in which the bladder washout test was used to localize the site of urinary tract infections, we identified nine girls with renal bacteriuria who did not have clinical findings suggesting acute pyelonephritis; four of these girls had serum CRP concentrations less than 10 micrograms/ml. Twenty-eight girls had bladder washout-proven lower urinary tract infections; three of these had serum CRP values greater than 30 micrograms/ml. These studies show that an elevated serum CRP concentration is not accurate in localizing the site of a urinary tract infection in girls who do not have clinical signs of acute pyelonephritis.Age-related radiological imaging in children with acute pyelonephritis.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) using clinical and laboratory parameters is often difficult in children. The aims of this retrospective study were twofold. Firstly, to correlate the clinical and laboratory manifestations of APN with the results of the dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan in different age groups. Secondly, to compare the DMSA renal scan, renal ultrasonography (RUS), and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in patients with clinical APN. The DMSA renal scan was utilized as the gold standard for renal involvement. We determined the sensitivity of these tests in febrile urinary tract infections (UTI) in three age groups: group I less than 2 years; group II 2-8 years; group III older than 8 years. During the period January 1992 through December 1998, 222 children presented with a febrile UTI. All patients had a DMSA renal scan, 208 had contrast VCUG, and 163 had RUS. The clinical and laboratory manifestation of pyelonephritis correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan in the older children than in the younger children; 85% of the DMSA renal scans were positive in group III; 69% in group II; 48% in group I (P<0.001). Vesicoureteral reflux detected by contrast VCUG was more prevalent in the younger age groups. Although high grades of reflux (grade IV-V) correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan, it did not reach a level of statistical significance (P>0.05). RUS did not correlate with a positive DMSA renal scan in any age group.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis: How helpful is procalcitonin?This prospective study aimed to investigate the diagnostic value of serum procalcitonin levels in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.We compared the symptoms and laboratory findings of fever, vomiting, abdominal/flank pain, leukocyte count, serum C-reactive protein and procalcitonin levels with the results of the DMSA scan obtained within the first 72 h after referral in children who were diagnosed as having acute pyelonephritis. Thirty-three children (31 female and two male) aged 1-11 years (mean 4.42 years) were enrolled in this prospective study.Twenty-one of 33 patients (64%) had positive DMSA scans. On the scans obtained after 6 months, five of 21 patients (23.8%) had renal scars. No correlation was found between clinical and laboratory parameters, alone or combined with each other, and positive DMSA scans. Serum procalcitonin levels were 0.767+/-0.64 and 1.23+/-1.17 ng . ml in children with normal and positive DMSA scans, respectively. The cut-off value for procalcitonin using receiver operating characteristic analysis was 0.9605 ng . ml, while sensitivity and specificity were 86.4% and 36.4%, respectively. However, if the cut-off value was chosen as 2 ng . ml, the sensitivity increased to 100% while specificity did not change markedly.The serum procalcitonin test, like other commonly used laboratory parameters, e.g. serum C-reactive protein and white blood cell count, was inadequate in distinguishing renal parenchymal involvement in acute febrile urinary tract infections.Chemokine response to febrile urinary tract infection.Mucosal CXC chemokines recruit inflammatory cells to the infected urinary tract. The chemokine response repertoire of the urinary tract and the relationship to disease severity have not been examined, however.This study quantified CXC (CXCL1, CXCL3, CXCL5, CXCL8, CXCL9, and CXCL10) and CC (CCL2, CCL4, and CCL5) chemokines in sequential urine samples obtained from 50 patients with febrile urinary tract infections during 24 hours after diagnosis.All patients had elevated chemokine levels, but bacteremic infections caused higher CXCL1, CXCL3, CXCL5, CXCL8, and CCL2 responses. CCL2 and CXCL8 levels were higher in patients with acute pyelonephritis symptoms and CCL2, CXCL3, CCL4, CXCL5, and CXCL10 were significantly correlated to C-reactive protein (CRP) and temperature. Women and men showed different chemokine responses.Febrile urinary tract infections are accompanied by a complex chemokine response. The response magnitude reflects disease severity, and the repertoire is influenced by gender and underlying disease.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections in infants and young children.The purpose of the study was to compare bacterial species, clinical, laboratory and imaging findings ((99m )Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan and voiding cystogram) in infants and children with high (>/=10(5) colony forming units (CFU)/ml, group A patients) and low (</=5 x 10(4) CFU/ml, group C patients) bacterial count in urine cultures during first episode of urinary tract infection. Group B included patients with intermediate CFU/ml. Included were 419 symptomatic patients with: (a) no previous antibiotic treatment, (b) urine samples for quantitative cultures taken by bladder catheterisation or suprapubic bladder aspiration, (c) growth of only one microorganism, and (d) age </=54 months (age of the oldest patient of group C). Out of 419 cultures, Escherichia coli grew in 315 (75.2%), gram-negative bacteria except E. coli in 91 (21.7%) and gram-positive in 13 (3.1%). Group C patients were significantly ( P <0.0001) more often affected with gram-negative pathogens except E. coli than group A patients (21/44 versus 67/360). Most of group C patients were younger than 24 months of age; none was older than 54 months. Comparison of the prevalence of clinical and laboratory (leucocyte count, CRP, ESR) findings between groups A and C showed no significant differences. There was no statistically significant difference in the prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations (except reflux) between groups A and C.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections mainly affect infants and young children and are often due to gram-negative bacteria other than E. coli. Clinical and laboratory findings, prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations are similar in high and low bacterial count urinary tract infections.Risk assessment of renal cortical scarring with urinary tract infection by clinical features and ultrasonography.To address some of the issues in the ongoing debate over the optimal diagnostic imaging following childhood urinary tract infection (UTI), by determining the risk of missing renal cortical scarring which would be detected on a technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) gold standard if ultrasound alone were used, factoring for clinical features (upper or lower tract), UTI recurrence, and age group (infants, preschool, or school age).Details of UTI clinical features and recurrence were recorded for 990 children with a proven UTI, and their DMSA and ultrasound results were compared for each kidney.The risks of missing DMSA scarring varied between 0.4% (school age children with solitary lower tract UTI) and 11.1% (infants with recurrent upper tract UTI).UTI clinical features are important in assessing the need for DMSA imaging. Current UK imaging guidelines are endorsed, although preschool children with solitary lower tract UTI remain a controversial group and more attention needs to focused on children with recurrent UTI.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, urinary tract infection and renal damage in children.We studied the relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, urinary tract infection and permanent renal damage in children.We retrospectively analyzed 303 children younger than 2 years with a first time, nonobstructive, culture verified urinary tract infection. The protocol included ultrasonography and voiding cystourethrography within 3 months after urinary tract infection, and (99m)technetium dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy after 1 to 2 years.Vesicoureteral reflux was found in 36 of 163 boys (22%) and in 44 of 140 girls (31%). Of the 303 patients 80 (26%) had permanent renal damage according to dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy. The rate of abnormality increased significantly with grade of vesicoureteral reflux in boys and girls. The relative risk of renal damage was significantly increased in patients with vesicoureteral reflux grade II and higher. Maximum C-reactive protein concentration, maximum temperature during urinary tract infection, presence of vesicoureteral reflux and febrile recurrences of urinary tract infection were significantly related to permanent renal damage. In stepwise logistic regression vesicoureteral reflux was the only independent variable for boys, while C-reactive protein and vesicoureteral reflux were independent factors for girls.There was a significant relationship between grade II vesicoureteral reflux and higher and permanent renal damage in boys and girls. However, while the association between renal damage and vesicoureteral reflux was evident in boys, the role of urinary tract infection and renal inflammation seemed to be equally or more important in girls. These findings support the concept that renal damage is associated with vesicoureteral reflux and is often congenital in boys, while in girls it is more related to urinary tract infection with vesicoureteral reflux as a reinforcing factor.Randomised trial of oral versus sequential intravenous/oral cephalosporins in children with pyelonephritis.The hypothesis was tested that oral antibiotic treatment in children with acute pyelonephritis and scintigraphy-documented lesions is equally as efficacious as sequential intravenous/oral therapy with respect to the incidence of renal scarring. A randomised multi-centre trial was conducted in 365 children aged 6 months to 16 years with bacterial growth in cultures from urine collected by catheter. The children were assigned to receive either oral ceftibuten (9 mg/kg once daily) for 14 days or intravenous ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg once daily) for 3 days followed by oral ceftibuten for 11 days. Only patients with lesions detected on acute-phase dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy underwent follow-up scintigraphy. Efficacy was evaluated by the rate of renal scarring after 6 months on follow-up scintigraphy. Of 219 children with lesions on acute-phase scintigraphy, 152 completed the study; 80 (72 females, median age 2.2 years) were given ceftibuten and 72 (62 females, median age 1.6 years) were given ceftriaxone/ceftibuten. Patients in the intravenous/oral group had significantly higher C-reactive protein (CRP) concentrations at baseline and larger lesion(s) on acute-phase scintigraphy. Follow-up scintigraphy showed renal scarring in 21/80 children treated with ceftibuten and 33/72 with ceftriaxone/ceftibuten (p = 0.01). However, after adjustment for the confounding variables (CRP and size of acute-phase lesion), no significant difference was observed for renal scarring between the two groups (p = 0.2). Renal scarring correlated with the extent of the acute-phase lesion (r = 0.60, p < 0.0001) and the grade of vesico-ureteric reflux (r = 0.31, p = 0.03), and was more frequent in refluxing renal units (p = 0.04). The majority of patients, i.e. 44 in the oral group and 47 in the intravenous/oral group, were managed as out-patients. Side effects were not observed. From this study, we can conclude that once-daily oral ceftibuten for 14 days yielded comparable results to sequential ceftriaxone/ceftibuten treatment in children aged 6 months to 16 years with DMSA-documented acute pyelonephritis and it allowed out-patient management in the majority of these children.Clinical differentiation of acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection in children.To evaluate clinical variables for diagnosing childhood acute pyelonephritis (APN) when technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy is not available.We retrospectively reviewed the records of 590 children with febrile UTI seen from January 1999 to February 2004. On the basis of DMSA scintigraphy performed within 7 days after admission, they were divided into APN (n = 237) or non-APN (n = 353) groups. Gender, age, clinical presentation, absolute neutrophil count, C-reactive protein (CRP), urinalysis, culture, and sonographic findings were recorded from charts.A CRP level of > or =66.4 mg/L, in patients with >2 days prior to admission had a sensitivity of 71.6% and a specificity of 72.5% for APN. Similarly, a CRP of >27.3 mg/L in patients with < or =2 days prior to admission and a white cell count of >14,990/mm3 had sensitivities of 68.6% and 62.0% and specificities of 66.1% and 63.0%, respectively. Combining two or more variables did not result in better discrimination.If a DMSA scan is not available, it is reasonable to treat a febrile UTI as APN if the CRP is >66.4 mg/L in a patient with >2 days of fever or if the CRP is >27.3 mg/L in a patient febrile for < or =2 days.Urine macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in children with urinary tract infection: a possible predictor of acute pyelonephritis.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) is an important pro-inflammatory cytokine expressed at sites of inflammation. We have assessed this factor (MIF) in urinary tract infections with the aim of determining a non-invasive and sensitive method to differentiate upper and lower renal involvement. Thirty-three pediatric patients with urinary track infection (25 with acute pyelonephritis, eight with acute cystitis) and 40 healthy subjects were recruited for this prospective case-control study. Pyelonephritis was differentiated from cystitis by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. Urinary MIF concentration was determined using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay method. The urine MIF/creatinine (Cr) ratio was significantly higher in pyelonephritis patients than in those with acute cystitis and the control group (P < 0.001). The optimal cut-point of 4.90 pg/micromol Cr for the urine MIF/Cr ratio has the potential to be a biomarker for distinguishing patients with acute pyelonephritis from those with acute cystitis. Determination of the urinary MIF was also useful in selecting the patients at risk of permanent renal damage. Of those patients with pyelonephritis, based on the DMSA scan at the time of infection, scarring on follow-up DMSA scan 9-12 months later occurred in patients with the highest urinary MIF/Cr ratios. We conclude that the urine MIF/Cr ratio is a sensitive test for differentiating acute pyelonephritis from acute cystitis and also for detecting children with acute pyelonephritis who are at a higher risk for permanent renal scars in the future.Predictive value of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux in children.We aimed to determine the predictability of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children with urinary tract infection (UTI). Data of children with febrile UTI who underwent voiding cystoureterography between 2002 and 2005 were evaluated retrospectively for clinical (age, gender, fever > or = 38.5 degrees C, recurrent UTI), laboratory [leukocytosis, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), pyuria, serum creatinine (S(Cr))] and imaging (renal ultrasonography) variables. Children with VUR (group 1) vs. no VUR (group 2) and children with high-grade (III-V) VUR (group 3) vs. no or low-grade (I-II) VUR (group 4) were compared. Among 88 patients (24 male), 38 had VUR and 21 high-grade VUR. Fever > or = 38.5 degrees C was associated with VUR [odds ratio (OR): 7.5]. CRP level of 50 mg/l was the best cut-off level for predicting high-grade VUR (OR 15.5; discriminative ability 0.89 +/- 0.05). Performing voiding cystourethrography based on this CRP level would result in failure to notice 9% of patients with high-grade VUR, whereas 69% of children with no/low-grade VUR would be spared from this invasive test. In conclusion, fever > or = 38 degrees C and CRP > 50 mg/l seem to be potentially useful clinical predictors of VUR and high-grade VUR, respectively, in pediatric patients with UTI. Further validation of these findings could limit unnecessary voiding cystourethrography.Blood group non-secretors have an increased inflammatory response to urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to assess the possible relationship between secretor state and the inflammatory response to urinary tract infection (UTI). Girls with recurrent UTI were prospectively studied. They included 61 secretor and 23 non-secretor individuals with 604 episodes of recurrent UTI. The response to each UTI episode was measured as the levels of C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and the body temperature as well as renal concentrating capacity and pyuria. The levels of C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and the body temperature were significantly higher in non-secretors than in secretors (p less than 0.04). As a consequence, non-secretors had an increased probability of being assigned a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis rather than asymptomatic bacteriuria (p less than 0.05). The higher inflammatory response in non-secretors was independent of the Gal alpha 1-4Gal beta adhesin expression of the infecting Escherichia coli strains. The increased inflammatory response to UTI in non-secretors might explain the accumulation of these individuals among patients with renal scarring.Urinary interleukin-8 in acute pyelonephritis of children: a before-after study.The aim of this study was to assess urinary interleukin-8 (IL-8) levels in pyelonephritis and its relation with the clinical course of the infection and of inflammatory changes detected by renal scintigraphy.In this quasi-experimental before-after study, we evaluated 91 children aged 1 to 144 months (mean 34.4 +/- 35.2 months) with pyelonephritis. Inflammatory markers including erythrocyte sedimentation rate, C-reactive protein, leukocyte count, and urinary IL-8, together with the results of ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrography, and dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy were evaluated in these children. The ratios of urinary IL-8 to creatinine (IL-8/C) before and after the treatment were compared with each other.Urinary IL-8/C levels were significantly higher after the empirical treatment in comparison with those before the treatment (0.19 +/- 0.21 versus 0.51 +/- 0.53, P < .001). No correlation was found between the urinary IL-8 levels and leukocyturia, urine culture results, other inflammatory markers, or findings of imaging examinations.We found high urinary IL-8 levels in children with pyelonephritis. We also documented its increasing after the treatment. We conclude that evaluation of urinary IL-8 can be a noninvasive test for diagnosis of upper urinary tract infection and its response to treatment.The role of serum and urine interleukin-8 on acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring in children.Interleukin (IL)-8 acts as a potent neutrophils chemoattractant responsible for the migration of neutrophils into the infected renal tissue to protect against invading pathogens. The aim of this study was to assess the role of IL-8 on acute-phase pyelonephritis and later renal scarring in children.A total of 124 children with a first-time febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) were studied. The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis was confirmed by Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan. Serum and urine samples were obtained from 124 children with UTI and 20 healthy children for IL-8 measurement.The 124 children were divided into acute pyelonephritis (n = 70) and lower UTI (n = 54) groups according to the results of DMSA scans. The initial serum and urine IL-8 values of children with acute pyelonephritis were significantly higher when compared with lower UTI and healthy controls (all P < 0.001). Renal scarring was seen in 26 (38.8%) of these 67 children with acute pyelonephritis at follow-up DMSA scans. Both the initial serum and urine IL-8 concentrations were significantly higher in children with renal scarring than in those without (both P < 0.001). The mean age of children with renal scarring was also significantly lower than those without scarring (P = 0.004). Multivariate analysis showed that the highest initial IL-8 values, age <20 months and reflux grades > or =III all were independent predictors of renal scarring.Those children younger than 2 years of age with the highest IL-8 concentrations during the acute phase of pyelonephritis as well as children with reflux grades of III or greater are at a high-risk for developing renal scarring in the future.Does early treatment of urinary tract infection prevent renal damage?Therapeutic delay has been suggested as the most important factor that is likely to have an effect on the development of scarring after acute pyelonephritis. However, this opinion has not been supported by prospective studies, so we tested it.In a prospective clinical study, we evaluated whether the time interval between the onset of the renal infection and the start of therapy correlates with the development of acute inflammatory changes and the subsequent development of renal scars, documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy. A total of 278 infants (153 male and 125 female) aged 0.5 to 12.0 months with their first urinary tract infection were enrolled in the study.The median time between the onset of infection and the institution of therapy was 2 days (range: 1-8 days). Renal inflammatory changes were documented in 57% of the infants. Renal defects were recorded in 41% of the patients treated within the first 24 hours since the onset of fever versus 75% of those treated on day 4 and onward. Renal scarring was developed in 51% of the infants with an abnormal scan in the acute phase of infection. The frequency of scarring in infants treated early and in those whose treatment was delayed did not differ, suggesting that once acute pyelonephritis has occurred, ultimate renal scarring is independent of the timing of therapy. Acute inflammatory changes and subsequent scarring were more frequent in the presence of vesicoureteral reflux, especially that which is high grade. However, the difference was not significant, which suggests that renal damage may be independent of the presence of reflux.Early and appropriate treatment of urinary tract infection, especially during the first 24 hours after the onset of symptoms, diminishes the likelihood of renal involvement during the acute phase of the infection but does not prevent scar formation.Alterations of peripheral leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and C-reactive protein in febrile urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to assess the usefulness of peripheral leukocyte count, differential leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and C-reactive protein (CRP) level in febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) for defining the UTI level.A total of 61 children aged between 1 and 10 years with documented febrile UTI (axillary temperature > or = 38 degrees C) were studied. They had a urine culture positive for infection. Laboratory investigations including peripheral total and differential leukocyte counts, ESR, and CRP were assessed in relation to the inflammatory responses. Leukocyte count results were available in all of the patients, ESR in 41, and CRP in 36.Leukocyte count was normal in 6 patients (9.8%). Lymphocytic leukocytosis was seen in 1 patients (1.6%), neutrophilic leukocytosis in 25 (41.0%), and relative neutrophilia in 29 (47.5%). Thirty patients (73.2%) had a high ESR and 23 (63.9%) had a positive CRP. In children with a high ESR, 12 (29.3%) had neutrophilic leukocytosis and 14 (34.1%) had relative neutrophilia. Relative neutrophilia and neutrophilic leukocytosis with positive CRP both were found in 11 patients (30.6%). Negative CRP with absence of neutrophilic leukocytosis was found in a significantly higher proportion of patients. There were no direct correlations between the severity of systemic inflammatory responses and urinary tract inflammatory response.Findings of this study showed that ESR and differential leukocyte count are two valuable tests in febrile UTI and may be useful for localization of UTI level, but the total leukocyte count and CRP level as in qualitative methods are not useful, and many patients with febrile UTI do not have leukocytosis.Risk factors in the development of early technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy lesions during first urinary tract infection in children.To establish the variables that correlate with uptake defects in dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI).A prospective observational study was conducted in a cohort of 158 consecutive children with a first episode of symptomatic UTI. The therapeutic delay time (TDT) was recorded. DMSA scintigraphy was performed in all children and voiding cystourethrography in 150 of them.85% of the patients were younger than 2 y. Mean TDT was 33.5 h. The aetiological agent was Escherichia coli in 140 children. DMSA scintigraphy was normal in 81. Vesicoureteric reflux was detected in 33. After a multivariate logistic regression analysis the following variables were retained in the final model: TDT > or = 48 h, growth of bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and C-reactive protein > or = 30 mg l(-1).TDT > or = 48 h, bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and CRP > or = 30 mg l(-1) influence the findings detected in the DMSA scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of UTI.Urinary macrophage migration inhibitory factor in children with urinary tract infection.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) plays an essential pathophysiological role in inflammatory reactions. The aim of this study was to investigate the clinical utility of urine MIF (uMIF) level in predicting urinary tract infections (UTI). This multicenter, prospective study was conducted over a 1-year period between March 2008 and March 2009. Sixty patients with symptomatic culture-proven UTI and 29 healthy children were recruited. Urine MIF was measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The mean MIF level was found to be significantly higher in the UTI group than in the control group (1082.82 vs. 211.45 pg/ml, p = 0.0001). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis revealed that the optimal cut-off uMIF level was 295 pg/ml for uMIF to predict UTI. The sensitivity and specificity of this cut-off level were 91.7% and 69%, respectively. Mean uMIF/creatinine (Cr) was also significantly higher in the UTI group than in the control group (2400.69 vs. 267.56 pg/mgCr, p = 0.0001). At a cut-off of 815 pg/mgCr for uMIF/Cr, the sensitivity and specificity were 95 and 79%, respectively. The area under curve (AUC) was 0.848 (standard error 0.040, 95% confidence interval 0.756-0.915) for uMIF and 0.889 (0.034, 0.805-0.946) for uMIF/Cr. Urine MIF/Cr was significantly higher in the patients with a positive leukocyte esterase reaction in the urine (p = 0.047), leukocytosis (p = 0.0001) and positive C-reactive protein level in serum (p = 0.003). The uMIF level was not related to leukocytosis, positive CRP level in serum and leukocyte esterase reaction in the urine. Neither uMIF nor uMIF/Cr were correlated to the positive urine nitrite test, pyuria, urine pH and specific gravity (p > 0.05). These results suggest that urine MIF and uMIF/Cr can be used for the early prediction of UTI in children.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infection.Ninety-four children with febrile urinary tract infection were studied prospectively to determine the relationship between vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis, and to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of commonly used clinical and laboratory observations. By using renal scan with dimercaptosuccinic acid labeled with technetium 99m as the standard of reference, we documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with pyelonephritis. Of the 70 E. coli urinary isolates, 48 (69%) were P-fimbriated, including 30 (64%) of 47 isolates from patients with pyelonephritis and 18 (78%) of 23 isolates from patients with normal renal scans. The prevalence of P-fimbriated E. coli in patients with pyelonephritis and vesicoureteral reflux was 46%, compared with 71% in those with pyelonephritis who had no concurrent vesicoureteral reflux (p = 0.222). Multiple clinical and laboratory variables commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis did not adequately predict the presence or absence of parenchymal involvement. These data show the following: (1) Acute pyelonephritis in the absence of demonstrable vesicoureteral reflux is common. (2) Febrile urinary tract infections in children are commonly associated with P-fimbriated E. coli, both in the presence and absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (3) The presence of P fimbriae alone does not fully explain the pathophysiology of renal parenchymal invasion by bacteria in the absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (4) The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infections on the basis of clinical and laboratory observations is unreliable.Renal scarring after acute pyelonephritis.Seventy six children, 18 boys and 58 girls, aged 0-15.9 (median 1.0) years, with acute pyelonephritis were prospectively studied with a technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan during infection and two months later. Fifty nine of these children were also studied two years after the infection. Seventeen children with a normal DMSA scan during infection or at two months after infection, or both, were not investigated by a DMSA scan at two years after acute pyelonephritis. A micturition cystourethrogram was performed in all the children after two months. Changes on the DMSA scan were found in 65 (86%) children during acute pyelonephritis, in 45 (59%) children at two months, and in 28 (37%) children at two years after infection. Vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) was found in 19 (25%) children at two months. Renal scarring was significantly correlated with the presence of gross VUR and recurrent pyelonephritis, but 62% of the scarred kidneys were drained by non-refluxing ureters. Children with scars were older at the time of acute pyelonephritis than those without scars but no difference was found between the groups with regard to duration of illness, levels of C reactive protein and maximum white cell count, glomerular filtration rate, nor renal concentration capacity at the time of infection. It is concluded that renal scarring after acute pyelonephritis in children is more common than has been previously thought. Although children with gross VUR and recurrent pyelonephritis are at the greatest risk, renal scarring is more often seen without these risk factors.[Value of the C reactive protein, urinary lactic dehydrogenase and renal capacity of concentration in the topographic diagnosis of the urinary infection in infancy (author's transl)].In 39 children with urinary infection renal capacity of concentration, serum C-reactive protein and presence of urinary lactic dehydrogenase are studied pointing to the establishment of the topography of the damage. C-reactive protein levels higher than 20 micrograms/ml are 100 per 100 reliable in the diagnosis of pyelonephritis. Moreover, value of this test is confirmed as a guide of therapeutic efficacity. Difficulty of concentrating urine above 800 mOsm/l is 70 per 100 reliable and is a useful method for demonstrating parenchymal damage. The urinary lactic dehydrogenase was superior to 20 units/l in 64 per 100 of the cases, but other studies are necessary for interpretation of these data. These findings are similar to those obtained in the study of the isoenzymes.Correlation of renal ultrasonographic findings with inflammatory volume from dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans in children with acute pyelonephritis.We correlated abnormal findings on renal ultrasonography (US) and inflammatory volume (Volume) on technetium dimercaptosuccinic acid renal single photon emission computerized tomography (DMSA) in children with acute pyelonephritis (APN) with renal scars.A total of 31 males and 14 females (9 days to 9.8 years old) who fulfilled diagnostic criteria for APN and who underwent initial DMSA between January 1995 and July 2002 and followup DMSA at least 6 months later were enrolled in the study. APN was diagnosed by initial DMSA, and placement in the scar or scar-free group was determined by followup DMSA. Photopenic areas on initial DMSA were calculated as Volume, and were compared to US findings.Ultrasound demonstrated 35 abnormal kidneys (38.9%) among these children with APN. Significant differences in age, Volume (11.19 +/- 2.52 ml vs 3.02 +/- 0.75 ml, p <0.005), C-reactive protein (CRP) and photopenic lesion on initial DMSA were found between children with abnormal and normal US. Of 65 children with initial APN foci 33 (50.8%) recovered, and the others had development of scars. The sensitivity of US for detecting APN (identified by DMSA scan) was 49.2%, and the specificity was 88% (OR 7.1, 95% CI 2.18 to 24.41). The sensitivity of US for predicting renal scarring was 59.4%, and the specificity was 60.6% (OR 2.3, 95% CI 0.82 to 7.65). Patients with abnormal US findings and high serum CRP (greater than 70 mg/l) had a large Volume (10.96 +/- 3.05 ml) and a 76.2% chance of being in the scar group.US findings are significantly correlated to Volume in APN. Along with a high level of CRP, US is helpful in predicting development of renal scarring.Renal cortical scintigraphy in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.Comparative clinical studies have shown renal cortical scintigraphy, using technetium-99m (99mTc)-labeled glucoheptonate or dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA), to be significantly more sensitive than either intravenous pyelography or renal sonography in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis. However, due to uncertainties about the diagnostic accuracy of the clinical and laboratory parameters used in these studies, true sensitivity of renal cortical scintigraphy was unknown. Therefore, we evaluated the accuracy of [99mTc]DMSA scintigraphy in the diagnosis of experimentally induced acute pyelonephritis in piglets using strict histopathologic criteria as the standard of reference. The sensitivity and specificity of the DMSA scan for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis were 91% and 99%, respectively, with an overall 97% agreement between the scintigraphic and histopathologic findings. Based on the results of this experimental study, we used the [99mTc]DMSA scan as the standard of reference for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis, and conducted a prospective clinical study of 94 children hospitalized with the diagnosis of acute febrile urinary tract infection (UTI). The aims of this study were (1) to determine the relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, acute pyelonephritis, and renal scarring, and (2) to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of the clinical and laboratory parameters commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis. We documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with acute pyelonephritis. The prevalence of P-fimbriae in the E coli isolates was 64% in the patients with acute pyelonephritis and 78% in those with a normal DMSA scan. Even in patients without reflux, P-fimbriae were found in 71% of isolates from the patients with acute pyelonephritis and in 75% of those with a normal renal scan. Follow-up DMSA scans were obtained in 33 patients with acute pyelonephritis in 38 kidneys. We found complete resolution of the acute inflammatory changes in 58% of the involved kidneys and renal scarring in the remaining 42%, including 40% of the kidneys associated with reflux and 43% of those without reflux.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)Proinflammatory cytokines and procalcitonin in children with acute pyelonephritis.This prospective study, performed in 76 children with a urinary tract infection (UTI), evaluates the diagnostic value of procalcitonin (PCT) and proinflammatory cytokines (IL-1beta, IL-6 and TNF-alpha) in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA). Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m )Tc-DMSA scintigraphy within 7 days of admission. The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis was confirmed only in patients with reversible lesions on scintigraphy. According to DMSA scan results, patients were divided into two groups, lower UTI or acute pyelonephritis. In acute pyelonephritis, serum PCT level was found to be significantly higher than it is in the lower UTI (p <0.001). Also, significantly higher serum proinflammatory cytokines (IL-1beta, IL-6 and TNF-alpha) levels were detected in those with acute pyelonephritis than those with lower UTI (p <0.001). We conclude that both serum PCT and proinflammatory cytokine levels may be used as accurate markers for diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.[First urinary tract infection in healthy infants: epidemiology, diagnosis and treatment].Urinary tract infection (UTI) is one of the most common infections in infants. It presents certain peculiarities compared with other pediatric age groups in terms of symptomatology, diagnosis and the therapeutic approach employed to prevent sequels.To analyze the epidemiology, clinical and laboratory findings, etiology, diagnosis and treatment of first-time UTI in healthy infants.Between January and December 1999, we performed a retrospective study of 131 previously healthy infants admitted to our hospital with a diagnosis of first-time UTI. Demographic data, clinical characteristics, urine dipstick, urinalysis and urine culture (vesical catheterization), blood cell count and PCR, kidney ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrogram and DMSA scintigraphy were reviewed.We studied 131 patients (median age: 90 days). In infants younger than 30 days, UTI was more prevalent in males. The most frequent symptom was fever (73.3 %). Seventy-one patients fulfilled the criteria for acute pyelonephritis. The presence of nitrituria was low. Escherichia coli was isolated in 90.1 % of the patients. Voiding cystourethrogram detected vesicoureteric reflux in 18.4 % of the patients. Scintigraphy revealed renal scarring in 15.1 %. No significant correlations were found between renal scarring in late scintigraphy and a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and/or alterations in the cystourethrogram.Fever was the main symptom. E. coli was the most commonly isolated microorganism. Nitrituria had low sensitivity in infants. Ultrasonography had low specificity. Scintigraphy showed the highest sensitivity and specificity in the detection of renal scarring. Predictability improved when scintigraphy was performed a few months after acute infection.Association of P and other fimbriae with clinical pyelonephritis in children.196 episodes of urinary tract infection in children were analysed. 74 were classified as pyelonephritic (PN), 61 as cystitis (C), and 61 as asymptomatic bacteriuria (ABU) on the basis of three clinical signs (elevated temperature, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and/or white blood cell count). The frequency of P-fimbriae was found high in PN (77%), and significantly lower in C (23%), ABU (20%) and among fecal strains (16%). The common, type 1 fimbriae were also more frequent in PN (92%) than in the other groups (84-76%), whereas other, so-called X-fimbriae, were relatively rare in all the patient groups (15-6%). P-fimbriation was not significantly associated with the presence or absence of reflux or obstructive anomalies. By contrast, the frequency of P-fimbriation increased with increasing severity of the clinical symptoms of pyelonephritis (95% in episodes of elevated temperature, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and white blood cell count).[Laboratory parameters as a guide for the radiologic study of infections of the urinary tract in childhood].Forty-nine children with urinary tract infection aged between 15 days and 10 years were studied. Thirty-three of them (67.3%) had urinary tract malformations. We valued the following parameters: a) White Blood Cells; b) Leukocyte differential; c) ESR at the first hour; d) CRP; e) Concentration ability; f) Body temperature. We wanted to investigate the usefulness of these parameters to predict which patients should be studied by X-ray of urinary tract. Single parameters did not prove very sensitive; the highest correlations were found with ESR and CRP, which were positive in 76% of the cases of malformations. Furthermore we valued the sensitivity and specificity of the tests grouped together: the highest values of sensitivity (97%) and specificity (31%) were obtained coupling the ESR and concentration ability.Procalcitonin as a marker of acute pyelonephritis in infants and children.In the absence of specific symptomatology in children, the early diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis is a challenge, particularly during infancy. In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin (PCT) levels and compared these with other commonly used inflammatory markers. We evaluated the ability of serum PCT levels to predict renal involvement, as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. Serum C-reactive protein (CRP), leukocyte counts, and PCT levels were measured in 64 children admitted for suspected UTI. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m)Tc-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 7 days after admission. In acute pyelonephritis, the median PCT level was significantly higher than in the lower UTI group (3.41, range 0.36-12.4 microg/l vs. 0.13, range 0.02-2.15 microg/l, P<0.0001). In these two groups, respectively, median CRP levels were 120 (range 62-249 mg/l) and 74.5 (range 14.5-235 mg/l, P=0.012) and leukocyte counts were 15,910/mm(3) (range 10,200-26,900) and 14,600/mm(3) (range 8,190-26,470, P=0.34). For the prediction of acute pyelonephritis, the sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 94.1% and 89.7%, respectively; CRP had a sensitivity of 100%, but a specificity of 18.5%. We conclude that serum PCT may be an accurate marker for early diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.Imaging strategy for infants with urinary tract infection: a new algorithm.We analyzed clinical data for prediction of permanent renal damage in infants with first time urinary tract infection.This population based, prospective, 3-year study included 161 male and 129 female consecutive infants with first time urinary tract infection. Ultrasonography and dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy were performed as acute investigations and voiding cystourethrography within 2 months. Late scintigraphy was performed after 1 year in infants with abnormality on the first dimercapto-succinic acid scan or recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. End point was renal damage on the late scan.A total of 270 patients had end point data available, of whom 70 had renal damage and 200 did not. Final kidney status was associated with C-reactive protein, serum creatinine, temperature, leukocyturia, non-Escherichia coli bacteria, anteroposterior diameter on ultrasound and recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. In stepwise multiple regression analysis C-reactive protein, creatinine, leukocyturia, anteroposterior diameter and non-E.coli bacteria were independent predictors of permanent renal damage. C-reactive protein 70 mg/l or greater combined with anteroposterior diameter 10 mm or greater had sensitivity of 87% and specificity of 59% for renal damage. An algorithm for imaging of infants with first time urinary tract infection based on these results would have eliminated 126 acute dimercapto-succinic acid scans compared to our study protocol, while missing 9 patients with permanent renal damage.C-reactive protein can be used as a predictor of permanent renal damage in infants with urinary tract infection and together with anteroposterior diameter serves as a basis for an imaging algorithm.Diagnostic role of initial renal cortical scintigraphy in children with the first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Assessment of the first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) in children has been the subject of debate for many years. Diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) is usually based on clinical and biological data. The clinical usefulness of early Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy remains controversial, although it may influence the type and duration of treatment. The aim of this study was to assess the role of initial cortical scintigraphy in the detection of early renal parenchymal damage in children highly suspected of having APN and to compare the scintigraphic findings with selected clinical/laboratory parameters and ultrasonography.A prospective study was conducted in 34 infants and young children (18 boys, 16 girls), aged 1.5-36 months (mean 9.8 ± 8.7 months), hospitalized with a first episode of clinically suspected APN. Within the first 5 days after admission, Tc-99m DMSA renal scintigraphy, ultrasonography (US), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), white blood cell count (WBC) and urine analyses were performed.DMSA scintigraphy showed changes consistent with APN in 27/34 (79%) patients, with a mean age of 10.9 months, including 12 males (44%) and 15 (56%) females. Out of 9 febrile children with negative urine culture and supportive evidence of UTI, scintigraphy showed parenchymal involvement in 8 children (24% in the whole group, 30% in scintigraphically documented APN). There were no statistically significant correlations between the frequency or size of the initial scintigraphic abnormalities and age, sex, body temperature, CRP levels or ESR. A CRP level of >54 mg/L and a WBC of >13,300/mm³ had sensitivities of 56 and 59% and specificities of 86 and 71%, respectively. US showed changes consistent with APN in 7/34 (21%) in the whole group and in 7/27 (26%) patients with positive cortical scan (p < 0.05).Initial DMSA renal scintigraphy is a sensitive method for the early diagnosis of APN in young children and is useful in the assessment of the severity of kidney injury even in patients with negative urine culture. Clinical, biological and ultrasound parameters do not identify children with renal damage. Normal DMSA study, excluding parenchymal involvement and late sequelae, could minimize the use of scintigraphy in the follow-up and reduce the redundancy of cystography.Urinary tract infection in febrile infants younger than eight weeks of Age.To assess the usefulness of laboratory parameters, including peripheral white blood cell (WBC) count, C-reactive protein (CRP) concentration, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and microscopic urinalysis (UA), for identifying febrile infants younger than 8 weeks of age at risk for urinary tract infection (UTI), and comparison of standard UA and hemocytometer WBC counts for predicting the presence of UTI.A total of 162 febrile children <8 weeks of age were enrolled in this prospective study. All underwent clinical evaluation and laboratory investigation, including WBC count and differential; ESR; CRP; blood culture; a lumbar puncture for cell count and differential, glucose level, protein level, Gram stain, and culture; and a UA and urine culture. All urine specimens were obtained by suprapubic aspiration and microscopically analyzed with standard UA as well as with hemocytometer WBC counts. Quantitative urine cultures were performed. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were determined for each of the screening tests.There were 22 positive urine culture results of at least 100 colony-forming unit/mL. Eighteen of these 22 patients were males, and all were uncircumcised. There were significant differences for pyuria >/=5 WBCs/hpf, pyuria >/=10 WBC/microL, CRP >20 mg/L, and ESR >30 mm/hour between culture-positive and culture-negative groups (P <.05). The ROC area for hemocytometer WBC count, standard UA, peripheral WBC count, ESR, and CRP concentration were.909 +/-.045,.791 +/-.065,.544 +/-.074,. 787 +/-.060, and.822 +/-.036, respectively. The ROC curve analysis indicates that the CRP, ESR, and standard UA were powerful but imperfect tools with which to discriminate for UTI in potentially infected neonates. Hemocytometer WBC counts had the highest sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and likelihood ratios for identifying very young infants with positive urine culture results. For all assessments, hemocytometer WBC counts were significantly different, compared with the standard urinalysis. ESR, CRP, and peripheral WBC counts were not helpful in identifying UTI in febrile infants.UTI had a prevalence of 13.6% in febrile infants <8 weeks of age. The CRP, ESR, and standard UA were imperfect tools in discriminating for UTI, and the sensitivity of these laboratory parameters was relatively low. Hemocytometer WBC count was a significantly better predictor of UTI in febrile infants.Polymorphonuclear elastase as a diagnostic marker of acute pyelonephritis in children.Experimental evidence suggests that neutrophils and their metabolites play an important role in the pathogenesis of pyelonephritis. The aim of this study was to investigate the diagnostic value of polymorphonuclear elastase-a(1)-antitrypsin complex (E-a(1)-Pi) for the detection of acute pyelonephritis in children.Eighty-three patients, 29 boys and 54 girls, 25 days to 14 years of age, with first-time symptomatic urinary tract infection were prospectively studied. Fifty-seven healthy children served as controls. Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and voiding cystourethrography were performed in all patients. Plasma and urinary E-a(1)-Pi, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), neutrophil count, urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase (NAG), N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase b (NAG b), and creatinine levels were measured in all patients on admission and 3 days after the introduction of antibiotics. The same markers were also measured in the control subjects.Planar DMSA scintigraphy demonstrated changes of acute pyelonephritis in 30 of 83 children (group A). It was normal in the remaining 53 children (group B). The sex and age distributions were not significantly different between the 2 groups, as well as between the patients and the control subjects (group C). Nineteen of the 53 children with a normal DMSA had body temperature >/=38 degrees C, whereas all but 4 children with abnormal DMSA had temperature >/=38 degrees C. Therefore, the temperature was significantly different between these 2 groups. The sensitivity and specificity of fever (>/=38 degrees C) as an indicator of renal involvement based on isotopic findings were 86% and 64%, respectively. Given the significant number of the febrile children with normal DMSA scintiscans, group B was subdivided into B(1) with 19 febrile children (14 boys and 5 girls) and B(2) with 34 children whose body temperature was below 38 degrees C (8 boys and 26 girls). The sex and age distribution was significantly different between groups B(1) and B(2). The mean age of group B(1) was.78 years (range: 28 days to 9 years; median:.25 years; standard deviation: 2.1). All but 1 child in this group were younger than 1 year of age. In contrast, in group B(2), there were only 4 infants, the remaining 30 children were older than 2.5 years (mean age: 6 years; median: 7 years; standard deviation: 3.5; range: 34 days to 12 years). The mean duration of fever before hospital admission was 2.8 days for group A and 1.8 days for group B(1). This difference was not statistically significant. Similarly, body temperature was not significantly different between these 2 groups. The distribution of plasma E-a(1)-Pi values was normal in the control subjects. The sensitivity and specificity of plasma E-a(1)-Pi, as an indicator of renal involvement, were 96% and 50%, respectively, taking the 95th percentile of the reference range as a cutoff value. However, considering as a cutoff value the level of 72 microg/dL (95th percentile of group B(2)), its sensitivity and specificity were 74% and 86%, respectively. Plasma E-a(1)-Pi levels were significantly elevated in group A compared with group B and in both groups, the plasma E-a(1)-Pi values were significantly higher than in the control subjects. A significant difference also was noticed between group A and each of the subgroups B(1) and B(2) and also between the subgroups themselves. Plasma E-a(1)-Pi concentrations correlated significantly with neutrophil count in groups A (r =.3), B (r =.4), and B(2) (r =.46), but the correlation was not significant in group B(1.) ESR levels showed, among the different groups, similar differences with those of E-a(1)-Pi values. Unlike E-a(1)-Pi, CRP levels were comparable between groups A and B(1), which both consisted of febrile children. Neutrophil count was not significantly different between subgroups B(1) and B(2). (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED)Procalcitonin as a predictor of renal scarring in infants and young children.The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of procalcitonin (PCT) as a marker of renal scars in infants and young children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis. Children aged 7 days to 36 months admitted for first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) to a pediatric emergency department were prospectively enrolled. The PCT concentration was determined at admission. Acute (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy was performed within 7 days of admission and repeated 12 months later when abnormal findings were obtained on the first scan. Of the 72 children enrolled in the study, 52 showed signs of acute pyelonephritis (APN) on the first DMSA scan. A follow-up scintigraphy at the 12-month follow-up performed on 41 patients revealed that 14 (34%) patients had developed renal scars; these patients also presented significantly higher PCT values than those without permanent renal lesions [2.3 (interquartile range 1-11.6) vs. 0.5 (0.2-1.4) ng/mL; p = 0.007]. A comparison of the PCT concentration in patients with febrile UTI without renal involvement, with APN without scar development and with APN with subsequent renal scarring revealed a significant increasing trend (p = 0.006, Kruskal-Wallis test). The area under the ROC curve for scar prediction was 0.74 (95% confidence interval 0.61-0.85), with an optimum statistical cut-off value of 1 ng/mL (sensitivity 78.6%; specificity 63.8%). Based on these results, we suggest that serum PCT concentration at admission is a useful predictive tool of renal scarring in infants and young children with acute pyelonephritis.Acute phase 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in infants with first episode of febrile urinary tract infection.99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan is the golden standard for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and renal scaring. We investigated the use of acute phase DMSA scan in infants presented promptly to the hospital because of the first episode of their febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Ninety-eight infants with microbiologically confirmed first episode of febrile UTI were studied. DMSA scans were carried out within 7 days in these infants after admission. Infants with an abnormal acute DMSA scan underwent a second DMSA scan 6-12 months later.Overall, acute DMSA scan was abnormal in 16 (16.3%) of the 98 patients. There were no differences in sex, age, fever over 38.5°C, blood inflammation indices, or evidence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) between patients with normal and abnormal acute DMSA scan (P>0.05). However, infants with grade III to V VUR as well as those with delayed treatment presented significantly increased renal involvement by acute DMSA scan (P<0.05). The sensitivity and specificity of abnormal acute DMSA scan to predict grade III to V VUR were 50% and 88% respectively. Its positive and negative likelihood ratios were 4.16 and 0.57, respectively. Of 16 children with abnormal initial DMSA scan results, 14 underwent a second DMSA scan. Follow-up DMSA scans were normal in 12 of the 14 children.Parenchymal damage found in a minority of infants with febrile UTI presented promptly to the hospital. Acute phase DMSA scan should be carried out only in selected patients. An abnormal acute DMSA scan is a moderate predictor for dilated VUR and its ability to exclude VUR is restricted.Evaluation of DMSA scintigraphy and urography in assessing both acute and permanent renal damage in children.To evaluate dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy and urography in the detection of renal involvement in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) in order to identify patients with a high risk of developing renal damage.A total of 157 children (median age 0.4 years, range 5 days to 5.8 years) with first-time symptomatic UTI were examined scintigraphy (with an assessment of renal area involvement) and urography at the time of UTI and 1 year later. All evaluations were made blindly.Of the total 314 kidneys, 80 (25%) were abnormal at initial scintigraphy. Of these 80 kidneys, 44 (55%) had normalized at follow-up. Of the 234 initially normal kidneys, 29 (12%) were abnormal at follow-up. One year after UTI, abnormalities were seen in 59 children at scintigraphy and in 18 children at urography. Renal area involvement was larger and split function abnormalities more common in kidneys that were abnormal at both scintigraphy and urography than in kidneys with only scintigraphic abnormalities.Quantitation of renal area involvement and split renal function at early scintigraphy would seem to be useful in identifying patients at risk of developing renal damage. Urography at 1 year after infection identified mainly those with the most severe scintigraphic abnormalities. The clinical importance of scintigraphic abnormalities that are not confirmed by urography is not known.Functional parameters and 99mtechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in acute pyelonephritis.The diagnostic value of 99mtechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy, ultrasonography and renal functional parameters [urine N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase (NAG)/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients] in acute pyelonephritis (APN) were studied in 39 children (28 girls, 11 boys, median age 9 months, range 2 weeks to 9.4 years, 28 patients < 1 year, 11 patients > 1 year) with first-time urinary tract infection. Ultrasonography of the urinary tract was performed on admission and together with DMSA scintigraphy (< 10 days from admission). Urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were measured daily and after 6-8 weeks. Ultrasonography revealed abnormalities in 12 of 39 (31%) patients [11/32 patients (34%) with positive DMSA scintigraphy], while DMSA uptake defects were present in 32 of 39 (82%) patients [21/28 < 1 year (75%), 11/11 > 1 year (100%), P = 0.08]. Urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were significantly higher in children < 1 year with APN, as well as in non-renal fever controls, than in older children. However, in both age groups the urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were significantly higher in APN than in non-renal fever. The urine NAG and albumin excretion decreased rapidly after the initiation of antimicrobial therapy and had normalized at 6-8 weeks. The size and grade of the DMSA uptake defect (DMSA score) did not correlate with duration of disease at admission, maximum C-reactive protein or maximum fever. The urine NAG/creatinine quotient in the children < 1 year showed, however, a significant correlation with the DMSA score (r = 0.58, P < 0.05), while no correlation was found in the older children. We conclude that DMSA scintigraphy is a sensitive method to confirm the clinical diagnosis of APN, although a substantial number of infants appear to have normal scans. Early determination of the urine NAG/creatinine and albumin/ creatinine quotients may further improve the diagnostics in the infant.Five-year study of medical or surgical treatment in children with severe vesico-ureteral reflux dimercaptosuccinic acid findings. International Reflux Study Group in Europe.The results of serial dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) imaging over 5 years are reported in 287 children with severe vesico-ureteral reflux entered into the European Branch of the International Reflux Study in Children. The children were randomly allocated to medical (n=147) or surgical (n=140) management and DMSA studies were performed during the follow up period at least 6 months after any urinary tract infection. Abnormal images were classified into four types: (1) large polar hypodensity with normal renal outline; (2) peripheral photon deficient defect(s) in a non-deformed kidney; (3) small renal image with normal contour; and (4) peripheral defect(s) with resultant irregularity of the renal outline. The DMSA findings were abnormal at entry in 235 (82%) with no difference in incidence or severity between the two treatment groups. During follow up, deterioration was observed in 25 medically and 23 surgically treated patients and comprised image deterioration alone in 17, image deterioration with corresponding reduction in differential function in 16 and reduction in relative function without image change in 15, with similar distribution between the two treatment groups. Deterioration was more frequent in children entering the study under the age of 2 years and in those with grade IV rather than grade III reflux. These findings, showing no difference in outcome between children managed surgically or medically, are consistent with the radiological results already published.In the International Reflux Study the DMSA scintigraphic data showed no difference in outcome between children managed surgically or medically.Is procalcitonin a good marker of renal lesion in febrile urinary tract infection?Procalcitonin and pyelonephritis in children.In the past few years, procalcitonin has been proposed as a sensitive and specific inflammatory marker in various fields of medicine, especially in infectivology, where it has been used to discriminate between bacterial infections, viral infections and inflammation processes. Recently, different studies have emerged in the literature on the use of this marker to identify renal involvement in febrile urinary tract infections.Procalcitonin seems to be a valid biological marker, with an acceptable sensitivity and specificity, which predicts a renal involvement of the infection (pyelonephritis), in comparison with the low specificity of C-reactive protein. Procalcitonin also seems to be correlated with the degree of the involvement at the moment of diagnosis of febrile urinary tract infections and with scarring.Renal involvement has always been the main diagnostic objective in children with febrile urinary tract infections. If more studies confirm the correlation between procalcitonin, renal involvement during urinary infections and scar formation, we will finally have a noninvasive tool that can identify children at risk of complications and in need of a close follow-up as early as their first episode of febrile urinary tract infection.[Tc 99M DMSA scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis: correlation with laboratory tests, echography and the presence of vesico-ureteral reflux].Tc99m DMSA (dimercaptosuccinic acid) scintigraphy has a high sensitivity for the detection of cortical kidney damage.To evaluate the Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis and its association with laboratory parameters, kidney ultrasound and vesicoureteral reflux.We studied 143 children (age range 8 days, 12 years, 66% female) hospitalized with the clinical diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (first episode) with a positive urine culture and a renal scintigraphy performed within seven days of diagnosis. DMSA was considered the gold standard for the detection of cortical lesions. Its results were related to the presence of fever, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (VHS), white blood count (WBC), ultrasound examination and vesicoureteral reflux.Seventy nine percent of the population had an abnormal DMSA scan. There were no differences between sex, age and laboratory parameters in children with normal or abnormal DMSA scans, except for CRP (p <0.005). Ultrasound was coincident with the scan in 32% of patients. Eighteen percent had vesicoureteral reflux.There is a high proportion of abnormal DMSA scans in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Antibiotic treatment for pyelonephritis in children: multicentre randomised controlled non-inferiority trial.To compare the efficacy of oral antibiotic treatment alone with treatment started parenterally and completed orally in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Multicentre, randomised controlled, open labelled, parallel group, non-inferiority trial.28 paediatric units in north east Italy.502 children aged 1 month to <7 years with clinical pyelonephritis.Oral co-amoxiclav (50 mg/kg/day in three doses for 10 days) or parenteral ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg/day in a single parenteral dose) for three days, followed by oral co-amoxiclav (50 mg/kg/day in three divided doses for seven days). Main outcomes measures Primary outcome was the rate of renal scarring. Secondary measures of efficacy were time to defervescence (<37 degrees C), reduction in inflammatory indices, and percentage with sterile urine after 72 hours. An exploratory subgroup analysis was conducted in the children in whom pyelonephritis was confirmed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy within 10 days after study entry.Intention to treat analysis showed no significant differences between oral (n=244) and parenteral (n=258) treatment, both in the primary outcome (scarring scintigraphy at 12 months 27/197 (13.7%) v 36/203 (17.7%), difference in risk -4%, 95% confidence interval -11.1% to 3.1%) and secondary outcomes (time to defervescence 36.9 hours (SD 19.7) v 34.3 hours (SD 20), mean difference 2.6 (-0.9 to 6.0); white cell count 9.8x10(9)/l (SD 3.5) v 9.5x10(9)/l (SD 3.1), mean difference 0.3 (-0.3 to 0.9); percentage with sterile urine 185/186 v 203/204, risk difference -0.05% (-1.5% to 1.4%)). Similar results were found in the subgroup of 278 children with confirmed acute pyelonephritis on scintigraphy at study entry.Treatment with oral antibiotics is as effective as parenteral then oral treatment in the management of the first episode of clinical pyelonephritis in children.Clinical Trials NCT00161330 [ClinicalTrials.gov].Involvement of the renal parenchyma in acute urinary tract infection: the contribution of 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid scan.We performed 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasonography in 146 children during the acute phase of a proven urinary tract infection (UTI). In 99 a micturating cysto-urethrography and in 83 an intravenous urography was also done. The occurrence of fever and increased WBC count, CRP and ESR were also studied. It appeared from this retrospective study that 47% of the kidneys had a cortical or patchy pattern of decreased uptake of 99mTc DMSA, as compared to 23% with abnormal findings on US. Vesico-ureteral reflux was present in 38% of the kidneys with parenchymal involvement on 99mTc DMSA scan. Although fever, leucocytosis and elevated CRP and ESR were significantly correlated with abnormal 99mTc DMSA scan, they were also observed in children without renal parenchymal involvement. Our results suggest that 99mTc DMSA scan is a sensitive method for the detection of parenchymal involvement during acute UTI. The exact nature of these lesions and their relation with scars need, however, to be defined.Urinary levels of interleukin-6 and interleukin-8 in children with urinary tract infections to age 2.The aim of this study was to assess relations between the clinical course of UTI, IL-6 and IL-8 levels, and the presence of inflammatory changes detected by renal scintigraphy using 99mTc-DMSA (DMSA).We studied 33 children aged 1-24 months (mean 7.1+/-5.8 months) with first-time UTI. The subjects were divided in two groups: with fever (group I, n=10) and without fever (group II, n=23). Inflammatory markers (ESR, CRP, leukocyte count), urinary IL-6 and IL-8 level, and DMSA scan were evaluated in all children.Urinary IL-6 and IL-8 levels [IL-6, IL-8/creatinine (pg/mg)] were significantly higher in group I than in group II (Il-6 level: 39.4+/-41.1 vs. 6.3+/-13.7, p<0.01; IL-8 level: 791.1+/-1143.6 vs. 36+/-87.9, p<0.001). We found positive correlation between urinary IL-6 and IL-8 levels and ESR, CRP, and leukocyte count (IL-6: r=0.43, p<0.05; r=0.46, p<0.05; and r=0.59, p<0.001, respectively; IL-8: r=0.55, p<0.05; r=0.72, p<0.0001; and r=0.44, p<0.05, respectively). We found no relation between urinary cytokine levels and the presence of inflammatory changes detected by DMSA scanning, despite slightly higher mean urinary cytokine levels in children with inflammatory changes in DMSA scan.We found significantly higher IL-6 and IL-8 levels in children with febrile UTI and elevated inflammatory markers. IL-6 and IL-8 levels do not differentiate between acute pyelonephritis and UTI in children to age 24 months.Usefulness of procalcitonin rapid test for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children in the emergency department.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common problem in children. The aim of this study was to determine the usefulness of the procalcitonin (PCT) rapid test in the diagnosis of renal involvement in children with urinary tract infection.Through a case series study, PCT and C-reactive protein rapid tests were measured in children with proven UTI at the Tehran Children's Medical Center, Iran. One-hundred patients aged 1 month-14 years old (19 boys and 81 girls) with documented UTI were enrolled in the study.Of 100 children, 62 patients (62%) had renal involvement on the basis of abnormal Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy and 38 patients (38%) had infection restricted to the lower urinary tract. There were no differences related to age or gender among the groups. The sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 77% and 89%, respectively, in prediction of renal involvement, whereas C-reactive protein had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 65%.We concluded that a rapid determination of PCT concentration could be useful for the management of children with febrile UTI in the emergency room.The efficacy of ultrasound and dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in predicting vesicoureteral reflux in children below the age of 2 years with their first febrile urinary tract infection.We evaluated the efficacy of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasound (US) in comparison with voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in predicting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children below the age of 2 years. Medical records and radiologic studies of children (<2 years) suffering their first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) between January 2001 and May 2007 were retrospectively reviewed. We evaluated the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of US and DMSA scans in diagnosing VUR. Among 220 children with their first febrile UTI, VUR was detected in 67 (30.4%). The detection rate of VUR by US was 41.7% and 86% in the low (I, II) and high grade (III~IV) groups, respectively. Detection rate of VUR by DMSA scan was 37.5% and 88.4% in the low and high grade groups, respectively. Combining US and DMSA scan, we found that the detection rate of high grade VUR was 95.3% and that of low grade was 62.5%. During follow up, most of the low grade VURs with normal DMSA and US scans resolved or were downgraded. Most high grade VURs could be detected by US and DMSA scan, but the prediction rate was not as high in low grade VURs. However, we can anticipate spontaneous improvement without complications in patients with either low or high grade reflux and negative findings on US and DMSA scan.[Technetium 99m labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (99m Tc-DMSA) scintigraphy in the diagnosis and follow-up of urinary infections in children].The site of a urinary tract infection (UTI) is located by clinical findings plus imaging techniques. Renal imaging with technetium 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc-DMSA) has shown promise but its efficacy for detecting acute pyelonephritis is still debated as is its ability to differentiate between acute, potentially curable disease and scarring, definitive changes.The files of all the 166 patients that underwent one or two (32 patients) 99mTc-DMSA imaging sessions for UTI in 1989 and 1990 in our department were analysed. The results of this technique were compared with the clinical and laboratory data and with those of other imaging techniques (ultrasonography and retrograde voiding cystourethrogram). The patients (92 girls and 74 boys, mean age: 5 years, range 15 days-17 years) were assigned to one of 3 categories: 1) acute pyelonephritis (27 patients), 2) low UTI (60 patients) and 3) uncertain UTI (79 patients), on the basis of the clinical and laboratory data.The first 99mTc-DMSA imaging was normal in 110 children; changes were unilateral in 45 and bilateral in 11 children. Images suggesting either acute or chronic changes were observed respectively in 19 and 48 children. 4 of the 7 acute changes were normalized on the second radioisotope scanning while 2 became worse; 19 of the 23 chronic changes were unchanged at the second scanning. Radioisotope scanning changes were seen in 81% of the patients classified as acute pyelonephritis and in only 27% of those with lower UTI. Reflux was detected in 56% of abnormal kidneys and in 36% of normal kidneys. The results of radioisotope scanning and ultrasound scan findings were not correlated in 24 patients (19 only abnormal radioisotope imaging, 5 only abnormal ultrasound scan).DMSA scans are useful for investigating and following UTI. They help to distinguish acute pyelonephritis and lower UTI. It is a reliable method of detecting structural abnormalities and identifying children at risk of progressive renal damage.[Urinary tract infection and biological markers: C-reactive protein, interleukins and procalcitonin].Serum C reactive protein (CRP) remains a good marker of the severity of urinary tract infections in children, despite false negative results. Serum IL-6 is not a better marker; urinary IL-6 might have a better prognostic value as it is higher in patients with renal lesions due to infection, but low values are found in some cases. Serum procalcitonin levels are correlated with the importance of renal scars at scintigraphy, with less than 10% of false negative results. Further studies are needed to confirm the sensitivity and sensibility of these markers, especially for procalcitonin.[Evaluation of inflammatory and renal injury markers in youngest children with pyelonephritis].Pyelonephritis (PN) is frequent bacterial infections in young infants and very important because may cause parenchymal scarring. Early confirmation of bacterial infection and application the appropriate treatment before obtaining result of urine culture, reduce probability of parenchymal scarring.To evaluate the useful of inflammatory and renal injury markers: serum procalcitonin (PCT), tumor necrosis factor alpha (TNF-alpha) and injury renal marker alpha1--microglobulin (A1M) measurement, in comparison with C-reactive protein concentration and abnormal urinary tract, in neonates and young infants with pyelonephritis.Investigation was performed in two groups: I group--23 children with PN (1 to 24 weeks of age), and K group--30 healthy children aged from 1 to 24 weeks. Serum concentration of CRP was measured by immunonephelometric assay, PCT by immunoluminometric assay, TNF alpha by ELISA method, and urinary A1M by nephelometric assay.In control group (K) medians of all investigated markers were below minimum of detection. PN patients (I) had the highest PCT TNF-alpha, A1M and CRP concentration before treatment and normal results after antibiotic treatment. Using a cut-off: of 0.5 mg/dl for CRP, 0.5 ng/ml for PCT 15 pg/ml for TNF-alpha and 10 mg/g cr for A1M, sensitivity and specificity in children with pyelonephritis were: for CRP 100% and 62.5%, for PCT 81.8% and 87.2%, for TNF alpha 77.1% and 93.1% and A1M 70.4% and 56.1%, respectively. A positive correlation between serum PCT and CRP and TNF alpha was found. Very high concentration all markers were in patients with vesicoureteral reflux and 1 patient with hydronephrosis.In early diagnostics of PN (before obtaining results of urine culture) in youngest children, determination of concentration PCT and TNF alpha, has higher value than determination of CRP, taking into concentration high sensitivity and specificity for bacterial infection.Comparative efficacies of procalcitonin and conventional inflammatory markers for prediction of renal parenchymal inflammation in pediatric first urinary tract infection.To compare the reliability of procalcitonin (PCT) with conventional laboratory parameters in predicting for renal parenchymal inflammation (RPI).The study cohort consisted of 57 children who were admitted for a first-episode urinary tract infection. All patients underwent measurement of the leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), and serum PCT. RPI was evaluated by technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy within 7 days of admission. If the first DMSA findings were abnormal, another analysis was performed 6 months later. The cutoff points for ESR, CRP, and PCT were established by comparing the areas under their receiver operating characteristic curves. Statistical analysis was performed using 1-way analysis of variance.Of the 57 children, 27 were diagnosed with RPI on the basis of positive DMSA results. The ESR, CRP, and PCT levels were significantly greater (P < .001) in the patients with RPI than in those without RPI. In contrast, the leukocyte count was the same in both groups (P > .05). PCT was a more sensitive and specific marker for differentiating upper and lower urinary tract infection than ESR and CRP. Persistent lesions at the site of previous RPI were found in 12 patients in the follow-up DMSA analysis, with total regression evident in the remaining 15. The PCT levels were significantly greater in those with persistent renal lesions than in those with total regression (P = .005).Serum PCT is a more reliable biologic marker than the ESR, CRP, or leukocyte count for the early prediction of RPI in children with a first episode of urinary tract infection. In addition, the greater the elevation of PCT at admission, the more positive the correlation for subsequent permanent renal damage.Randomised controlled trial of three day versus 10 day intravenous antibiotics in acute pyelonephritis: effect on renal scarring.Acute pyelonephritis often leaves children with permanent renal scarring.To compare the prevalence of scarring following initial treatment with antibiotics administered intravenously for 10 or three days.In a prospective two centre trial, 220 patients aged 3 months to 16 years with positive urine culture and acute renal lesions on initial DMSA scintigraphy, were randomly assigned to receive intravenous ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg once daily) for 10 or three days, followed by oral cefixime (4 mg/kg twice daily) to complete a 15 day course. After three months, scintigraphy was repeated in order to diagnose renal scars.Renal scarring developed in 33% of the 110 children in the 10 day intravenous group and 36% of the 110 children in the three day group. Children older than 1 year had more renal scarring than infants (42% (54/129) and 24% (22/91), respectively). After adjustment for age, sex, duration of fever before treatment, degree of inflammation, presence of vesicoureteric reflux, and the patients' recruitment centres, there was no significant difference between the two treatments on renal scarring. During follow up, 15 children had recurrence of urinary infection with no significant difference between the two treatment groups.In children with acute pyelonephritis, initial intravenous treatment for 10 days, compared with three days, does not significantly reduce the development of renal scarring.The role of procalcitonin for acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring in infants and young children.We assessed the usefulness of procalcitonin as a biological marker in diagnosing acute pyelonephritis and for predicting subsequent renal scarring in young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.Children 2 years old or younger with a first febrile urinary tract infection were prospectively studied. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan within 5 days of admission and after 6 months. Serum samples from all patients were tested for procalcitonin, C-reactive protein and white blood cell count measurements.The 112 enrolled patients (age range 24 days to 24 months old) were divided into acute pyelonephritis (76) and lower urinary tract infection (36) groups according to the results of (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans. Median values of procalcitonin, C-reactive protein and white blood cell count at hospitalization were significantly higher in patients with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower urinary tract infection. The area under receiver operating characteristic curves showed that procalcitonin was superior to C-reactive protein and white blood cell count as a marker for diagnosing acute pyelonephritis. Initial and post-antibiotic treatment procalcitonin values were significantly higher in children with renal scarring than in those without scarring (p <0.001). Procalcitonin values at hospitalization and after treatment were independent predictors of later renal scarring on logistic regression analysis.Our results indicate the superior diagnostic accuracy of procalcitonin for predicting acute pyelonephritis in children 2 years old or younger. Higher initial and posttreatment procalcitonin values are independent risk factors for later renal scarring.Urinary tract infection in children.Two hundred and eighty-five children under 15 years old (169 boys and 116 girls) who had urinary tract infection (UTI) were admitted to our hospital during the period July 1995 to June 1998. Clinical presentation, laboratory data and image studies were recognized and analyzed. Most patients were younger than 2 years of age. Fever is the most common sign, especially in young children. With the urinary dipstick test a low positive rate of nitrite reaction (34.7%) was found. E. coli is the most common pathogen and exclusively resistant to ampicillin (90.2%). The E. coli is also relatively resistant to trimethoprim/sulfamethoxazole (57.1%). Voiding cystourethrogram was performed in 187 cases, in which 24.6% of those patients showed vesicoureteric reflux. Ninety-eight children received 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans and 62 cases (63.3%) had abnormal findings compatible with pyelonephritis. The positive predictive values by renal ultrasonography for vesicoureteric reflux and pyelonephritis are 30.7% and 78.9%, respectively. In pyelonephritis patients, only 37% also had a vesicoureteric reflux. The fever duration and clinical inflammatory parameters were evaluated in all patients. Longer febrile periods are the risk of vesicoureteric reflux and pyelonephritis, and a high C-reactive protein concentration indicates the risk of pyelonephritis. In conclusion, fever was the most common sign in young UTI children who had a low positive nitrite reaction rate in the dipstick test. E. coli was the most common pathogen with a high ampicillin resistance in Taiwan. Only 37% pyelonephritis patients had refluxing nephropathy. It is indicated that pyelonephritis is not always attributed to reflux of infected urine. A longer febrile period and a high C-reactive protein level are good indicators for prediction of the risk of pyelonephritis in UTI patients.Prophylaxis after first febrile urinary tract infection in children? A multicenter, randomized, controlled, noninferiority trial.Febrile urinary tract infections are common in children and associated with the risk for renal scarring and long-term complications. Antimicrobial prophylaxis has been used to reduce the risk for recurrence. We performed a study to determine whether no prophylaxis is similar to antimicrobial prophylaxis for 12 months in reducing the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections in children after a first febrile urinary tract infection.The study was a controlled, randomized, open-label, 2-armed, noninferiority trial comparing no prophylaxis with prophylaxis (co-trimoxazole 15 mg/kg per day or co-amoxiclav 15 mg/kg per day) for 12 months. A total of 338 children who were aged 2 months to <7 years and had a first episode of febrile urinary tract infection were enrolled: 309 with a confirmed pyelonephritis on a technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan with or without reflux and 27 with a clinical pyelonephritis and reflux. The primary end point was recurrence rate of febrile urinary tract infections during 12 months. Secondary end point was the rate of renal scarring produced by recurrent urinary tract infections on technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan after 12 months.Intention-to-treat analysis showed no significant differences in the primary outcome between no prophylaxis and prophylaxis: 12 (9.45%) of 127 vs 15 (7.11%) of 211. In the subgroup of children with reflux, the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections was 9 (19.6%) of 46 on no prophylaxis and 10 (12.1%) of 82 on prophylaxis. No significant difference was found in the secondary outcome: 2 (1.9%) of 108 on no prophylaxis versus 2 (1.1%) of 187 on prophylaxis. Bivariate analysis and Cox proportional hazard model showed that grade III reflux was a risk factor for recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. Whereas increasing age was protective, use of no prophylaxis was not a risk factor.For children with or without primary nonsevere reflux, prophylaxis does not reduce the rate of recurrent febrile urinary tract infections after the first episode.Post-pyelonephritic renal scars are not associated with vesicoureteral reflux in children.Children with pyelonephritis are at risk for renal damage. We assess the value of clinical signs and urological abnormalities in predicting renal scars in children following pyelonephritis.A total of 64 hospitalized children (29 females and 35 males, median age 2.9 years) underwent ultrasonography and technetium labeled dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy imaging within 1 week following the diagnosis of the first pyelonephritis. Voiding cystourethrography was performed 8 weeks after the diagnosis. Followup DMSA scintigraphy was performed in 58 patients after 2 years of followup.Urological abnormalities observed were vesicoureteral reflux (VUR, grade 2 or higher) in 11 patients (19%), nonrefluxing and nonobstructed megaureter in 2 (4%) and pyeloureteral obstruction in 1 (2%). The first DMSA scintigraphy showed parenchymal defects in 48% of patients. VUR did not increase the risk of renal defects. At 2 years after the infection 12 of the 58 patients (21%) had renal scars. Nine of these patients did not have VUR. However, 2 patients with high grade VUR and repeat infections demonstrated deterioration of kidney function during followup. The patients with renal scars were older than those without scars (3.1 vs 0.8 years, p = 0.0291) at the time of infection.Renal scars after first pyelonephritis are in most cases not associated with abnormalities of the urinary tract, but are caused by the infection itself. However, structural abnormalities may predispose to recurrent infections. Following pyelonephritis new renal scars may develop in all age groups in both sexes.Early (99m)Tc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.Level diagnosis of symptomatic urinary tract infections in childhood.As no method for localization of urinary tract infection has been shown to be absolutely reliable, six procedures have been carried out simultaneously in 25 girls with acute symptomatic infections and the reliability of each method assessed. While clinical diagnosis of pyelonephritis or cystitis correlated well with the overall results of the battery of tests, the reliability of individual tests varied. Highest reliability was obtained with CRP determinations followed by antibody titration, sedimentation rate, and renal concentrating capacity. In the bladder washout test only 8 of the 14 patients with pyelonephritis had findings clearly indicating high infection. Intermittent or inadequate discharge of bacteria from the renal parenchyma is suggested as the major source for this inaccuracy. In fact, half of the 42 final washout specimens from girls with acute pyelonephritis contained less than 1000 bacteria per ml, indicating that low numbers of organisms in ureteric urine is common in childhood pyelonephritis.Bacterial virulence factors are associated with occurrence of acute pyelonephritis but not renal scarring.We evaluated the influence of patient factors and virulence factors of uropathogenic Escherichia coli on the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal parenchymal scarring.We evaluated 80 boys and 45 girls 1 to 180 months old with febrile urinary tract infections who underwent renal scan to diagnose acute pyelonephritis and followup dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy at least 6 months later. Urinalysis, white blood cell count, uropathogenic E. coli genotype and vesicoureteral reflux were measured. Voiding cystourethrogram was investigated after acute pyelonephritis was confirmed by renal scan and acute inflammation subsided, about 2 to 4 weeks later.Acute pyelonephritis was significantly more likely to develop in children with urinary tract infections and persistent fever before and after hospitalization, elevated C-reactive protein or positive renal ultrasound findings. E. coli strains with the papG II and iha genes were significantly more likely to occur in patients with acute pyelonephritis. Patients with a fever for more than 3 days and C-reactive protein levels greater than 90.8 mg/l were significantly more likely to have renal scarring. Age was not an independent predictor of acute pyelonephritis, but modified the effect of virulence factors on the development of acute pyelonephritis.Bacterial virulence factors and host factors are associated with the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis. Host factors such as patient age and vesicoureteral reflux severity modify the influence of virulence factors, although only host factors are associated with the occurrence of renal scarring.Prospective, randomized trial comparing short and long intravenous antibiotic treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children: dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphic evaluation at 9 months.We report a prospective, randomized, multicenter trial that compared the effect of 3 vs 8 days of intravenous ceftriaxone treatment on the incidence of renal scarring at 6 to 9 months of follow-up in 383 children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.After initial treatment with intravenous netilmicin and ceftriaxone, patients were randomly assigned to either 5 days of oral antibiotics (short intravenous treatment) or 5 days of intravenous ceftriaxone (long intravenous treatment). Inclusion criteria were age 3 months to 16 years and first acute pyelonephritis episode, defined by fever of >38.5 degrees C, C-reactive protein level of >20 mg/L, and bacteriuria at >10(5)/mL. All patients underwent 99m technetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy 6 to 9 months after inclusion. A total of 548 children were included, 48 of whom were secondarily excluded and 117 of whom were lost to follow-up or had incomplete data; therefore, 383 children were eligible, 205 of them in the short intravenous treatment group and 178 in the long intravenous treatment group.At inclusion, median age was 15 months, median duration of fever was 43 hours, and median C-reactive protein level was 122 mg/L. A total of 37% (143 of 383) of patients had a vesicoureteral reflux grades 1 to 3. Patient characteristics at inclusion were similar in both groups, except for a significantly higher proportion of girls in the short intravenous treatment group. The frequency of renal scars at scintigraphy was similar in both groups. Multivariate analysis demonstrated that renal scars were significantly associated with increased renal height at initial ultrasound and with the presence of grade 3 vesicoureteric reflux.The incidence of renal scars was similar in patients who received 3 days compared 8 days of intravenous ceftriaxone. Increased renal height at initial ultrasound examination and grade 3 vesicoureteric reflux were significant risk factors for renal scars.99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children: relation to clinical and radiological findings.Seventy-two children, 59 girls and 13 boys, 0.1-15.9 (median 1.1) years of age, with acute pyelonephritis (APN) were investigated with the aid of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasonography (US) and a desmopressin test within 5 days of admission. Sixty-two children were reinvestigated approximately 2 months later when intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cysto-urethrography were also performed. During infection, 92% of the children showed changes in the DMSA scan with 69% by US, and the two investigations agreed in 58% of the kidneys. At follow-up, 68% showed changes in the DMSA scan, 47% by US and 48% by IVU. The DMSA scan and IVU agreed in 60% of the kidneys. Twenty-nine percent of the children had vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). The presence of grade greater than or equal to 3 VUR was associated with greater defects on the DMSA scan during infection, and at follow-up with a higher frequency of persistent changes compared with no VUR (P less than 0.02 and 0.01, respectively). During infection the size of the defect on the DMSA scan correlated with renal volume and C-reactive protein and inversely with the glomerular filtration rate, and at follow-up it correlated inversely with the renal concentration capacity. The DMSA scan is a sensitive method for diagnosing and localizing APN in children, and findings on DMSA scan show a weak but significant correlation with routine clinical and radiological parameters. It is suggested that persistent renal damage after APN in children without VUR may be more common than previously assumed.The importance of 99mTc DMSA scanning in the localization of childhood urinary tract infections.The use of 99mTechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc DMSA) scanning for the early diagnosis of upper urinary tract infections has been preferred for a few years. In this research we investigated the use of 99mTc DMSA scanning in the localization of renal parenchymal involvement in urinary tract infection. Twenty-four children presenting with first acute urinary tract infection were studied. Investigations included physical examination, white blood cell count (WBC), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), antibody-coated bacteria (ACB) and early 99mTc DMSA scanning. 99mTc DMSA scanning was taken as the gold standard method in determining renal parenchymal inflammation. According to the 99mTc DMSA scanning the sensitivity of clinical findings was 57.14%, WBC 23.80%, ESR 33.33%, CRP 14.28% and ACB 71.42% in the localization of urinary tract infection. We propose early 99mTc DMSA scanning performed around the time of infection as a good technique for localization of the level of infection in the urinary tract.Treatment of children with acute pyelonephritis: a prospective randomized study.The aim of this study was to compare, in children with acute pyelonephritis, the efficacy of 7 days' (group A) and 3 days' (group B) intravenous antibiotics, both followed by an oral treatment. Children were randomized after 3 days of intravenous treatment. Technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy was performed within the first days after admission and repeated 6 months later. Total or partial persistence of renal abnormalities on the 6-month DMSA scintigraphy was used as the endpoint of the study. Among the 92 children included in the study, 87 were followed for at least 6 months (43 in group A and 44 in group B) and were eligible for analysis. Late DMSA was abnormal in 9 kidneys of group A and 12 kidneys of group B, representing respectively 24% and 44% of kidneys with abnormalities on the initial DMSA (difference statistically not significant). When the patients were stratified according to the delay of treatment, the percentage of patients with sequelae in group A was comparable, whether the delay was less or more than 1 week. In group B, the percentage of patients with sequelae was significantly higher (P<0.01) when the delay was more than 1 week.[Usefulness of renal scintigraphy in the assessment of the first febrile urinary infection in children].The objective of this study was to compare the findings of renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection to determine which method is better in detecting patients at risk of renal injury or reflux.Thirty-three children between 0.2 and 12.3 years of age with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection were studied by means of clinical and laboratory assessment, renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy. In 24 patients (72.7%) a voiding cystourethrography was made. The patients were divided into two groups, those under 2 years of age (n = 14) and those over 2 years old (n = 19).Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 23 patients (69.7%) and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 2 (6.1%; p < 0.05). Children over 2 years of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (84.2% vs 50%; p < 0.05). There were no differences between girls and boys. Reflux was demonstrated in 13 patients (54.2%). Among those kidneys which presented abnormal cortical scintigraphy, vesicoureteral reflux was present in 76.5% of the studies. Furthermore, of those with abnormal ultrasonography vesicoureteral reflux was present in 17.6%.We found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection. The cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes. The incidence of vesicoureteral reflux in febrile urinary tract infection is high. When there is a renal cortical defect the risk of reflux is higher. This suggests that cortical scintigraphy should be added to the initial examination of children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection and this could be supplemented by voiding cystourethrography alone, with ultrasonography having a secondary role.Urinary proteins in children with urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to test our hypothesis that the urinary excretion of C-reactive protein (CRP), alpha 1-microglobulin (A1M), retinol-binding protein (RBP) and Clara cell protein (CC16) is increased in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) and relates to renal damage as measured by acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. Fifty-two children <2 years of age with UTI were enrolled in the study, 44 of whom were febrile. The control group consisted of 23 patients with non-UTI infection and elevated serum CRP (s-CRP) levels. Thirty-six patients had abnormal DMSA uptake, classified as mild, moderate or severe damage (DMSA class 1, 2, 3, respectively). There was a significant association between DMSA class and the excretion of urinary RBP (u-RBP) and u-CC16. There was also a significant difference in u-CRP levels between children with UTI and control children with non-UTI infections, although u-CRP excretion was not significantly correlated to DMSA class. In conclusion, the urinary excretion of the low-molecular-weight proteins RBP and CC16 showed a strong association with uptake defects on renal DMSA scans. The urinary level of CRP seems to distinguish between children with UTI and other febrile conditions. A combination of these biomarkers may be useful in the clinical assessment of children with UTI.Predictive factors for acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with first febrile urinary tract infection.We assessed predictive factors for acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.A total of 89 girls and 138 boys with a first febrile urinary tract infection were included in the study. We analyzed radiological (ultrasound, dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy, voiding cystourethrogram), clinical (age, gender, peak fever, therapeutic delay time) and laboratory (complete blood count with differential count, absolute neutrophil count, blood urea nitrogen, creatinine, urinalysis, Gram's stain, culture, C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate) variables. Dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy was performed within 5 days and at 6 months after diagnosis of urinary tract infection. Voiding cystourethrogram was performed after the acute phase of the urinary tract infection. Predictive factors for acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation were assessed using logistic regression analysis.Of 227 patients enrolled 140 had a refluxing and 87 a nonrefluxing urinary tract infection. On logistic regression analysis therapeutic delay time (p = 0.001) and presence of reflux (p = 0.011) were predictive of acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation (p = 0.001 and p = 0.0001, respectively) in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.Since vesicoureteral reflux is the common risk factor for acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation, voiding cystourethrogram must be considered as an initial study in patients with acute febrile urinary tract infection.Value of imaging studies after a first febrile urinary tract infection in young children: data from Italian renal infection study 1.We examined the diagnostic accuracy of routine imaging studies (ultrasonography and micturating cystography) for predicting long-term parenchymal renal damage after a first febrile urinary tract infection.This study addressed the secondary objective of a prospective trial evaluating different antibiotic regimens for the treatment of acute pyelonephritis. Data for 300 children < or =2 years of age, with normal prenatal ultrasound results, who completed the diagnostic follow-up evaluation (ultrasonography and technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning within 10 days, cystography within 2 months, and repeat technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning at 12 months to detect scarring) were analyzed. Outcome measures were sensitivity, specificity, and negative and positive predictive values for ultrasonography and cystography in predicting parenchymal renal damage on the 12-month technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans.The kidneys and urinary tracts were mostly normal. The acute technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans showed pyelonephritis in 54% of cases. Renal scarring developed in 15% of cases. The ultrasonographic and cystographic findings were poor predictors of long-term damage, showing minor sonographic abnormalities for 12 and reflux for 23 of the 45 children who subsequently developed scarring.The benefit of performing ultrasonography and scintigraphy in the acute phase or cystourethrography is minimal. Our findings support (1) technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy 6 months after infection to detect scarring that may be related to long-term hypertension, proteinuria, and renal function impairment (although the degree of scarring was generally minor and did not impair renal function) and (2) continued surveillance to identify recurrent urinary tract infections that may warrant further investigation.Urine interleukin-1beta in children with acute pyelonephritis and renal scarring.Acute pyelonephritis is a common infectious disease in children and can result in permanent renal damage. Interleukin (IL)-1beta is an important inflammatory mediator that appears early during bacterial infection. This prospective study examined urine IL-1beta levels in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, and also evaluated whether this cytokine correlated with renal scarring.A total of 75 children aged 1-121 months with a diagnosis of first-time febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) were studied. The following inflammatory markers were assessed: fever, white blood cell (WBC), neutrophil, C-reactive protein (CRP) and urine IL-1beta. Urine samples were collected for IL-1beta measurement by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay before and after antibiotic treatment of the infection. Follow-up DMSA scan was performed at 6-12 months after the acute pyelonephritis to detect renal scarring. Twenty children with other febrile illnesses served as non-renal febrile controls.The 75 children were divided into acute pyelonephritis (n = 41) and lower UTI (n = 34) groups according to the findings of DMSA scans. Fever, WBC count, neutrophil count and CRP were significantly higher in the children with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower UTI (all P < 0.001). The initial urine IL-1beta levels of children with acute pyelonephritis were significantly higher when compared with lower UTI and non-renal febrile controls (P < 0.001). Urine IL-1beta in children with acute pyelonephritis was positively correlated with fever, CRP, WBC, neutrophil and leucocyturia. Renal scarring was found in 12 (29.3%) of the 41 children with acute pyelonephritis. The mean age was significantly lower in the children with renal scarring compared with those without (P < 0.05).These results have shown that urine IL-1beta level may serve as a useful marker for the early detection of acute pyelonephritis in febrile children. Young children are at a risk of the development of renal scarring following acute pyelonephritis.Symptomatic urinary tract infection in preschool Australian children.To describe the demographic and clinical features, short-term outcomes, microbiology and renal tract abnormalities of a cohort of young Australian children with symptomatic urinary tract infection.A total of 304 children < 5 years with their first documented symptomatic urinary tract infection who presented consecutively to the Emergency Department of a paediatric hospital between March 1993 and December 1994 and without a known predisposing cause were identified and details of their acute illness were recorded. Renal tract sonography, micturating cystourethrography and Tc-99 m dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA) were routinely performed.Of those who presented with urinary tract infection, 169 were boys and 135 girls; 64% were less than 1 year of age. For children from the local community, the cumulative incidence of urinary tract infection within the first 5 years of life was estimated to be 1.9% for boys and 1.8% for girls. There were no significant differences in illness characteristics according to mode of referral or geographical locality. Presenting symptoms were generally nonspecific and not referrable to the urinary tract. There were no deaths. One per cent of children required ventilatory support, and bacteraemia occurred in 6%, all of whom were under 6 months of age. E. coli was the causal organism in 84%, and a high in vitro resistance to ampicillin/ amoxycillin (54%) was demonstrated by the pathogens isolated. Bacteriuria was eradicated in 99% with antimicrobial treatment. In this setting, the sensitivities of dipstick urinalysis (leucocyte esterase+/-nitrites) and pyuria on microscopy (>10 x 10(6) white cells L(-1)) were 85%. Abnormal DMSA scintigraphy was detected in 39%, vesicoureteric reflux in 28%, and obstructive uropathy in 1%.This study provides current and local data on a large sample of children <5 years with urinary tract infection, which are useful to clinicians who manage children at risk of the condition.Cortical scintigraphy in the evaluation of renal parenchymal changes in children with pyelonephritis.We designed a prospective study to evaluate the ability of dimercaptosuccinic acid cortical scintigraphy and ultrasonography to detect renal parenchymal lesions in children with pyelonephritis. One hundred eleven patients 1 week to 16 years of age (median 5.5 months) with a urine culture positive for pathogens were included in the study; cortical scintigraphy and ultrasonography were repeated in 25 children after a mean follow-up of 10.5 months. Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 74 children (67%), and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 39 (35%) (p < 0.001); results of the two examinations were discordant in 49 patients (kappa = 0.19). Children more than 1 year of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (85% vs 66%; p = 0.04). The presence of inflammatory signs (erythrocyte sedimentation rate or C-reactive protein) had an 89% sensitivity and a 25% specificity in identifying renal lesions. Among children with renal changes, vesicoureteric reflux was present in 39%. At follow-up examination, 16 children (64%) had scars. Thus we found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with pyelonephritis. We found that cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes, and we believe that it should be added to the initial examination of children with suspected pyelonephritis.Diagnostic significance of clinical and laboratory findings to localize site of urinary infection.The aim of this study was to define in children younger than 2 years of age the diagnostic significance of clinical and laboratory findings to localize site of febrile urinary tract infection. We reviewed the records of 185 children younger than 2 years of age admitted to hospital with febrile urinary tract infection. Patients were divided into having either acute pyelonephritis or acute cystitis according to the presence or absence of acute lesions on dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy. Clinical and laboratory [white blood cell count (WBC), urinalysis, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP)] findings were compared between the two groups using Student's t test, chi-square test, and multivariate analysis. Patients with pyelonephritis had statistically significant higher age, WBC, ESR, and CRP than those with cystitis. Although the sensitivity of the tests was 80-100%, their specificity was <28%. On multivariate analysis, 33% of patients with cystitis were diagnosed as having pyelonephritis, whereas 22% of those with pyelonephritis were considered to have cystitis. Given the low specificity of clinical findings and available laboratory tests to define the site of urine infection in this age group, we recommend DMSA renal scintigram as the test of choice to make the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in these patients.Diagnostic significance of 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in urinary tract infection.A total of 106 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (73 girls and 33 boys, 0-15.9 years of age) were studied by means of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasound, and a desmopressin test during infection and at follow up approximately two months later. At follow up they were also investigated by means of intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cystourethrography (MCU). During infection 23 children had a normal DMSA scan while 83 children had an abnormal one. The median C reactive protein and SD score for renal concentration capacity in the former group were 15 (range < 10-178) mg/l and -1.0 SD score (range -2.4 to 1.8), respectively, and in the latter group 98 (range < 10-320) mg/l and -3.1 SD score (range -5.7 to 1.1), respectively. In the former group there was no significant finding in any child on ultrasound or IVU and only one had significant vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) (grade 3). At follow up 51 children had a normal DMSA scan while 55 children showed persistent changes. The median SD score for renal concentration capacity in the former group was -0.9 SD score (range -3.2 to 1.4) and in the latter group -1.6 SD score (range -4.6 to 2.5). No significant changes were found in the former group on ultrasound or IVU and only two children had significant VUR (grade 3). In the latter group 20 children showed changes on ultrasound, 15 showed changes on IVU, and 23 had VUR. These results suggest that a normal DMSA scan during or approximately two months after urinary tract infection in children indicates a low risk of finding significant pathology of the urinary tract.Urinary lactic dehydrogenase and serum C-reactive protein as means of localizing the site of urinary tract infection in patients with ileal conduits.Many patients with ileal conduit urinary diversion have infected urine but far fewer have clinical pyelonephritis. A noninvasive diagnostic test to distinguish renal bacteriuria from conduit colonization in these patients would seem desirable. Urine total lactic dehydrogenase and lactic dehydrogenase isoenzymes, and serum C-reactive protein have been useful to distinguish pyelonephritis from cystitis in patients with intact urinary tracts. We used these tests in patients with ileal conduits who had urine containing more and less than 10(5) organisms per ml. All patients had elevated urine total lactic dehydrogenase-5 isoenzyme, and serum C-reactive protein. No statistically significant difference in any of these parameters existed between the groups. These results may indicate that all patients with conduits have pyelonephritis but only intermittently demonstrate bacteriuria, or that the conduit mucosa contributes lactic dehydrogenase to the urine. However, it does not appear that these tests alone can distinguish accurately renal bacteriuria from conduit colonization.Serum and urine levels of interleukin-6 and interleukin-8 in children with acute pyelonephritis.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common clinical disorder in younger infants and children and may result in permanent renal damage. The inflammatory cytokines interleukin (IL)-6 and IL-8 play an important role in response to bacterial infection. This prospective study investigated the association between serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8 levels and acute pyelonephritis confirmed by (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. A total of 78 children aged 1-121 months with a diagnosis of first-time febrile UTI were included. The following inflammatory markers were assessed: fever; white blood cells count (WBC); C-reactive protein (CRP); and serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8. The patients were divided into the acute pyelonephritis group (n=42) and the lower UTI group (n=36) according to the results of DMSA scan. Fever, WBC and CRP levels were significantly higher in children with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower UTI (all p <0.001). Significantly, higher initial serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8 levels were found in children with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower UTI (all p <0.001). Serum and urine IL-6 in children with acute pyelonephritis were positively correlated with fever, CRP and leucocyturia. These results indicate that both serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8 levels, particularly IL-6, are useful diagnostic tools for early recognition of acute pyelonephritis in febrile children.Usefulness of procalcitonin and C-reactive protein rapid tests for the management of children with urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common problem in children. Because clinical findings and commonly used blood indices are nonspecific, the distinction between lower and upper urinary tract infection cannot be made easily in this population. However, this distinction is important because renal infection can induce parenchymal scarring. The objective of this study was to determine the accuracy of procalcitonin (PCT) compared with C-reactive protein (CRP) rapid tests to predict renal involvement in children with febrile UTI.PCT and CRP were measured in the blood of children admitted to the emergency room with fever, signs and symptoms of urinary tract infection and/or a positive urine dipstick analysis. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by a 99mTc-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan in the acute phase of infection in all children. Sensitivity, specificity and likelihood ratios were determined for both tests.Fifty-four children with a proven urinary tract infection were enrolled: 63% had renal involvement; and 37% had infection restricted to the lower urinary tract. No difference was found for age, sex and total white blood cell count between the groups. The calculated likelihood ratios of procalcitonin and C-reactive protein rapid tests were between 3.8 and 7 and 1.5 and 2.8, respectively. A positive PCT value predicted renal involvement in 87 to 92% of children with febrile UTI, compared with 44 to 83% using CRP values.A rapid determination of procalcitonin concentration could be useful for the management of children with febrile UTI in the emergency room.Cytokine profiles of pediatric patients treated with antibiotics for pyelonephritis: potential therapeutic impact.Urinary tract infections are common in infants and children. Pyelonephritis may result in serious complications, such as renal scarring, hypertension, and renal failure. Identification of the timing of release of inflammatory cytokines in relation to pyelonephritis and its treatment is essential for designing interventions that would minimize tissue damage. To this end, we measured urinary cytokine concentrations of interleukin-1 beta (IL-1 beta), IL-6, and IL-8 in infants and children with pyelonephritis and in healthy children. Children that presented to our institution with presumed urinary tract infection were given the diagnosis of pyelonephritis if they had a positive urine culture, pyuria, and one or more of the following indicators of systemic involvement: fever, elevated peripheral white blood cell count, or elevated C-reactive protein. Urine samples were obtained at the time of presentation prior to the administration of antibiotics, immediately after completion of the first dose of antibiotics, and at follow up 12 to 24 h after presentation. IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 concentrations were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Creatinine concentrations were also determined, and cytokine/creatinine ratios were calculated to standardize samples. Differences between pre-antibiotic and follow-up cytokine/creatinine ratios were significant for IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 (P < 0.01). Differences between pre-antibiotic and control cytokine/creatinine ratios were also significant for IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 (P < 0.01). Our study revealed that the urinary tract cytokine response to infection is intense but dissipates shortly after the initiation of antibiotic treatment. This suggests that renal damage due to inflammation begins early in infection, underscoring the need for rapid diagnosis and intervention.Procalcitonin is a marker of severity of renal lesions in pyelonephritis.In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin levels, a recently described marker of infection. We compared it with other commonly used inflammatory markers and evaluated its ability to predict renal involvement as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein, leukocyte counts, and procalcitonin levels were measured in 80 children, 1 month to 16 years of age, admitted for suspected pyelonephritis. Renal involvement was assessed by 99mTe-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 5 days after admission. The examination was repeated at least 3 months later if the first result was abnormal.In lower UTI, the mean procalcitonin (PCT) was 0.38 micrograms/L +/- 0.19 compared with 5.37 micrograms/L +/- 1.9 in pyelonephritis. In these two groups, respectively, leukocyte counts were 10939/mm3 +/- 834 and 17429/mm3 +/- 994, and C-reactive protein (CRP) levels were 30.3 mg/L +/- 7.6 and 120.8 mg/L +/- 8.9. When inflammatory markers were correlated to the severity of the renal lesion as ranked by DMSA scintigraphy, we found a highly significant correlation with plasma levels of PCT, but borderline significance with CRP and none with leukocyte counts. Patients without vesicoureteral reflux had a mean PCT of 5.16 micrograms/L +/- 2.33, which was not significantly different from that in patients with reflux who had a mean PCT of 5.76 micrograms/L +/- 3.49. For the prediction of renal lesions at admission, CRP had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 26.1%. The sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 70.3% and 82.6%, respectively.We conclude that serum PCT levels were increased significantly in children with febrile UTI when renal parenchymal involvement (assessed by DMSA scintigraphy) was present and allowed for prediction of patients at risk of severe renal lesions.Color and power Doppler sonography versus DMSA scintigraphy in acute pyelonephritis and in prediction of renal scarring.Capabilities of color and power Doppler sonography (DS) were prospectively evaluated for diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and for prediction of scarring by comparison with 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA).Fifty-seven children (mean age, 5 +/- 3 y) with acute pyelonephritis were investigated by biologic testing, DS (DS 1), and DMSA (DMSA 1). Patients who were <6 mo old or had high-grade reflux or obstruction were excluded. Forty-five children had a clinical follow-up examination, biologic testing, DS (DS 2), and DMSA (DMSA 2) at a mean of 7 +/- 2 mo after acute infection. Sonography (gray-scale and DS) was performed by 1 experienced radiologist who was unaware of patient data. DMSA studies were interpreted by 2 physicians who were unaware of patient data.Temperature, neutrophil count, and C-reactive protein value were significantly higher in patients with abnormal DMSA 1 findings than in those with abnormal DS 1 findings (P < 0.05). When compared with DMSA 1, DS 1 had a sensitivity and specificity of 80% and 81%, respectively. At follow-up, all clinical and biologic data had normalized. Scarring after infection occurred in 51% of children. When compared with DMSA 2, DS 1 had positive and negative predictive values of 57% and 75%, respectively, and DMSA 1 had respective values of 62% and 100%. Reflux was not considered a good predictor of scarring.DS and DMSA results were concordant in 81% of kidneys with acute pyelonephritis. The predictive value of DS for renal scarring was not considered sufficiently high for DS to be used in routine practice.99mTc-DMSA scintigraphy in acute urinary tract infection in children.24 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI) underwent systematically ultrasound studies (US) and 99mTc-DMSA renal scans. Among the 15 patients considered as acute pyelonephritis (APN) on clinical grounds, the scan was abnormal in 12 cases, in contrast with only 1 abnormal scan in the clinical subgroup of the lower UTI. Among the 10 abnormal scans that were repeated later on, 6 did completely normalize. US showed only once a parenchymal appearance suggestive for APN. Our findings suggest that the DMSA scan has to be considered at present as the most sensitive imaging technique for the detection of APN.Vesicoureteral reflux increases the risk of renal scars: a study of unilateral reflux.The aim of this study was to assess the impact of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on renal scar following acute pyelonephritis by comparing the refluxing renal units with nonrefluxing renal units in children with unilateral primary VUR. Forty-eight children with unilateral primary VUR diagnosed after the first pyelonephritis were enrolled. Mean age of patients was 1.0+/-1.6 years (29 boys and 19 girls). All patients underwent renal ultrasonography and renal 99 m-technetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan within three days following the diagnosis of pyelonephritis, and voiding cystourethrography (VCU) was performed soon after fever subsided and the infection was controlled. The DMSA scan was rechecked six months after the initial study when the first scan showed a renal defect. The first DMSA showed renal defects in 34 (70.8%) out of 48 of the refluxing renal units and in 13 (27.1%) out of 48 of the nonrefluxing renal units (P<0.01, OR: 6.54). At six months after the infection, 23 (47.9%) out of 48 refluxing renal units and seven (14.6%) out of 48 nonrefluxing renal units had renal scars on DMSA scan (P<0.01, OR: 5.39). The prevalence of renal scars did not vary significantly according to the grade of VUR. The CRP level on admission was significantly higher in patients with acute renal defect and scar. In conclusion, VUR increases the risk of post-pyelonephritic renal scars in children.Early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children fails to reduce renal scarring: data from the Italian Renal Infection Study Trials.The American Academy of Pediatrics recommendation for febrile infants and young children suspected of having a urinary tract infection is early antibiotic treatment, given parenterally if necessary. In support of this recommendation, data suggesting that delay in treatment of acute pyelonephritis increases the risk of kidney damage are cited. Because the risk was not well defined, we investigated renal scarring associated with delayed versus early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children.The research findings are derived from 2 multicenter, prospective, randomized, controlled studies, Italian Renal Infection Study 1 and 2, whose primary outcomes dealt with initial antibiotic treatment and subsequent prophylaxis, respectively. From the 2 studies, we selected the 287 children with confirmed pyelonephritis on acute technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans who underwent repeat scanning to detect scarring 12 months later. The children were 1 month to <7 years of age when they presented with their first recognized episode of acute pyelonephritis in northeast Italy.Progressive delay in antibiotic treatment of acute pyelonephritis from <1 to >/=5 days after the onset of fever was not associated with any significant increase in the risk of scarring on technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans obtained 1 year later. The risk of scarring remained relatively constant at 30.7 +/- 7%. Clinical and laboratory indices of inflammation were comparable in all groups, as was the incidence of vesicoureteric reflux.Early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in infants and young children had no significant effect on the incidence of subsequent renal scarring. Furthermore, there was no significant difference in the rate of scarring after acute pyelonephritis when infants and young children were compared with older children.Role of Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy in the diagnosis of culture negative pyelonephritis.The aim of this work was to evaluate prospectively the proportion of children with a clinical and biological presentation of acute pyelonephritis, abnormal Tc-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy and negative or equivocal urine cultures. All patients aged 6 weeks to 15 years suspected of acute pyelonephritis (APN) were admitted to the Paediatric Department and underwent Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy within 3 days after admission and at 6 months. Of 166 patients enrolled in the study, 15 (9%) had negative or equivocal urine culture despite clinical and scintigraphic evidence of APN. Of these 15 children, renal ultrasound was normal in 7 patients and vesicoureteric reflux was found in 9 patients. Control DMSA 6 months after acute episode showed the disappearance of cortical lesions in eight and partial improvement in four patients. In this prospective series, as many as 9% of patients with APN would have been missed on the basis of equivocal or negative urine cultures. It is suggested that Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy should be performed in children with severe infection without clear aetiology, especially in those with abnormal urinalysis.Lack of association between hemolysin production and acute inflammation in human urinary tract infection.Hemolysins are cytolytic proteins which have been extensively characterized at the molecular level, however, their in vivo functions remain unclear. This study analyzed the association of hemolysin production with the inflammatory response in patients with urinary tract infection (UTI). Infants and children with their first episode of UTI (n = 644) were followed prospectively. The body temperature, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), urinary leucocyte count and renal concentrating capacity were used as measures of the inflammatory response. The hemolytic genotype (hly) of the Escherichia coli strain from each UTI episode was defined by DNA-DNA hybridization, and the phenotype by hemolysis in blood agar. There was no significant increase in the level of fever, CRP, ESR, or decrease in renal concentrating capacity during UTI episodes caused by hly positive compared to hly negative E. coli. Multiple regression analysis did not demonstrate significant associations of hly with elevated fever, CRP, ESR or reduced renal concentrating capacity. In contrast, patients infected with P fimbriated E. coli strains had higher fever, CRP, ESR and lower renal concentrating capacity than those infected with other strains. This association was not influenced by the hly genotype of the P fimbriated strains. The frequency of hly+ strains was not significantly higher in the subset of patients assigned a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis compared to asymptomatic bacteriuria. This was in contrast to P fimbriae, which were accumulated in acute pyelonephritis. The results suggested that the acute inflammatory response to E. coli UTI is independent of hemolysin production. The inflammatogenic potential of uropathogenic E. coli clones was better described by the presence or absence of P-fimbriae than by hemolysin.[Technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in the first febrile urinary tract infection in children].The objective of this study was to evaluate the findings of 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection in relation with several clinical-biological parameters and other imaging studies and a long-term follow up.103 children between 1 month and 10 years old with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection were studied by means of clinical and laboratory assessment, renal ultrasonography and 99mTc DMSA renal scintigraphy in the acute illness period. Patients were divided into two groups, those under 2 years old (n = 63) and those over 2 years old (n = 40).Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 56 patients (54,5%). Children over 2 years of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than younger children (39,7% vs. 77,5%). Ultrasonography measuring renal volume showed a simple concordance with scintigraphy in 64% of the patients. Reflux was demonstrated in 23 patients (22,3%) without differences between patients with normal or abnormal cortical scintigraphy. After having studied the factors that were associated independently to the pathological results in the scintigraphy through a logistical multivariant regression, it was observed that the child's age, the elevation of the PCR and the alterations of the renal volume were significant according to statistics and also associated to a larger amount of pathological DMSA scintigraphy.DMSA scintigraphy associated with other diagnostic methods can improve the sensitivity and specificity to establish renal damage stage. During the follow-up the acute lesions disappeared or improved in all cases and the chronic lesions have not been modificated.Urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase and beta-2-microglobulin in the diagnosis of urinary tract infection in febrile infants.Urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase (NAG) and beta-2-microglobulin (B2M) concentrations were measured in 24 pediatric patients with febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) and compared with the technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan results, in order to evaluate a noninvasive means to localize the site of UTI. Increased urinary B2M and NAG were not associated with renal inflammation (pyelonephritis), as defined by positive dimercaptosuccinic acid scan. Median NAG concentrations were 114.2 mumol/hour/mg creatinine (CR) (range, 5.7 to 305.4) in 17 febrile UTI patients vs. 13.8 (range, 3.4 to 104.3) in 17 age and sex-matched febrile controls with negative urine cultures, P = 0.0001. The sensitivity and specificity of NAG > or = 40 mumol/hour/mg of CR in predicting UTI in febrile patients, regardless of the site of infection, were 88 and 88%, respectively. Increased urinary NAG is associated with UTI in febrile patients regardless of the level of infection (scan status), and may be an informative indicator of UTI.Early 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.During a 2 year period, 175 children below 6 years of age (median 0.4 year) with non-obstructive symptomatic urinary tract infection were studied by 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. DMSA scintigraphy was performed at a median of 10 days after the start of treatment and was abnormal in 73 children (42%), equivocal in 29 (16%) and normal in 73 (42%). Reflux was seen in 27% of all children and in 38% of the renal units that were abnormal at DMSA scintigraphy. A decreasing frequency of abnormalities at DMSA scintigraphy was seen within the first 14 days after the start of treatment. C-reactive protein and grade of reflux correlated significantly with abnormal DMSA studies. To demonstrate renal involvement in acute urinary tract infection, DMSA scintigraphy should be performed within days after the start of treatment. It is noteworthy that reflux was seen in less than half of renal units with abnormal DMSA scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein and the site of urinary tract infections.Elevated surum levels of C-reactive protein have been found regularly in girls with acute clinical pyelonephritis but only infrequently in those with clinical cystitis. Based on these data, the suggestion has been made that elevated serum CRP concentrations may be useful in identifying patients with upper urinary tract infections. In a study in which the bladder washout test was used to localize the site of urinary tract infections, we identified nine girls with renal bacteriuria who did not have clinical findings suggesting acute pyelonephritis; four of these girls had serum CRP concentrations less than 10 micrograms/ml. Twenty-eight girls had bladder washout-proven lower urinary tract infections; three of these had serum CRP values greater than 30 micrograms/ml. These studies show that an elevated serum CRP concentration is not accurate in localizing the site of a urinary tract infection in girls who do not have clinical signs of acute pyelonephritis.Age-related radiological imaging in children with acute pyelonephritis.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) using clinical and laboratory parameters is often difficult in children. The aims of this retrospective study were twofold. Firstly, to correlate the clinical and laboratory manifestations of APN with the results of the dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan in different age groups. Secondly, to compare the DMSA renal scan, renal ultrasonography (RUS), and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in patients with clinical APN. The DMSA renal scan was utilized as the gold standard for renal involvement. We determined the sensitivity of these tests in febrile urinary tract infections (UTI) in three age groups: group I less than 2 years; group II 2-8 years; group III older than 8 years. During the period January 1992 through December 1998, 222 children presented with a febrile UTI. All patients had a DMSA renal scan, 208 had contrast VCUG, and 163 had RUS. The clinical and laboratory manifestation of pyelonephritis correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan in the older children than in the younger children; 85% of the DMSA renal scans were positive in group III; 69% in group II; 48% in group I (P<0.001). Vesicoureteral reflux detected by contrast VCUG was more prevalent in the younger age groups. Although high grades of reflux (grade IV-V) correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan, it did not reach a level of statistical significance (P>0.05). RUS did not correlate with a positive DMSA renal scan in any age group.Technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy in children with acute pyelonephritis: correlation with other imaging tests.INTRODUCTION. Urinary tract infection is the most common serious bacterial infection in children. The aim of this study was to compare the value of different laboratory and imaging techniques in detecting renal involvement in acute pyelonephritis. MATERIALS AND METHODS. In a cross-sectional study of patients 1 month to 14 years of age diagnosed with urinary tract infection were examined with systemic inflammatory markers, renal ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), and technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid ((99m)Tc-DMSA) renal scintigraphy. A total of 1467 pediatric patients were eligible for treatment of pyelonephritis. Evaluations included a complete blood count, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), urinalysis, urine culture, and measurement of serum blood urea nitrogen and creatinine levels. RESULTS. The results of (99m)Tc-DMSA scans were normal in 20.2%, mild decreased cortical uptake in 45.0%, moderate decreased cortical uptake in 12.3%, severe decreased cortical uptake in 12.0%, and decreased cortical function plus irregularity or scar formation in 10.5%. Voiding cystourethrography showed vesicoureteral reflux in 25.9%. The sensitivity of (99m)Tc-DMSA for prediction of vesicoureteral reflux was 84.1% with a negative predictive value of 80.6%. Significant differences were found in the level of blood leukocyte count (P = .03), urine leukocyte count (P = .003), ESR (P = .008), and age (P = .04) between patients with normal and abnormal (99m)Tc-DMSA scan results. CONCLUSIONS. We found that in patient with clinical signs of pyelonephritis, (99m)Tc-DMSA renal scintigraphy can detect pyelonephritis more accurately than the other inflammatory and imaging tests.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis: How helpful is procalcitonin?This prospective study aimed to investigate the diagnostic value of serum procalcitonin levels in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.We compared the symptoms and laboratory findings of fever, vomiting, abdominal/flank pain, leukocyte count, serum C-reactive protein and procalcitonin levels with the results of the DMSA scan obtained within the first 72 h after referral in children who were diagnosed as having acute pyelonephritis. Thirty-three children (31 female and two male) aged 1-11 years (mean 4.42 years) were enrolled in this prospective study.Twenty-one of 33 patients (64%) had positive DMSA scans. On the scans obtained after 6 months, five of 21 patients (23.8%) had renal scars. No correlation was found between clinical and laboratory parameters, alone or combined with each other, and positive DMSA scans. Serum procalcitonin levels were 0.767+/-0.64 and 1.23+/-1.17 ng . ml in children with normal and positive DMSA scans, respectively. The cut-off value for procalcitonin using receiver operating characteristic analysis was 0.9605 ng . ml, while sensitivity and specificity were 86.4% and 36.4%, respectively. However, if the cut-off value was chosen as 2 ng . ml, the sensitivity increased to 100% while specificity did not change markedly.The serum procalcitonin test, like other commonly used laboratory parameters, e.g. serum C-reactive protein and white blood cell count, was inadequate in distinguishing renal parenchymal involvement in acute febrile urinary tract infections.Chemokine response to febrile urinary tract infection.Mucosal CXC chemokines recruit inflammatory cells to the infected urinary tract. The chemokine response repertoire of the urinary tract and the relationship to disease severity have not been examined, however.This study quantified CXC (CXCL1, CXCL3, CXCL5, CXCL8, CXCL9, and CXCL10) and CC (CCL2, CCL4, and CCL5) chemokines in sequential urine samples obtained from 50 patients with febrile urinary tract infections during 24 hours after diagnosis.All patients had elevated chemokine levels, but bacteremic infections caused higher CXCL1, CXCL3, CXCL5, CXCL8, and CCL2 responses. CCL2 and CXCL8 levels were higher in patients with acute pyelonephritis symptoms and CCL2, CXCL3, CCL4, CXCL5, and CXCL10 were significantly correlated to C-reactive protein (CRP) and temperature. Women and men showed different chemokine responses.Febrile urinary tract infections are accompanied by a complex chemokine response. The response magnitude reflects disease severity, and the repertoire is influenced by gender and underlying disease.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections in infants and young children.The purpose of the study was to compare bacterial species, clinical, laboratory and imaging findings ((99m )Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan and voiding cystogram) in infants and children with high (>/=10(5) colony forming units (CFU)/ml, group A patients) and low (</=5 x 10(4) CFU/ml, group C patients) bacterial count in urine cultures during first episode of urinary tract infection. Group B included patients with intermediate CFU/ml. Included were 419 symptomatic patients with: (a) no previous antibiotic treatment, (b) urine samples for quantitative cultures taken by bladder catheterisation or suprapubic bladder aspiration, (c) growth of only one microorganism, and (d) age </=54 months (age of the oldest patient of group C). Out of 419 cultures, Escherichia coli grew in 315 (75.2%), gram-negative bacteria except E. coli in 91 (21.7%) and gram-positive in 13 (3.1%). Group C patients were significantly ( P <0.0001) more often affected with gram-negative pathogens except E. coli than group A patients (21/44 versus 67/360). Most of group C patients were younger than 24 months of age; none was older than 54 months. Comparison of the prevalence of clinical and laboratory (leucocyte count, CRP, ESR) findings between groups A and C showed no significant differences. There was no statistically significant difference in the prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations (except reflux) between groups A and C.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections mainly affect infants and young children and are often due to gram-negative bacteria other than E. coli. Clinical and laboratory findings, prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations are similar in high and low bacterial count urinary tract infections.Risk assessment of renal cortical scarring with urinary tract infection by clinical features and ultrasonography.To address some of the issues in the ongoing debate over the optimal diagnostic imaging following childhood urinary tract infection (UTI), by determining the risk of missing renal cortical scarring which would be detected on a technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) gold standard if ultrasound alone were used, factoring for clinical features (upper or lower tract), UTI recurrence, and age group (infants, preschool, or school age).Details of UTI clinical features and recurrence were recorded for 990 children with a proven UTI, and their DMSA and ultrasound results were compared for each kidney.The risks of missing DMSA scarring varied between 0.4% (school age children with solitary lower tract UTI) and 11.1% (infants with recurrent upper tract UTI).UTI clinical features are important in assessing the need for DMSA imaging. Current UK imaging guidelines are endorsed, although preschool children with solitary lower tract UTI remain a controversial group and more attention needs to focused on children with recurrent UTI.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, urinary tract infection and renal damage in children.We studied the relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, urinary tract infection and permanent renal damage in children.We retrospectively analyzed 303 children younger than 2 years with a first time, nonobstructive, culture verified urinary tract infection. The protocol included ultrasonography and voiding cystourethrography within 3 months after urinary tract infection, and (99m)technetium dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy after 1 to 2 years.Vesicoureteral reflux was found in 36 of 163 boys (22%) and in 44 of 140 girls (31%). Of the 303 patients 80 (26%) had permanent renal damage according to dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy. The rate of abnormality increased significantly with grade of vesicoureteral reflux in boys and girls. The relative risk of renal damage was significantly increased in patients with vesicoureteral reflux grade II and higher. Maximum C-reactive protein concentration, maximum temperature during urinary tract infection, presence of vesicoureteral reflux and febrile recurrences of urinary tract infection were significantly related to permanent renal damage. In stepwise logistic regression vesicoureteral reflux was the only independent variable for boys, while C-reactive protein and vesicoureteral reflux were independent factors for girls.There was a significant relationship between grade II vesicoureteral reflux and higher and permanent renal damage in boys and girls. However, while the association between renal damage and vesicoureteral reflux was evident in boys, the role of urinary tract infection and renal inflammation seemed to be equally or more important in girls. These findings support the concept that renal damage is associated with vesicoureteral reflux and is often congenital in boys, while in girls it is more related to urinary tract infection with vesicoureteral reflux as a reinforcing factor.Randomised trial of oral versus sequential intravenous/oral cephalosporins in children with pyelonephritis.The hypothesis was tested that oral antibiotic treatment in children with acute pyelonephritis and scintigraphy-documented lesions is equally as efficacious as sequential intravenous/oral therapy with respect to the incidence of renal scarring. A randomised multi-centre trial was conducted in 365 children aged 6 months to 16 years with bacterial growth in cultures from urine collected by catheter. The children were assigned to receive either oral ceftibuten (9 mg/kg once daily) for 14 days or intravenous ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg once daily) for 3 days followed by oral ceftibuten for 11 days. Only patients with lesions detected on acute-phase dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy underwent follow-up scintigraphy. Efficacy was evaluated by the rate of renal scarring after 6 months on follow-up scintigraphy. Of 219 children with lesions on acute-phase scintigraphy, 152 completed the study; 80 (72 females, median age 2.2 years) were given ceftibuten and 72 (62 females, median age 1.6 years) were given ceftriaxone/ceftibuten. Patients in the intravenous/oral group had significantly higher C-reactive protein (CRP) concentrations at baseline and larger lesion(s) on acute-phase scintigraphy. Follow-up scintigraphy showed renal scarring in 21/80 children treated with ceftibuten and 33/72 with ceftriaxone/ceftibuten (p = 0.01). However, after adjustment for the confounding variables (CRP and size of acute-phase lesion), no significant difference was observed for renal scarring between the two groups (p = 0.2). Renal scarring correlated with the extent of the acute-phase lesion (r = 0.60, p < 0.0001) and the grade of vesico-ureteric reflux (r = 0.31, p = 0.03), and was more frequent in refluxing renal units (p = 0.04). The majority of patients, i.e. 44 in the oral group and 47 in the intravenous/oral group, were managed as out-patients. Side effects were not observed. From this study, we can conclude that once-daily oral ceftibuten for 14 days yielded comparable results to sequential ceftriaxone/ceftibuten treatment in children aged 6 months to 16 years with DMSA-documented acute pyelonephritis and it allowed out-patient management in the majority of these children.Clinical differentiation of acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection in children.To evaluate clinical variables for diagnosing childhood acute pyelonephritis (APN) when technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy is not available.We retrospectively reviewed the records of 590 children with febrile UTI seen from January 1999 to February 2004. On the basis of DMSA scintigraphy performed within 7 days after admission, they were divided into APN (n = 237) or non-APN (n = 353) groups. Gender, age, clinical presentation, absolute neutrophil count, C-reactive protein (CRP), urinalysis, culture, and sonographic findings were recorded from charts.A CRP level of > or =66.4 mg/L, in patients with >2 days prior to admission had a sensitivity of 71.6% and a specificity of 72.5% for APN. Similarly, a CRP of >27.3 mg/L in patients with < or =2 days prior to admission and a white cell count of >14,990/mm3 had sensitivities of 68.6% and 62.0% and specificities of 66.1% and 63.0%, respectively. Combining two or more variables did not result in better discrimination.If a DMSA scan is not available, it is reasonable to treat a febrile UTI as APN if the CRP is >66.4 mg/L in a patient with >2 days of fever or if the CRP is >27.3 mg/L in a patient febrile for < or =2 days.Urine macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in children with urinary tract infection: a possible predictor of acute pyelonephritis.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) is an important pro-inflammatory cytokine expressed at sites of inflammation. We have assessed this factor (MIF) in urinary tract infections with the aim of determining a non-invasive and sensitive method to differentiate upper and lower renal involvement. Thirty-three pediatric patients with urinary track infection (25 with acute pyelonephritis, eight with acute cystitis) and 40 healthy subjects were recruited for this prospective case-control study. Pyelonephritis was differentiated from cystitis by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. Urinary MIF concentration was determined using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay method. The urine MIF/creatinine (Cr) ratio was significantly higher in pyelonephritis patients than in those with acute cystitis and the control group (P < 0.001). The optimal cut-point of 4.90 pg/micromol Cr for the urine MIF/Cr ratio has the potential to be a biomarker for distinguishing patients with acute pyelonephritis from those with acute cystitis. Determination of the urinary MIF was also useful in selecting the patients at risk of permanent renal damage. Of those patients with pyelonephritis, based on the DMSA scan at the time of infection, scarring on follow-up DMSA scan 9-12 months later occurred in patients with the highest urinary MIF/Cr ratios. We conclude that the urine MIF/Cr ratio is a sensitive test for differentiating acute pyelonephritis from acute cystitis and also for detecting children with acute pyelonephritis who are at a higher risk for permanent renal scars in the future.[Usefulness of procalcitonin for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children].Acute pyelonephritis can induce parenchymal scarring. The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of procalcitonin (PCT) to predict renal involvement in febrile children with urinary tract infection (UTI).In a prospective study serum PCT was measured and compared with others commonly used inflammatory markers in children admitted to the emergency unit with acute pyelonephritis. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by a (99 m)Tc-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scar performed in the first 3 days after the admission.Among 42 enrolled patients, 19 (45%) had acute renal involvement (Group A) ; 23 (55%) (Group B) had normal DMSA scan (n = 16), or old scarring (n = 4) or various anomalies related to uropathy (n = 3). In group A, the mean PCT level was significantly higher than in the group B (5.4 ng/ml, vs 0.4 ng /ml, p < 10(-5)). In these 2 groups, mean C reactive protein (CRP) levels were 99.1 mg/l and 44.6 mg/l respectively (p < 0.001). For a level of serum PCT > or = 0.5 ng/ml, the sensitivity and specificity to predict the renal involvement were 100% and 87% respectively; for a level> or= 20 mg/l CRP had a sensitivity of 94% but a specificity of 30%.Serum PCT levels were significantly increased in febrile children with UTI when acute renal parenchymal involvement was present. PCT seems a better marker than CRP for the prediction of patients at risk of renal lesions.Procalcitonin for the early prediction of renal parenchymal involvement in children with UTI: preliminary results.In order to establish the most reliable marker for distinguishing urinary tract infections (UTI) with and without renal parenchymal involvement (RPI), we recorded the clinical features and admission leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), and serum procalcitonin (PCT) in 57 children (including 43 girls) aged 2-108 months admitted with a first episode of UTI. RPI was evaluated by Tc-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy within 7 days of admission. To establish cut-off points for ESR, CRP, and PCT, we used receiver operating characteristics curves and compared the area under the curve for ESR, CRP, and PCT. Twenty-seven children were diagnosed as having RPI based on positive renal scintigraphy. A body temperature of >38 degrees C, a history of diarrhea, and poor oral intake were more common in patients with RPI. ESR, CRP, and PCT, but not leukocyte count, were significantly higher in patients with RPI (P < 0.001). PCT was more sensitive and specific for the diagnosis of upper versus lower UTI than ESR and CRP. Using a cut-off value of 0.85 ng/ml, PCT had the best performance, with sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 89%, 97%, 96%, and 91% respectively. Serum PCT is a better marker than ESR, CRP, and leukocyte count for the early prediction of RPI in children with a first episode of UTI.Predictive value of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux in children.We aimed to determine the predictability of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children with urinary tract infection (UTI). Data of children with febrile UTI who underwent voiding cystoureterography between 2002 and 2005 were evaluated retrospectively for clinical (age, gender, fever > or = 38.5 degrees C, recurrent UTI), laboratory [leukocytosis, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), pyuria, serum creatinine (S(Cr))] and imaging (renal ultrasonography) variables. Children with VUR (group 1) vs. no VUR (group 2) and children with high-grade (III-V) VUR (group 3) vs. no or low-grade (I-II) VUR (group 4) were compared. Among 88 patients (24 male), 38 had VUR and 21 high-grade VUR. Fever > or = 38.5 degrees C was associated with VUR [odds ratio (OR): 7.5]. CRP level of 50 mg/l was the best cut-off level for predicting high-grade VUR (OR 15.5; discriminative ability 0.89 +/- 0.05). Performing voiding cystourethrography based on this CRP level would result in failure to notice 9% of patients with high-grade VUR, whereas 69% of children with no/low-grade VUR would be spared from this invasive test. In conclusion, fever > or = 38 degrees C and CRP > 50 mg/l seem to be potentially useful clinical predictors of VUR and high-grade VUR, respectively, in pediatric patients with UTI. Further validation of these findings could limit unnecessary voiding cystourethrography.Are younger children at highest risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis?The general belief about the relation between risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis and age is that infants are at highest risk and children older than 5 years at lower risk. This assumption has led to differences in treatment based on age. The aim of this prospective study was to investigate the occurrence of renal lesions in children aged 0-16 years.Between May, 1994, and January, 1996, all children aged 0-16 years who were admitted to our department with a diagnosis of probable pyelonephritis and a positive urine culture were included in this prospective study. All patients received antibiotics for 7-21 days. During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, scintigraphy with technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) and ultrasonography were done. Voiding cystourethrography was undertaken at least 6 weeks after the end of antibiotic treatment. When scintigraphy showed renal parenchymal lesions, repeat scintigraphy was done after at least 2 months to assess the progression of renal lesions. For the analysis, children were grouped by age according to presumed risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis: high risk (< 1 year), moderate risk (1-5 years), low risk (> 5 years).201 patients were enrolled in the study (119 < 1 year, 47 aged 1-5 years, 35 > 5 years). During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, renal lesions were found in 66 (55%) infants under 1 year, in 37 (79%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 24 (69%) children older than 5 years. Of these 127 children, 108 underwent repeat scintigraphy after an average of 3 months (50 < 1 year, 36 aged 1-5 years, 22 > 5 years). Overall, renal scars were found on repeat scintigraphy in 20 (40%) infants under 1 year, in 31 (86%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 14 (64%) children older than 5 years. 38 (36%) of these 65 patients had vesicoureteric reflux. Among 88 children who had a first documented urinary-tract infection and underwent repeat scintigraphy, renal scars were found in 20 (43%) under 1 year, in 26 (84%) aged 1-5 years, and in eight (80%) older than 5 years.This study did not confirm the conventional view that the risk of renal scars after pyelonephritis diminishes with age. We believe that all children, irrespective of age, will benefit from any measure that prevents the development of renal sequelae.Blood group non-secretors have an increased inflammatory response to urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to assess the possible relationship between secretor state and the inflammatory response to urinary tract infection (UTI). Girls with recurrent UTI were prospectively studied. They included 61 secretor and 23 non-secretor individuals with 604 episodes of recurrent UTI. The response to each UTI episode was measured as the levels of C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and the body temperature as well as renal concentrating capacity and pyuria. The levels of C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and the body temperature were significantly higher in non-secretors than in secretors (p less than 0.04). As a consequence, non-secretors had an increased probability of being assigned a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis rather than asymptomatic bacteriuria (p less than 0.05). The higher inflammatory response in non-secretors was independent of the Gal alpha 1-4Gal beta adhesin expression of the infecting Escherichia coli strains. The increased inflammatory response to UTI in non-secretors might explain the accumulation of these individuals among patients with renal scarring.Urinary interleukin-8 in acute pyelonephritis of children: a before-after study.The aim of this study was to assess urinary interleukin-8 (IL-8) levels in pyelonephritis and its relation with the clinical course of the infection and of inflammatory changes detected by renal scintigraphy.In this quasi-experimental before-after study, we evaluated 91 children aged 1 to 144 months (mean 34.4 +/- 35.2 months) with pyelonephritis. Inflammatory markers including erythrocyte sedimentation rate, C-reactive protein, leukocyte count, and urinary IL-8, together with the results of ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrography, and dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy were evaluated in these children. The ratios of urinary IL-8 to creatinine (IL-8/C) before and after the treatment were compared with each other.Urinary IL-8/C levels were significantly higher after the empirical treatment in comparison with those before the treatment (0.19 +/- 0.21 versus 0.51 +/- 0.53, P < .001). No correlation was found between the urinary IL-8 levels and leukocyturia, urine culture results, other inflammatory markers, or findings of imaging examinations.We found high urinary IL-8 levels in children with pyelonephritis. We also documented its increasing after the treatment. We conclude that evaluation of urinary IL-8 can be a noninvasive test for diagnosis of upper urinary tract infection and its response to treatment.Acute renal cortical scintigraphy in children with a first urinary tract infection.This prospective study, performed in 101 children with a first symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI), evaluates the diagnostic value of clinical, biological, and ultrasound parameters in detecting children with acute renal infection documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. In children with a positive DMSA scan, mean C-reactive protein (CRP) was higher than in children with a normal DMSA scan (114+/-64 vs. 67+/-38 mg/dl, mean+/-SD, P=0.0002). The sensitivity and specificity of CRP was 64% and 68%, respectively. In children with severe kidney involvement, mean CRP and white blood count (WBC) were higher than in children with mild/moderate disease (151+/-83 vs. 92+/-55 mg/dl for CRP, P=0.0149; 20,100+/-6,854 vs. 15,023+/-6,145 WBC/ mm3 for WBC, P=0.0131). The sensitivity and specificity was 85% and 20% for CRP, and 77% and 18% for WBC, respectively. One or more areas of abnormal cortical echogenicity were documented in 3% of kidneys with positive DMSA scans. Dilatation of the collecting system was observed in 24% of kidneys. The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography was 27% and 89%, respectively. In conclusion, clinical, biological, and ultrasound parameters do not accurately distinguish cystitis from pyelonephritis in children with UTI and do not identify children with severe renal damage. Accordingly, we recommend that DMSA scan should be added to the initial work-up of children with UTI.Bacterial attachment and inflammation in the urinary tract.The mechanism whereby attachment enhances Escherichia coli virulence in the urinary tract was studied by a detailed analysis of the host response to bacteriuria. Episodes of bacteriuria in 1473 children were followed prospectively from 1970 to 1984. To study the inflammatory response to the bacteriuric epidoses, we recorded body temperature, C-reactive protein, microsedimentation rate, urinary leukocyte count, and renal concentrating capacity. Bacterial isolates from each episode were identified and saved, and the adhesive capacity of 2669 E. coli strains was defined by their binding to galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-containing receptors. Inflammatory response was significantly higher and renal concentrating capacity significantly lower during episodes caused by attaching strains. There was a linear relation between the number of indicators of inflammation and the proportion of galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-binding strains present. Vesicoureteric reflux potentiated the inflammatory response. Attaching strains of E. coli thus appeared to be more capable of causing inflammation than were other bacteria. The potentiating effect of attachment on inflammation explains the over-representation of galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-recognizing bacteria in patients with acute pyelonephritis.Is procalcitonin useful in early diagnosis of serious bacterial infections in children?To compare diagnostic accuracy of procalcitonin for early diagnosis of serious bacterial infection (SBI) in children presenting with fever and no focus of infection.Prospective, observational study involving 72 children (1-36 mo) presenting to the paediatric units of two university hospitals. All children had blood cultures, urine cultures, white blood cell counts (WBC), chest X-ray, C-reactive protein (CRP) and procalcitonin (PCT) done at presentation.Eight (11.1%) children had SBI (1 pneumonia, 2 meningitis, 4 septicaemia/occult bacteraemia, 2 pyelonephritis), 19 (26.4%) had possible bacterial infection (received antibiotic treatment, but no organism grown) and 45 (62.5%) had viral or possible viral infection (virus isolated and/or uneventful recovery without antibiotics). PCT (>2 ng/l), CRP (>50 mg/l) and McCarthy's score (<9) had sensitivities and specificities of 50%/85.9%, 75%/68.7% and 87.5%/67.2%, respectively. Negative and positive likelihood ratios for CRP (>50 mg/l), PCT (>2 ng/l), white blood cells (>15 x 10(5)/l) and McCarthy's score (<9) were 0.36/2.4, 0.58/3.5, 0.94/1.1 and 0.19/2.7, respectively. A combination of PCT, CRP and WBC generated a positive likelihood ratio of 10.6, changing the post-test probability to 54%.For early diagnosis of SBI in children presenting with fever and no focus of infection, the diagnostic utility of procalcitonin is similar to the traditional markers infection and clinical scoring. While a low procalcitonin level cannot be used to exclude SBI in this population, a combination of PCT, CRP and WBC may be more useful in predicting SBI.The role of serum and urine interleukin-8 on acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring in children.Interleukin (IL)-8 acts as a potent neutrophils chemoattractant responsible for the migration of neutrophils into the infected renal tissue to protect against invading pathogens. The aim of this study was to assess the role of IL-8 on acute-phase pyelonephritis and later renal scarring in children.A total of 124 children with a first-time febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) were studied. The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis was confirmed by Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan. Serum and urine samples were obtained from 124 children with UTI and 20 healthy children for IL-8 measurement.The 124 children were divided into acute pyelonephritis (n = 70) and lower UTI (n = 54) groups according to the results of DMSA scans. The initial serum and urine IL-8 values of children with acute pyelonephritis were significantly higher when compared with lower UTI and healthy controls (all P < 0.001). Renal scarring was seen in 26 (38.8%) of these 67 children with acute pyelonephritis at follow-up DMSA scans. Both the initial serum and urine IL-8 concentrations were significantly higher in children with renal scarring than in those without (both P < 0.001). The mean age of children with renal scarring was also significantly lower than those without scarring (P = 0.004). Multivariate analysis showed that the highest initial IL-8 values, age <20 months and reflux grades > or =III all were independent predictors of renal scarring.Those children younger than 2 years of age with the highest IL-8 concentrations during the acute phase of pyelonephritis as well as children with reflux grades of III or greater are at a high-risk for developing renal scarring in the future.Does early treatment of urinary tract infection prevent renal damage?Therapeutic delay has been suggested as the most important factor that is likely to have an effect on the development of scarring after acute pyelonephritis. However, this opinion has not been supported by prospective studies, so we tested it.In a prospective clinical study, we evaluated whether the time interval between the onset of the renal infection and the start of therapy correlates with the development of acute inflammatory changes and the subsequent development of renal scars, documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy. A total of 278 infants (153 male and 125 female) aged 0.5 to 12.0 months with their first urinary tract infection were enrolled in the study.The median time between the onset of infection and the institution of therapy was 2 days (range: 1-8 days). Renal inflammatory changes were documented in 57% of the infants. Renal defects were recorded in 41% of the patients treated within the first 24 hours since the onset of fever versus 75% of those treated on day 4 and onward. Renal scarring was developed in 51% of the infants with an abnormal scan in the acute phase of infection. The frequency of scarring in infants treated early and in those whose treatment was delayed did not differ, suggesting that once acute pyelonephritis has occurred, ultimate renal scarring is independent of the timing of therapy. Acute inflammatory changes and subsequent scarring were more frequent in the presence of vesicoureteral reflux, especially that which is high grade. However, the difference was not significant, which suggests that renal damage may be independent of the presence of reflux.Early and appropriate treatment of urinary tract infection, especially during the first 24 hours after the onset of symptoms, diminishes the likelihood of renal involvement during the acute phase of the infection but does not prevent scar formation.Alterations of peripheral leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and C-reactive protein in febrile urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to assess the usefulness of peripheral leukocyte count, differential leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and C-reactive protein (CRP) level in febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) for defining the UTI level.A total of 61 children aged between 1 and 10 years with documented febrile UTI (axillary temperature > or = 38 degrees C) were studied. They had a urine culture positive for infection. Laboratory investigations including peripheral total and differential leukocyte counts, ESR, and CRP were assessed in relation to the inflammatory responses. Leukocyte count results were available in all of the patients, ESR in 41, and CRP in 36.Leukocyte count was normal in 6 patients (9.8%). Lymphocytic leukocytosis was seen in 1 patients (1.6%), neutrophilic leukocytosis in 25 (41.0%), and relative neutrophilia in 29 (47.5%). Thirty patients (73.2%) had a high ESR and 23 (63.9%) had a positive CRP. In children with a high ESR, 12 (29.3%) had neutrophilic leukocytosis and 14 (34.1%) had relative neutrophilia. Relative neutrophilia and neutrophilic leukocytosis with positive CRP both were found in 11 patients (30.6%). Negative CRP with absence of neutrophilic leukocytosis was found in a significantly higher proportion of patients. There were no direct correlations between the severity of systemic inflammatory responses and urinary tract inflammatory response.Findings of this study showed that ESR and differential leukocyte count are two valuable tests in febrile UTI and may be useful for localization of UTI level, but the total leukocyte count and CRP level as in qualitative methods are not useful, and many patients with febrile UTI do not have leukocytosis.Risk factors in the development of early technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy lesions during first urinary tract infection in children.To establish the variables that correlate with uptake defects in dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI).A prospective observational study was conducted in a cohort of 158 consecutive children with a first episode of symptomatic UTI. The therapeutic delay time (TDT) was recorded. DMSA scintigraphy was performed in all children and voiding cystourethrography in 150 of them.85% of the patients were younger than 2 y. Mean TDT was 33.5 h. The aetiological agent was Escherichia coli in 140 children. DMSA scintigraphy was normal in 81. Vesicoureteric reflux was detected in 33. After a multivariate logistic regression analysis the following variables were retained in the final model: TDT > or = 48 h, growth of bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and C-reactive protein > or = 30 mg l(-1).TDT > or = 48 h, bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and CRP > or = 30 mg l(-1) influence the findings detected in the DMSA scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of UTI.Urinary macrophage migration inhibitory factor in children with urinary tract infection.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) plays an essential pathophysiological role in inflammatory reactions. The aim of this study was to investigate the clinical utility of urine MIF (uMIF) level in predicting urinary tract infections (UTI). This multicenter, prospective study was conducted over a 1-year period between March 2008 and March 2009. Sixty patients with symptomatic culture-proven UTI and 29 healthy children were recruited. Urine MIF was measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The mean MIF level was found to be significantly higher in the UTI group than in the control group (1082.82 vs. 211.45 pg/ml, p = 0.0001). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis revealed that the optimal cut-off uMIF level was 295 pg/ml for uMIF to predict UTI. The sensitivity and specificity of this cut-off level were 91.7% and 69%, respectively. Mean uMIF/creatinine (Cr) was also significantly higher in the UTI group than in the control group (2400.69 vs. 267.56 pg/mgCr, p = 0.0001). At a cut-off of 815 pg/mgCr for uMIF/Cr, the sensitivity and specificity were 95 and 79%, respectively. The area under curve (AUC) was 0.848 (standard error 0.040, 95% confidence interval 0.756-0.915) for uMIF and 0.889 (0.034, 0.805-0.946) for uMIF/Cr. Urine MIF/Cr was significantly higher in the patients with a positive leukocyte esterase reaction in the urine (p = 0.047), leukocytosis (p = 0.0001) and positive C-reactive protein level in serum (p = 0.003). The uMIF level was not related to leukocytosis, positive CRP level in serum and leukocyte esterase reaction in the urine. Neither uMIF nor uMIF/Cr were correlated to the positive urine nitrite test, pyuria, urine pH and specific gravity (p > 0.05). These results suggest that urine MIF and uMIF/Cr can be used for the early prediction of UTI in children.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infection.Ninety-four children with febrile urinary tract infection were studied prospectively to determine the relationship between vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis, and to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of commonly used clinical and laboratory observations. By using renal scan with dimercaptosuccinic acid labeled with technetium 99m as the standard of reference, we documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with pyelonephritis. Of the 70 E. coli urinary isolates, 48 (69%) were P-fimbriated, including 30 (64%) of 47 isolates from patients with pyelonephritis and 18 (78%) of 23 isolates from patients with normal renal scans. The prevalence of P-fimbriated E. coli in patients with pyelonephritis and vesicoureteral reflux was 46%, compared with 71% in those with pyelonephritis who had no concurrent vesicoureteral reflux (p = 0.222). Multiple clinical and laboratory variables commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis did not adequately predict the presence or absence of parenchymal involvement. These data show the following: (1) Acute pyelonephritis in the absence of demonstrable vesicoureteral reflux is common. (2) Febrile urinary tract infections in children are commonly associated with P-fimbriated E. coli, both in the presence and absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (3) The presence of P fimbriae alone does not fully explain the pathophysiology of renal parenchymal invasion by bacteria in the absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (4) The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infections on the basis of clinical and laboratory observations is unreliable.Renal scarring after acute pyelonephritis.Seventy six children, 18 boys and 58 girls, aged 0-15.9 (median 1.0) years, with acute pyelonephritis were prospectively studied with a technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan during infection and two months later. Fifty nine of these children were also studied two years after the infection. Seventeen children with a normal DMSA scan during infection or at two months after infection, or both, were not investigated by a DMSA scan at two years after acute pyelonephritis. A micturition cystourethrogram was performed in all the children after two months. Changes on the DMSA scan were found in 65 (86%) children during acute pyelonephritis, in 45 (59%) children at two months, and in 28 (37%) children at two years after infection. Vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) was found in 19 (25%) children at two months. Renal scarring was significantly correlated with the presence of gross VUR and recurrent pyelonephritis, but 62% of the scarred kidneys were drained by non-refluxing ureters. Children with scars were older at the time of acute pyelonephritis than those without scars but no difference was found between the groups with regard to duration of illness, levels of C reactive protein and maximum white cell count, glomerular filtration rate, nor renal concentration capacity at the time of infection. It is concluded that renal scarring after acute pyelonephritis in children is more common than has been previously thought. Although children with gross VUR and recurrent pyelonephritis are at the greatest risk, renal scarring is more often seen without these risk factors.[Value of the C reactive protein, urinary lactic dehydrogenase and renal capacity of concentration in the topographic diagnosis of the urinary infection in infancy (author's transl)].In 39 children with urinary infection renal capacity of concentration, serum C-reactive protein and presence of urinary lactic dehydrogenase are studied pointing to the establishment of the topography of the damage. C-reactive protein levels higher than 20 micrograms/ml are 100 per 100 reliable in the diagnosis of pyelonephritis. Moreover, value of this test is confirmed as a guide of therapeutic efficacity. Difficulty of concentrating urine above 800 mOsm/l is 70 per 100 reliable and is a useful method for demonstrating parenchymal damage. The urinary lactic dehydrogenase was superior to 20 units/l in 64 per 100 of the cases, but other studies are necessary for interpretation of these data. These findings are similar to those obtained in the study of the isoenzymes.Correlation of renal ultrasonographic findings with inflammatory volume from dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans in children with acute pyelonephritis.We correlated abnormal findings on renal ultrasonography (US) and inflammatory volume (Volume) on technetium dimercaptosuccinic acid renal single photon emission computerized tomography (DMSA) in children with acute pyelonephritis (APN) with renal scars.A total of 31 males and 14 females (9 days to 9.8 years old) who fulfilled diagnostic criteria for APN and who underwent initial DMSA between January 1995 and July 2002 and followup DMSA at least 6 months later were enrolled in the study. APN was diagnosed by initial DMSA, and placement in the scar or scar-free group was determined by followup DMSA. Photopenic areas on initial DMSA were calculated as Volume, and were compared to US findings.Ultrasound demonstrated 35 abnormal kidneys (38.9%) among these children with APN. Significant differences in age, Volume (11.19 +/- 2.52 ml vs 3.02 +/- 0.75 ml, p <0.005), C-reactive protein (CRP) and photopenic lesion on initial DMSA were found between children with abnormal and normal US. Of 65 children with initial APN foci 33 (50.8%) recovered, and the others had development of scars. The sensitivity of US for detecting APN (identified by DMSA scan) was 49.2%, and the specificity was 88% (OR 7.1, 95% CI 2.18 to 24.41). The sensitivity of US for predicting renal scarring was 59.4%, and the specificity was 60.6% (OR 2.3, 95% CI 0.82 to 7.65). Patients with abnormal US findings and high serum CRP (greater than 70 mg/l) had a large Volume (10.96 +/- 3.05 ml) and a 76.2% chance of being in the scar group.US findings are significantly correlated to Volume in APN. Along with a high level of CRP, US is helpful in predicting development of renal scarring.Renal cortical scintigraphy in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.Comparative clinical studies have shown renal cortical scintigraphy, using technetium-99m (99mTc)-labeled glucoheptonate or dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA), to be significantly more sensitive than either intravenous pyelography or renal sonography in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis. However, due to uncertainties about the diagnostic accuracy of the clinical and laboratory parameters used in these studies, true sensitivity of renal cortical scintigraphy was unknown. Therefore, we evaluated the accuracy of [99mTc]DMSA scintigraphy in the diagnosis of experimentally induced acute pyelonephritis in piglets using strict histopathologic criteria as the standard of reference. The sensitivity and specificity of the DMSA scan for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis were 91% and 99%, respectively, with an overall 97% agreement between the scintigraphic and histopathologic findings. Based on the results of this experimental study, we used the [99mTc]DMSA scan as the standard of reference for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis, and conducted a prospective clinical study of 94 children hospitalized with the diagnosis of acute febrile urinary tract infection (UTI). The aims of this study were (1) to determine the relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, acute pyelonephritis, and renal scarring, and (2) to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of the clinical and laboratory parameters commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis. We documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with acute pyelonephritis. The prevalence of P-fimbriae in the E coli isolates was 64% in the patients with acute pyelonephritis and 78% in those with a normal DMSA scan. Even in patients without reflux, P-fimbriae were found in 71% of isolates from the patients with acute pyelonephritis and in 75% of those with a normal renal scan. Follow-up DMSA scans were obtained in 33 patients with acute pyelonephritis in 38 kidneys. We found complete resolution of the acute inflammatory changes in 58% of the involved kidneys and renal scarring in the remaining 42%, including 40% of the kidneys associated with reflux and 43% of those without reflux.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)Oral versus initial intravenous therapy for urinary tract infections in young febrile children.The standard recommendation for treatment of young, febrile children with urinary tract infection has been hospitalization for intravenous antimicrobials. The availability of potent, oral, third-generation cephalosporins as well as interest in cost containment and avoidance of nosocomial risks prompted evaluation of the safety and efficacy of outpatient therapy.In a multicenter, randomized clinical trial, we evaluated the efficacy of oral versus initial intravenous therapy in 306 children 1 to 24 months old with fever and urinary tract infection, in terms of short-term clinical outcomes (sterilization of the urine and defervescence) and long-term morbidity (incidence of reinfection and incidence and extent of renal scarring documented at 6 months by 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans). Children received either oral cefixime for 14 days (double dose on day 1) or initial intravenous cefotaxime for 3 days followed by oral cefixime for 11 days.Treatment groups were comparable regarding demographic, clinical, and laboratory characteristics. Bacteremia was present in 3.4% of children treated orally and 5.3% of children treated intravenously. Of the short-term outcomes, 1) repeat urine cultures were sterile within 24 hours in all children, and 2) mean time to defervescence was 25 and 24 hours for children treated orally and intravenously, respectively. Of the long-term outcomes, 1) symptomatic reinfections occurred in 4.6% of children treated orally and 7.2% of children treated intravenously, 2) renal scarring at 6 months was noted in 9.8% children treated orally versus 7.2% of children treated intravenously, and 3) mean extent of scarring was approximately 8% in both treatment groups. Mean costs were at least twofold higher for children treated intravenously ($3577 vs $1473) compared with those treated orally.Oral cefixime can be recommended as a safe and effective treatment for children with fever and urinary tract infection. Use of cefixime will result in substantial reductions of health care expenditures.Proinflammatory cytokines and procalcitonin in children with acute pyelonephritis.This prospective study, performed in 76 children with a urinary tract infection (UTI), evaluates the diagnostic value of procalcitonin (PCT) and proinflammatory cytokines (IL-1beta, IL-6 and TNF-alpha) in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA). Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m )Tc-DMSA scintigraphy within 7 days of admission. The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis was confirmed only in patients with reversible lesions on scintigraphy. According to DMSA scan results, patients were divided into two groups, lower UTI or acute pyelonephritis. In acute pyelonephritis, serum PCT level was found to be significantly higher than it is in the lower UTI (p <0.001). Also, significantly higher serum proinflammatory cytokines (IL-1beta, IL-6 and TNF-alpha) levels were detected in those with acute pyelonephritis than those with lower UTI (p <0.001). We conclude that both serum PCT and proinflammatory cytokine levels may be used as accurate markers for diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.[First urinary tract infection in healthy infants: epidemiology, diagnosis and treatment].Urinary tract infection (UTI) is one of the most common infections in infants. It presents certain peculiarities compared with other pediatric age groups in terms of symptomatology, diagnosis and the therapeutic approach employed to prevent sequels.To analyze the epidemiology, clinical and laboratory findings, etiology, diagnosis and treatment of first-time UTI in healthy infants.Between January and December 1999, we performed a retrospective study of 131 previously healthy infants admitted to our hospital with a diagnosis of first-time UTI. Demographic data, clinical characteristics, urine dipstick, urinalysis and urine culture (vesical catheterization), blood cell count and PCR, kidney ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrogram and DMSA scintigraphy were reviewed.We studied 131 patients (median age: 90 days). In infants younger than 30 days, UTI was more prevalent in males. The most frequent symptom was fever (73.3 %). Seventy-one patients fulfilled the criteria for acute pyelonephritis. The presence of nitrituria was low. Escherichia coli was isolated in 90.1 % of the patients. Voiding cystourethrogram detected vesicoureteric reflux in 18.4 % of the patients. Scintigraphy revealed renal scarring in 15.1 %. No significant correlations were found between renal scarring in late scintigraphy and a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and/or alterations in the cystourethrogram.Fever was the main symptom. E. coli was the most commonly isolated microorganism. Nitrituria had low sensitivity in infants. Ultrasonography had low specificity. Scintigraphy showed the highest sensitivity and specificity in the detection of renal scarring. Predictability improved when scintigraphy was performed a few months after acute infection.Association of P and other fimbriae with clinical pyelonephritis in children.196 episodes of urinary tract infection in children were analysed. 74 were classified as pyelonephritic (PN), 61 as cystitis (C), and 61 as asymptomatic bacteriuria (ABU) on the basis of three clinical signs (elevated temperature, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and/or white blood cell count). The frequency of P-fimbriae was found high in PN (77%), and significantly lower in C (23%), ABU (20%) and among fecal strains (16%). The common, type 1 fimbriae were also more frequent in PN (92%) than in the other groups (84-76%), whereas other, so-called X-fimbriae, were relatively rare in all the patient groups (15-6%). P-fimbriation was not significantly associated with the presence or absence of reflux or obstructive anomalies. By contrast, the frequency of P-fimbriation increased with increasing severity of the clinical symptoms of pyelonephritis (95% in episodes of elevated temperature, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and white blood cell count).[Laboratory parameters as a guide for the radiologic study of infections of the urinary tract in childhood].Forty-nine children with urinary tract infection aged between 15 days and 10 years were studied. Thirty-three of them (67.3%) had urinary tract malformations. We valued the following parameters: a) White Blood Cells; b) Leukocyte differential; c) ESR at the first hour; d) CRP; e) Concentration ability; f) Body temperature. We wanted to investigate the usefulness of these parameters to predict which patients should be studied by X-ray of urinary tract. Single parameters did not prove very sensitive; the highest correlations were found with ESR and CRP, which were positive in 76% of the cases of malformations. Furthermore we valued the sensitivity and specificity of the tests grouped together: the highest values of sensitivity (97%) and specificity (31%) were obtained coupling the ESR and concentration ability.Procalcitonin as a marker of acute pyelonephritis in infants and children.In the absence of specific symptomatology in children, the early diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis is a challenge, particularly during infancy. In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin (PCT) levels and compared these with other commonly used inflammatory markers. We evaluated the ability of serum PCT levels to predict renal involvement, as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. Serum C-reactive protein (CRP), leukocyte counts, and PCT levels were measured in 64 children admitted for suspected UTI. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m)Tc-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 7 days after admission. In acute pyelonephritis, the median PCT level was significantly higher than in the lower UTI group (3.41, range 0.36-12.4 microg/l vs. 0.13, range 0.02-2.15 microg/l, P<0.0001). In these two groups, respectively, median CRP levels were 120 (range 62-249 mg/l) and 74.5 (range 14.5-235 mg/l, P=0.012) and leukocyte counts were 15,910/mm(3) (range 10,200-26,900) and 14,600/mm(3) (range 8,190-26,470, P=0.34). For the prediction of acute pyelonephritis, the sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 94.1% and 89.7%, respectively; CRP had a sensitivity of 100%, but a specificity of 18.5%. We conclude that serum PCT may be an accurate marker for early diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.Imaging strategy for infants with urinary tract infection: a new algorithm.We analyzed clinical data for prediction of permanent renal damage in infants with first time urinary tract infection.This population based, prospective, 3-year study included 161 male and 129 female consecutive infants with first time urinary tract infection. Ultrasonography and dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy were performed as acute investigations and voiding cystourethrography within 2 months. Late scintigraphy was performed after 1 year in infants with abnormality on the first dimercapto-succinic acid scan or recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. End point was renal damage on the late scan.A total of 270 patients had end point data available, of whom 70 had renal damage and 200 did not. Final kidney status was associated with C-reactive protein, serum creatinine, temperature, leukocyturia, non-Escherichia coli bacteria, anteroposterior diameter on ultrasound and recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. In stepwise multiple regression analysis C-reactive protein, creatinine, leukocyturia, anteroposterior diameter and non-E.coli bacteria were independent predictors of permanent renal damage. C-reactive protein 70 mg/l or greater combined with anteroposterior diameter 10 mm or greater had sensitivity of 87% and specificity of 59% for renal damage. An algorithm for imaging of infants with first time urinary tract infection based on these results would have eliminated 126 acute dimercapto-succinic acid scans compared to our study protocol, while missing 9 patients with permanent renal damage.C-reactive protein can be used as a predictor of permanent renal damage in infants with urinary tract infection and together with anteroposterior diameter serves as a basis for an imaging algorithm.Diagnostic role of initial renal cortical scintigraphy in children with the first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Assessment of the first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) in children has been the subject of debate for many years. Diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) is usually based on clinical and biological data. The clinical usefulness of early Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy remains controversial, although it may influence the type and duration of treatment. The aim of this study was to assess the role of initial cortical scintigraphy in the detection of early renal parenchymal damage in children highly suspected of having APN and to compare the scintigraphic findings with selected clinical/laboratory parameters and ultrasonography.A prospective study was conducted in 34 infants and young children (18 boys, 16 girls), aged 1.5-36 months (mean 9.8 ± 8.7 months), hospitalized with a first episode of clinically suspected APN. Within the first 5 days after admission, Tc-99m DMSA renal scintigraphy, ultrasonography (US), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), white blood cell count (WBC) and urine analyses were performed.DMSA scintigraphy showed changes consistent with APN in 27/34 (79%) patients, with a mean age of 10.9 months, including 12 males (44%) and 15 (56%) females. Out of 9 febrile children with negative urine culture and supportive evidence of UTI, scintigraphy showed parenchymal involvement in 8 children (24% in the whole group, 30% in scintigraphically documented APN). There were no statistically significant correlations between the frequency or size of the initial scintigraphic abnormalities and age, sex, body temperature, CRP levels or ESR. A CRP level of >54 mg/L and a WBC of >13,300/mm³ had sensitivities of 56 and 59% and specificities of 86 and 71%, respectively. US showed changes consistent with APN in 7/34 (21%) in the whole group and in 7/27 (26%) patients with positive cortical scan (p < 0.05).Initial DMSA renal scintigraphy is a sensitive method for the early diagnosis of APN in young children and is useful in the assessment of the severity of kidney injury even in patients with negative urine culture. Clinical, biological and ultrasound parameters do not identify children with renal damage. Normal DMSA study, excluding parenchymal involvement and late sequelae, could minimize the use of scintigraphy in the follow-up and reduce the redundancy of cystography.Urinary tract infection in febrile infants younger than eight weeks of Age.To assess the usefulness of laboratory parameters, including peripheral white blood cell (WBC) count, C-reactive protein (CRP) concentration, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and microscopic urinalysis (UA), for identifying febrile infants younger than 8 weeks of age at risk for urinary tract infection (UTI), and comparison of standard UA and hemocytometer WBC counts for predicting the presence of UTI.A total of 162 febrile children <8 weeks of age were enrolled in this prospective study. All underwent clinical evaluation and laboratory investigation, including WBC count and differential; ESR; CRP; blood culture; a lumbar puncture for cell count and differential, glucose level, protein level, Gram stain, and culture; and a UA and urine culture. All urine specimens were obtained by suprapubic aspiration and microscopically analyzed with standard UA as well as with hemocytometer WBC counts. Quantitative urine cultures were performed. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were determined for each of the screening tests.There were 22 positive urine culture results of at least 100 colony-forming unit/mL. Eighteen of these 22 patients were males, and all were uncircumcised. There were significant differences for pyuria >/=5 WBCs/hpf, pyuria >/=10 WBC/microL, CRP >20 mg/L, and ESR >30 mm/hour between culture-positive and culture-negative groups (P <.05). The ROC area for hemocytometer WBC count, standard UA, peripheral WBC count, ESR, and CRP concentration were.909 +/-.045,.791 +/-.065,.544 +/-.074,. 787 +/-.060, and.822 +/-.036, respectively. The ROC curve analysis indicates that the CRP, ESR, and standard UA were powerful but imperfect tools with which to discriminate for UTI in potentially infected neonates. Hemocytometer WBC counts had the highest sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and likelihood ratios for identifying very young infants with positive urine culture results. For all assessments, hemocytometer WBC counts were significantly different, compared with the standard urinalysis. ESR, CRP, and peripheral WBC counts were not helpful in identifying UTI in febrile infants.UTI had a prevalence of 13.6% in febrile infants <8 weeks of age. The CRP, ESR, and standard UA were imperfect tools in discriminating for UTI, and the sensitivity of these laboratory parameters was relatively low. Hemocytometer WBC count was a significantly better predictor of UTI in febrile infants.Polymorphonuclear elastase as a diagnostic marker of acute pyelonephritis in children.Experimental evidence suggests that neutrophils and their metabolites play an important role in the pathogenesis of pyelonephritis. The aim of this study was to investigate the diagnostic value of polymorphonuclear elastase-a(1)-antitrypsin complex (E-a(1)-Pi) for the detection of acute pyelonephritis in children.Eighty-three patients, 29 boys and 54 girls, 25 days to 14 years of age, with first-time symptomatic urinary tract infection were prospectively studied. Fifty-seven healthy children served as controls. Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and voiding cystourethrography were performed in all patients. Plasma and urinary E-a(1)-Pi, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), neutrophil count, urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase (NAG), N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase b (NAG b), and creatinine levels were measured in all patients on admission and 3 days after the introduction of antibiotics. The same markers were also measured in the control subjects.Planar DMSA scintigraphy demonstrated changes of acute pyelonephritis in 30 of 83 children (group A). It was normal in the remaining 53 children (group B). The sex and age distributions were not significantly different between the 2 groups, as well as between the patients and the control subjects (group C). Nineteen of the 53 children with a normal DMSA had body temperature >/=38 degrees C, whereas all but 4 children with abnormal DMSA had temperature >/=38 degrees C. Therefore, the temperature was significantly different between these 2 groups. The sensitivity and specificity of fever (>/=38 degrees C) as an indicator of renal involvement based on isotopic findings were 86% and 64%, respectively. Given the significant number of the febrile children with normal DMSA scintiscans, group B was subdivided into B(1) with 19 febrile children (14 boys and 5 girls) and B(2) with 34 children whose body temperature was below 38 degrees C (8 boys and 26 girls). The sex and age distribution was significantly different between groups B(1) and B(2). The mean age of group B(1) was.78 years (range: 28 days to 9 years; median:.25 years; standard deviation: 2.1). All but 1 child in this group were younger than 1 year of age. In contrast, in group B(2), there were only 4 infants, the remaining 30 children were older than 2.5 years (mean age: 6 years; median: 7 years; standard deviation: 3.5; range: 34 days to 12 years). The mean duration of fever before hospital admission was 2.8 days for group A and 1.8 days for group B(1). This difference was not statistically significant. Similarly, body temperature was not significantly different between these 2 groups. The distribution of plasma E-a(1)-Pi values was normal in the control subjects. The sensitivity and specificity of plasma E-a(1)-Pi, as an indicator of renal involvement, were 96% and 50%, respectively, taking the 95th percentile of the reference range as a cutoff value. However, considering as a cutoff value the level of 72 microg/dL (95th percentile of group B(2)), its sensitivity and specificity were 74% and 86%, respectively. Plasma E-a(1)-Pi levels were significantly elevated in group A compared with group B and in both groups, the plasma E-a(1)-Pi values were significantly higher than in the control subjects. A significant difference also was noticed between group A and each of the subgroups B(1) and B(2) and also between the subgroups themselves. Plasma E-a(1)-Pi concentrations correlated significantly with neutrophil count in groups A (r =.3), B (r =.4), and B(2) (r =.46), but the correlation was not significant in group B(1.) ESR levels showed, among the different groups, similar differences with those of E-a(1)-Pi values. Unlike E-a(1)-Pi, CRP levels were comparable between groups A and B(1), which both consisted of febrile children. Neutrophil count was not significantly different between subgroups B(1) and B(2). (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED)Procalcitonin as a predictor of renal scarring in infants and young children.The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of procalcitonin (PCT) as a marker of renal scars in infants and young children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis. Children aged 7 days to 36 months admitted for first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) to a pediatric emergency department were prospectively enrolled. The PCT concentration was determined at admission. Acute (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy was performed within 7 days of admission and repeated 12 months later when abnormal findings were obtained on the first scan. Of the 72 children enrolled in the study, 52 showed signs of acute pyelonephritis (APN) on the first DMSA scan. A follow-up scintigraphy at the 12-month follow-up performed on 41 patients revealed that 14 (34%) patients had developed renal scars; these patients also presented significantly higher PCT values than those without permanent renal lesions [2.3 (interquartile range 1-11.6) vs. 0.5 (0.2-1.4) ng/mL; p = 0.007]. A comparison of the PCT concentration in patients with febrile UTI without renal involvement, with APN without scar development and with APN with subsequent renal scarring revealed a significant increasing trend (p = 0.006, Kruskal-Wallis test). The area under the ROC curve for scar prediction was 0.74 (95% confidence interval 0.61-0.85), with an optimum statistical cut-off value of 1 ng/mL (sensitivity 78.6%; specificity 63.8%). Based on these results, we suggest that serum PCT concentration at admission is a useful predictive tool of renal scarring in infants and young children with acute pyelonephritis.Acute phase 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in infants with first episode of febrile urinary tract infection.99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan is the golden standard for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and renal scaring. We investigated the use of acute phase DMSA scan in infants presented promptly to the hospital because of the first episode of their febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Ninety-eight infants with microbiologically confirmed first episode of febrile UTI were studied. DMSA scans were carried out within 7 days in these infants after admission. Infants with an abnormal acute DMSA scan underwent a second DMSA scan 6-12 months later.Overall, acute DMSA scan was abnormal in 16 (16.3%) of the 98 patients. There were no differences in sex, age, fever over 38.5°C, blood inflammation indices, or evidence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) between patients with normal and abnormal acute DMSA scan (P>0.05). However, infants with grade III to V VUR as well as those with delayed treatment presented significantly increased renal involvement by acute DMSA scan (P<0.05). The sensitivity and specificity of abnormal acute DMSA scan to predict grade III to V VUR were 50% and 88% respectively. Its positive and negative likelihood ratios were 4.16 and 0.57, respectively. Of 16 children with abnormal initial DMSA scan results, 14 underwent a second DMSA scan. Follow-up DMSA scans were normal in 12 of the 14 children.Parenchymal damage found in a minority of infants with febrile UTI presented promptly to the hospital. Acute phase DMSA scan should be carried out only in selected patients. An abnormal acute DMSA scan is a moderate predictor for dilated VUR and its ability to exclude VUR is restricted.Evaluation of DMSA scintigraphy and urography in assessing both acute and permanent renal damage in children.To evaluate dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy and urography in the detection of renal involvement in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) in order to identify patients with a high risk of developing renal damage.A total of 157 children (median age 0.4 years, range 5 days to 5.8 years) with first-time symptomatic UTI were examined scintigraphy (with an assessment of renal area involvement) and urography at the time of UTI and 1 year later. All evaluations were made blindly.Of the total 314 kidneys, 80 (25%) were abnormal at initial scintigraphy. Of these 80 kidneys, 44 (55%) had normalized at follow-up. Of the 234 initially normal kidneys, 29 (12%) were abnormal at follow-up. One year after UTI, abnormalities were seen in 59 children at scintigraphy and in 18 children at urography. Renal area involvement was larger and split function abnormalities more common in kidneys that were abnormal at both scintigraphy and urography than in kidneys with only scintigraphic abnormalities.Quantitation of renal area involvement and split renal function at early scintigraphy would seem to be useful in identifying patients at risk of developing renal damage. Urography at 1 year after infection identified mainly those with the most severe scintigraphic abnormalities. The clinical importance of scintigraphic abnormalities that are not confirmed by urography is not known.Functional parameters and 99mtechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in acute pyelonephritis.The diagnostic value of 99mtechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy, ultrasonography and renal functional parameters [urine N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase (NAG)/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients] in acute pyelonephritis (APN) were studied in 39 children (28 girls, 11 boys, median age 9 months, range 2 weeks to 9.4 years, 28 patients < 1 year, 11 patients > 1 year) with first-time urinary tract infection. Ultrasonography of the urinary tract was performed on admission and together with DMSA scintigraphy (< 10 days from admission). Urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were measured daily and after 6-8 weeks. Ultrasonography revealed abnormalities in 12 of 39 (31%) patients [11/32 patients (34%) with positive DMSA scintigraphy], while DMSA uptake defects were present in 32 of 39 (82%) patients [21/28 < 1 year (75%), 11/11 > 1 year (100%), P = 0.08]. Urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were significantly higher in children < 1 year with APN, as well as in non-renal fever controls, than in older children. However, in both age groups the urine NAG/creatinine and urine albumin/creatinine quotients were significantly higher in APN than in non-renal fever. The urine NAG and albumin excretion decreased rapidly after the initiation of antimicrobial therapy and had normalized at 6-8 weeks. The size and grade of the DMSA uptake defect (DMSA score) did not correlate with duration of disease at admission, maximum C-reactive protein or maximum fever. The urine NAG/creatinine quotient in the children < 1 year showed, however, a significant correlation with the DMSA score (r = 0.58, P < 0.05), while no correlation was found in the older children. We conclude that DMSA scintigraphy is a sensitive method to confirm the clinical diagnosis of APN, although a substantial number of infants appear to have normal scans. Early determination of the urine NAG/creatinine and albumin/ creatinine quotients may further improve the diagnostics in the infant.Five-year study of medical or surgical treatment in children with severe vesico-ureteral reflux dimercaptosuccinic acid findings. International Reflux Study Group in Europe.The results of serial dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) imaging over 5 years are reported in 287 children with severe vesico-ureteral reflux entered into the European Branch of the International Reflux Study in Children. The children were randomly allocated to medical (n=147) or surgical (n=140) management and DMSA studies were performed during the follow up period at least 6 months after any urinary tract infection. Abnormal images were classified into four types: (1) large polar hypodensity with normal renal outline; (2) peripheral photon deficient defect(s) in a non-deformed kidney; (3) small renal image with normal contour; and (4) peripheral defect(s) with resultant irregularity of the renal outline. The DMSA findings were abnormal at entry in 235 (82%) with no difference in incidence or severity between the two treatment groups. During follow up, deterioration was observed in 25 medically and 23 surgically treated patients and comprised image deterioration alone in 17, image deterioration with corresponding reduction in differential function in 16 and reduction in relative function without image change in 15, with similar distribution between the two treatment groups. Deterioration was more frequent in children entering the study under the age of 2 years and in those with grade IV rather than grade III reflux. These findings, showing no difference in outcome between children managed surgically or medically, are consistent with the radiological results already published.In the International Reflux Study the DMSA scintigraphic data showed no difference in outcome between children managed surgically or medically.Is procalcitonin a good marker of renal lesion in febrile urinary tract infection?Procalcitonin and pyelonephritis in children.In the past few years, procalcitonin has been proposed as a sensitive and specific inflammatory marker in various fields of medicine, especially in infectivology, where it has been used to discriminate between bacterial infections, viral infections and inflammation processes. Recently, different studies have emerged in the literature on the use of this marker to identify renal involvement in febrile urinary tract infections.Procalcitonin seems to be a valid biological marker, with an acceptable sensitivity and specificity, which predicts a renal involvement of the infection (pyelonephritis), in comparison with the low specificity of C-reactive protein. Procalcitonin also seems to be correlated with the degree of the involvement at the moment of diagnosis of febrile urinary tract infections and with scarring.Renal involvement has always been the main diagnostic objective in children with febrile urinary tract infections. If more studies confirm the correlation between procalcitonin, renal involvement during urinary infections and scar formation, we will finally have a noninvasive tool that can identify children at risk of complications and in need of a close follow-up as early as their first episode of febrile urinary tract infection.[Tc 99M DMSA scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis: correlation with laboratory tests, echography and the presence of vesico-ureteral reflux].Tc99m DMSA (dimercaptosuccinic acid) scintigraphy has a high sensitivity for the detection of cortical kidney damage.To evaluate the Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis and its association with laboratory parameters, kidney ultrasound and vesicoureteral reflux.We studied 143 children (age range 8 days, 12 years, 66% female) hospitalized with the clinical diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (first episode) with a positive urine culture and a renal scintigraphy performed within seven days of diagnosis. DMSA was considered the gold standard for the detection of cortical lesions. Its results were related to the presence of fever, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (VHS), white blood count (WBC), ultrasound examination and vesicoureteral reflux.Seventy nine percent of the population had an abnormal DMSA scan. There were no differences between sex, age and laboratory parameters in children with normal or abnormal DMSA scans, except for CRP (p <0.005). Ultrasound was coincident with the scan in 32% of patients. Eighteen percent had vesicoureteral reflux.There is a high proportion of abnormal DMSA scans in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Antibiotic treatment for pyelonephritis in children: multicentre randomised controlled non-inferiority trial.To compare the efficacy of oral antibiotic treatment alone with treatment started parenterally and completed orally in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Multicentre, randomised controlled, open labelled, parallel group, non-inferiority trial.28 paediatric units in north east Italy.502 children aged 1 month to <7 years with clinical pyelonephritis.Oral co-amoxiclav (50 mg/kg/day in three doses for 10 days) or parenteral ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg/day in a single parenteral dose) for three days, followed by oral co-amoxiclav (50 mg/kg/day in three divided doses for seven days). Main outcomes measures Primary outcome was the rate of renal scarring. Secondary measures of efficacy were time to defervescence (<37 degrees C), reduction in inflammatory indices, and percentage with sterile urine after 72 hours. An exploratory subgroup analysis was conducted in the children in whom pyelonephritis was confirmed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy within 10 days after study entry.Intention to treat analysis showed no significant differences between oral (n=244) and parenteral (n=258) treatment, both in the primary outcome (scarring scintigraphy at 12 months 27/197 (13.7%) v 36/203 (17.7%), difference in risk -4%, 95% confidence interval -11.1% to 3.1%) and secondary outcomes (time to defervescence 36.9 hours (SD 19.7) v 34.3 hours (SD 20), mean difference 2.6 (-0.9 to 6.0); white cell count 9.8x10(9)/l (SD 3.5) v 9.5x10(9)/l (SD 3.1), mean difference 0.3 (-0.3 to 0.9); percentage with sterile urine 185/186 v 203/204, risk difference -0.05% (-1.5% to 1.4%)). Similar results were found in the subgroup of 278 children with confirmed acute pyelonephritis on scintigraphy at study entry.Treatment with oral antibiotics is as effective as parenteral then oral treatment in the management of the first episode of clinical pyelonephritis in children.Clinical Trials NCT00161330 [ClinicalTrials.gov].Involvement of the renal parenchyma in acute urinary tract infection: the contribution of 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid scan.We performed 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasonography in 146 children during the acute phase of a proven urinary tract infection (UTI). In 99 a micturating cysto-urethrography and in 83 an intravenous urography was also done. The occurrence of fever and increased WBC count, CRP and ESR were also studied. It appeared from this retrospective study that 47% of the kidneys had a cortical or patchy pattern of decreased uptake of 99mTc DMSA, as compared to 23% with abnormal findings on US. Vesico-ureteral reflux was present in 38% of the kidneys with parenchymal involvement on 99mTc DMSA scan. Although fever, leucocytosis and elevated CRP and ESR were significantly correlated with abnormal 99mTc DMSA scan, they were also observed in children without renal parenchymal involvement. Our results suggest that 99mTc DMSA scan is a sensitive method for the detection of parenchymal involvement during acute UTI. The exact nature of these lesions and their relation with scars need, however, to be defined.Urinary levels of interleukin-6 and interleukin-8 in children with urinary tract infections to age 2.The aim of this study was to assess relations between the clinical course of UTI, IL-6 and IL-8 levels, and the presence of inflammatory changes detected by renal scintigraphy using 99mTc-DMSA (DMSA).We studied 33 children aged 1-24 months (mean 7.1+/-5.8 months) with first-time UTI. The subjects were divided in two groups: with fever (group I, n=10) and without fever (group II, n=23). Inflammatory markers (ESR, CRP, leukocyte count), urinary IL-6 and IL-8 level, and DMSA scan were evaluated in all children.Urinary IL-6 and IL-8 levels [IL-6, IL-8/creatinine (pg/mg)] were significantly higher in group I than in group II (Il-6 level: 39.4+/-41.1 vs. 6.3+/-13.7, p<0.01; IL-8 level: 791.1+/-1143.6 vs. 36+/-87.9, p<0.001). We found positive correlation between urinary IL-6 and IL-8 levels and ESR, CRP, and leukocyte count (IL-6: r=0.43, p<0.05; r=0.46, p<0.05; and r=0.59, p<0.001, respectively; IL-8: r=0.55, p<0.05; r=0.72, p<0.0001; and r=0.44, p<0.05, respectively). We found no relation between urinary cytokine levels and the presence of inflammatory changes detected by DMSA scanning, despite slightly higher mean urinary cytokine levels in children with inflammatory changes in DMSA scan.We found significantly higher IL-6 and IL-8 levels in children with febrile UTI and elevated inflammatory markers. IL-6 and IL-8 levels do not differentiate between acute pyelonephritis and UTI in children to age 24 months.Usefulness of procalcitonin rapid test for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children in the emergency department.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common problem in children. The aim of this study was to determine the usefulness of the procalcitonin (PCT) rapid test in the diagnosis of renal involvement in children with urinary tract infection.Through a case series study, PCT and C-reactive protein rapid tests were measured in children with proven UTI at the Tehran Children's Medical Center, Iran. One-hundred patients aged 1 month-14 years old (19 boys and 81 girls) with documented UTI were enrolled in the study.Of 100 children, 62 patients (62%) had renal involvement on the basis of abnormal Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy and 38 patients (38%) had infection restricted to the lower urinary tract. There were no differences related to age or gender among the groups. The sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 77% and 89%, respectively, in prediction of renal involvement, whereas C-reactive protein had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 65%.We concluded that a rapid determination of PCT concentration could be useful for the management of children with febrile UTI in the emergency room.The efficacy of ultrasound and dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in predicting vesicoureteral reflux in children below the age of 2 years with their first febrile urinary tract infection.We evaluated the efficacy of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasound (US) in comparison with voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in predicting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children below the age of 2 years. Medical records and radiologic studies of children (<2 years) suffering their first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) between January 2001 and May 2007 were retrospectively reviewed. We evaluated the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of US and DMSA scans in diagnosing VUR. Among 220 children with their first febrile UTI, VUR was detected in 67 (30.4%). The detection rate of VUR by US was 41.7% and 86% in the low (I, II) and high grade (III~IV) groups, respectively. Detection rate of VUR by DMSA scan was 37.5% and 88.4% in the low and high grade groups, respectively. Combining US and DMSA scan, we found that the detection rate of high grade VUR was 95.3% and that of low grade was 62.5%. During follow up, most of the low grade VURs with normal DMSA and US scans resolved or were downgraded. Most high grade VURs could be detected by US and DMSA scan, but the prediction rate was not as high in low grade VURs. However, we can anticipate spontaneous improvement without complications in patients with either low or high grade reflux and negative findings on US and DMSA scan.[Technetium 99m labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (99m Tc-DMSA) scintigraphy in the diagnosis and follow-up of urinary infections in children].The site of a urinary tract infection (UTI) is located by clinical findings plus imaging techniques. Renal imaging with technetium 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc-DMSA) has shown promise but its efficacy for detecting acute pyelonephritis is still debated as is its ability to differentiate between acute, potentially curable disease and scarring, definitive changes.The files of all the 166 patients that underwent one or two (32 patients) 99mTc-DMSA imaging sessions for UTI in 1989 and 1990 in our department were analysed. The results of this technique were compared with the clinical and laboratory data and with those of other imaging techniques (ultrasonography and retrograde voiding cystourethrogram). The patients (92 girls and 74 boys, mean age: 5 years, range 15 days-17 years) were assigned to one of 3 categories: 1) acute pyelonephritis (27 patients), 2) low UTI (60 patients) and 3) uncertain UTI (79 patients), on the basis of the clinical and laboratory data.The first 99mTc-DMSA imaging was normal in 110 children; changes were unilateral in 45 and bilateral in 11 children. Images suggesting either acute or chronic changes were observed respectively in 19 and 48 children. 4 of the 7 acute changes were normalized on the second radioisotope scanning while 2 became worse; 19 of the 23 chronic changes were unchanged at the second scanning. Radioisotope scanning changes were seen in 81% of the patients classified as acute pyelonephritis and in only 27% of those with lower UTI. Reflux was detected in 56% of abnormal kidneys and in 36% of normal kidneys. The results of radioisotope scanning and ultrasound scan findings were not correlated in 24 patients (19 only abnormal radioisotope imaging, 5 only abnormal ultrasound scan).DMSA scans are useful for investigating and following UTI. They help to distinguish acute pyelonephritis and lower UTI. It is a reliable method of detecting structural abnormalities and identifying children at risk of progressive renal damage.[Urinary tract infection and biological markers: C-reactive protein, interleukins and procalcitonin].Serum C reactive protein (CRP) remains a good marker of the severity of urinary tract infections in children, despite false negative results. Serum IL-6 is not a better marker; urinary IL-6 might have a better prognostic value as it is higher in patients with renal lesions due to infection, but low values are found in some cases. Serum procalcitonin levels are correlated with the importance of renal scars at scintigraphy, with less than 10% of false negative results. Further studies are needed to confirm the sensitivity and sensibility of these markers, especially for procalcitonin.[Evaluation of inflammatory and renal injury markers in youngest children with pyelonephritis].Pyelonephritis (PN) is frequent bacterial infections in young infants and very important because may cause parenchymal scarring. Early confirmation of bacterial infection and application the appropriate treatment before obtaining result of urine culture, reduce probability of parenchymal scarring.To evaluate the useful of inflammatory and renal injury markers: serum procalcitonin (PCT), tumor necrosis factor alpha (TNF-alpha) and injury renal marker alpha1--microglobulin (A1M) measurement, in comparison with C-reactive protein concentration and abnormal urinary tract, in neonates and young infants with pyelonephritis.Investigation was performed in two groups: I group--23 children with PN (1 to 24 weeks of age), and K group--30 healthy children aged from 1 to 24 weeks. Serum concentration of CRP was measured by immunonephelometric assay, PCT by immunoluminometric assay, TNF alpha by ELISA method, and urinary A1M by nephelometric assay.In control group (K) medians of all investigated markers were below minimum of detection. PN patients (I) had the highest PCT TNF-alpha, A1M and CRP concentration before treatment and normal results after antibiotic treatment. Using a cut-off: of 0.5 mg/dl for CRP, 0.5 ng/ml for PCT 15 pg/ml for TNF-alpha and 10 mg/g cr for A1M, sensitivity and specificity in children with pyelonephritis were: for CRP 100% and 62.5%, for PCT 81.8% and 87.2%, for TNF alpha 77.1% and 93.1% and A1M 70.4% and 56.1%, respectively. A positive correlation between serum PCT and CRP and TNF alpha was found. Very high concentration all markers were in patients with vesicoureteral reflux and 1 patient with hydronephrosis.In early diagnostics of PN (before obtaining results of urine culture) in youngest children, determination of concentration PCT and TNF alpha, has higher value than determination of CRP, taking into concentration high sensitivity and specificity for bacterial infection.Comparative efficacies of procalcitonin and conventional inflammatory markers for prediction of renal parenchymal inflammation in pediatric first urinary tract infection.To compare the reliability of procalcitonin (PCT) with conventional laboratory parameters in predicting for renal parenchymal inflammation (RPI).The study cohort consisted of 57 children who were admitted for a first-episode urinary tract infection. All patients underwent measurement of the leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), and serum PCT. RPI was evaluated by technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy within 7 days of admission. If the first DMSA findings were abnormal, another analysis was performed 6 months later. The cutoff points for ESR, CRP, and PCT were established by comparing the areas under their receiver operating characteristic curves. Statistical analysis was performed using 1-way analysis of variance.Of the 57 children, 27 were diagnosed with RPI on the basis of positive DMSA results. The ESR, CRP, and PCT levels were significantly greater (P < .001) in the patients with RPI than in those without RPI. In contrast, the leukocyte count was the same in both groups (P > .05). PCT was a more sensitive and specific marker for differentiating upper and lower urinary tract infection than ESR and CRP. Persistent lesions at the site of previous RPI were found in 12 patients in the follow-up DMSA analysis, with total regression evident in the remaining 15. The PCT levels were significantly greater in those with persistent renal lesions than in those with total regression (P = .005).Serum PCT is a more reliable biologic marker than the ESR, CRP, or leukocyte count for the early prediction of RPI in children with a first episode of urinary tract infection. In addition, the greater the elevation of PCT at admission, the more positive the correlation for subsequent permanent renal damage.Randomised controlled trial of three day versus 10 day intravenous antibiotics in acute pyelonephritis: effect on renal scarring.Acute pyelonephritis often leaves children with permanent renal scarring.To compare the prevalence of scarring following initial treatment with antibiotics administered intravenously for 10 or three days.In a prospective two centre trial, 220 patients aged 3 months to 16 years with positive urine culture and acute renal lesions on initial DMSA scintigraphy, were randomly assigned to receive intravenous ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg once daily) for 10 or three days, followed by oral cefixime (4 mg/kg twice daily) to complete a 15 day course. After three months, scintigraphy was repeated in order to diagnose renal scars.Renal scarring developed in 33% of the 110 children in the 10 day intravenous group and 36% of the 110 children in the three day group. Children older than 1 year had more renal scarring than infants (42% (54/129) and 24% (22/91), respectively). After adjustment for age, sex, duration of fever before treatment, degree of inflammation, presence of vesicoureteric reflux, and the patients' recruitment centres, there was no significant difference between the two treatments on renal scarring. During follow up, 15 children had recurrence of urinary infection with no significant difference between the two treatment groups.In children with acute pyelonephritis, initial intravenous treatment for 10 days, compared with three days, does not significantly reduce the development of renal scarring.The role of procalcitonin for acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring in infants and young children.We assessed the usefulness of procalcitonin as a biological marker in diagnosing acute pyelonephritis and for predicting subsequent renal scarring in young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.Children 2 years old or younger with a first febrile urinary tract infection were prospectively studied. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan within 5 days of admission and after 6 months. Serum samples from all patients were tested for procalcitonin, C-reactive protein and white blood cell count measurements.The 112 enrolled patients (age range 24 days to 24 months old) were divided into acute pyelonephritis (76) and lower urinary tract infection (36) groups according to the results of (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans. Median values of procalcitonin, C-reactive protein and white blood cell count at hospitalization were significantly higher in patients with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower urinary tract infection. The area under receiver operating characteristic curves showed that procalcitonin was superior to C-reactive protein and white blood cell count as a marker for diagnosing acute pyelonephritis. Initial and post-antibiotic treatment procalcitonin values were significantly higher in children with renal scarring than in those without scarring (p <0.001). Procalcitonin values at hospitalization and after treatment were independent predictors of later renal scarring on logistic regression analysis.Our results indicate the superior diagnostic accuracy of procalcitonin for predicting acute pyelonephritis in children 2 years old or younger. Higher initial and posttreatment procalcitonin values are independent risk factors for later renal scarring.Urinary tract infection in children.Two hundred and eighty-five children under 15 years old (169 boys and 116 girls) who had urinary tract infection (UTI) were admitted to our hospital during the period July 1995 to June 1998. Clinical presentation, laboratory data and image studies were recognized and analyzed. Most patients were younger than 2 years of age. Fever is the most common sign, especially in young children. With the urinary dipstick test a low positive rate of nitrite reaction (34.7%) was found. E. coli is the most common pathogen and exclusively resistant to ampicillin (90.2%). The E. coli is also relatively resistant to trimethoprim/sulfamethoxazole (57.1%). Voiding cystourethrogram was performed in 187 cases, in which 24.6% of those patients showed vesicoureteric reflux. Ninety-eight children received 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans and 62 cases (63.3%) had abnormal findings compatible with pyelonephritis. The positive predictive values by renal ultrasonography for vesicoureteric reflux and pyelonephritis are 30.7% and 78.9%, respectively. In pyelonephritis patients, only 37% also had a vesicoureteric reflux. The fever duration and clinical inflammatory parameters were evaluated in all patients. Longer febrile periods are the risk of vesicoureteric reflux and pyelonephritis, and a high C-reactive protein concentration indicates the risk of pyelonephritis. In conclusion, fever was the most common sign in young UTI children who had a low positive nitrite reaction rate in the dipstick test. E. coli was the most common pathogen with a high ampicillin resistance in Taiwan. Only 37% pyelonephritis patients had refluxing nephropathy. It is indicated that pyelonephritis is not always attributed to reflux of infected urine. A longer febrile period and a high C-reactive protein level are good indicators for prediction of the risk of pyelonephritis in UTI patients.Prophylaxis after first febrile urinary tract infection in children? A multicenter, randomized, controlled, noninferiority trial.Febrile urinary tract infections are common in children and associated with the risk for renal scarring and long-term complications. Antimicrobial prophylaxis has been used to reduce the risk for recurrence. We performed a study to determine whether no prophylaxis is similar to antimicrobial prophylaxis for 12 months in reducing the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections in children after a first febrile urinary tract infection.The study was a controlled, randomized, open-label, 2-armed, noninferiority trial comparing no prophylaxis with prophylaxis (co-trimoxazole 15 mg/kg per day or co-amoxiclav 15 mg/kg per day) for 12 months. A total of 338 children who were aged 2 months to <7 years and had a first episode of febrile urinary tract infection were enrolled: 309 with a confirmed pyelonephritis on a technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan with or without reflux and 27 with a clinical pyelonephritis and reflux. The primary end point was recurrence rate of febrile urinary tract infections during 12 months. Secondary end point was the rate of renal scarring produced by recurrent urinary tract infections on technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan after 12 months.Intention-to-treat analysis showed no significant differences in the primary outcome between no prophylaxis and prophylaxis: 12 (9.45%) of 127 vs 15 (7.11%) of 211. In the subgroup of children with reflux, the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections was 9 (19.6%) of 46 on no prophylaxis and 10 (12.1%) of 82 on prophylaxis. No significant difference was found in the secondary outcome: 2 (1.9%) of 108 on no prophylaxis versus 2 (1.1%) of 187 on prophylaxis. Bivariate analysis and Cox proportional hazard model showed that grade III reflux was a risk factor for recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. Whereas increasing age was protective, use of no prophylaxis was not a risk factor.For children with or without primary nonsevere reflux, prophylaxis does not reduce the rate of recurrent febrile urinary tract infections after the first episode.Post-pyelonephritic renal scars are not associated with vesicoureteral reflux in children.Children with pyelonephritis are at risk for renal damage. We assess the value of clinical signs and urological abnormalities in predicting renal scars in children following pyelonephritis.A total of 64 hospitalized children (29 females and 35 males, median age 2.9 years) underwent ultrasonography and technetium labeled dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy imaging within 1 week following the diagnosis of the first pyelonephritis. Voiding cystourethrography was performed 8 weeks after the diagnosis. Followup DMSA scintigraphy was performed in 58 patients after 2 years of followup.Urological abnormalities observed were vesicoureteral reflux (VUR, grade 2 or higher) in 11 patients (19%), nonrefluxing and nonobstructed megaureter in 2 (4%) and pyeloureteral obstruction in 1 (2%). The first DMSA scintigraphy showed parenchymal defects in 48% of patients. VUR did not increase the risk of renal defects. At 2 years after the infection 12 of the 58 patients (21%) had renal scars. Nine of these patients did not have VUR. However, 2 patients with high grade VUR and repeat infections demonstrated deterioration of kidney function during followup. The patients with renal scars were older than those without scars (3.1 vs 0.8 years, p = 0.0291) at the time of infection.Renal scars after first pyelonephritis are in most cases not associated with abnormalities of the urinary tract, but are caused by the infection itself. However, structural abnormalities may predispose to recurrent infections. Following pyelonephritis new renal scars may develop in all age groups in both sexes.Early (99m)Tc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.Level diagnosis of symptomatic urinary tract infections in childhood.As no method for localization of urinary tract infection has been shown to be absolutely reliable, six procedures have been carried out simultaneously in 25 girls with acute symptomatic infections and the reliability of each method assessed. While clinical diagnosis of pyelonephritis or cystitis correlated well with the overall results of the battery of tests, the reliability of individual tests varied. Highest reliability was obtained with CRP determinations followed by antibody titration, sedimentation rate, and renal concentrating capacity. In the bladder washout test only 8 of the 14 patients with pyelonephritis had findings clearly indicating high infection. Intermittent or inadequate discharge of bacteria from the renal parenchyma is suggested as the major source for this inaccuracy. In fact, half of the 42 final washout specimens from girls with acute pyelonephritis contained less than 1000 bacteria per ml, indicating that low numbers of organisms in ureteric urine is common in childhood pyelonephritis.Bacterial virulence factors are associated with occurrence of acute pyelonephritis but not renal scarring.We evaluated the influence of patient factors and virulence factors of uropathogenic Escherichia coli on the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal parenchymal scarring.We evaluated 80 boys and 45 girls 1 to 180 months old with febrile urinary tract infections who underwent renal scan to diagnose acute pyelonephritis and followup dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy at least 6 months later. Urinalysis, white blood cell count, uropathogenic E. coli genotype and vesicoureteral reflux were measured. Voiding cystourethrogram was investigated after acute pyelonephritis was confirmed by renal scan and acute inflammation subsided, about 2 to 4 weeks later.Acute pyelonephritis was significantly more likely to develop in children with urinary tract infections and persistent fever before and after hospitalization, elevated C-reactive protein or positive renal ultrasound findings. E. coli strains with the papG II and iha genes were significantly more likely to occur in patients with acute pyelonephritis. Patients with a fever for more than 3 days and C-reactive protein levels greater than 90.8 mg/l were significantly more likely to have renal scarring. Age was not an independent predictor of acute pyelonephritis, but modified the effect of virulence factors on the development of acute pyelonephritis.Bacterial virulence factors and host factors are associated with the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis. Host factors such as patient age and vesicoureteral reflux severity modify the influence of virulence factors, although only host factors are associated with the occurrence of renal scarring.Prospective, randomized trial comparing short and long intravenous antibiotic treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children: dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphic evaluation at 9 months.We report a prospective, randomized, multicenter trial that compared the effect of 3 vs 8 days of intravenous ceftriaxone treatment on the incidence of renal scarring at 6 to 9 months of follow-up in 383 children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.After initial treatment with intravenous netilmicin and ceftriaxone, patients were randomly assigned to either 5 days of oral antibiotics (short intravenous treatment) or 5 days of intravenous ceftriaxone (long intravenous treatment). Inclusion criteria were age 3 months to 16 years and first acute pyelonephritis episode, defined by fever of >38.5 degrees C, C-reactive protein level of >20 mg/L, and bacteriuria at >10(5)/mL. All patients underwent 99m technetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy 6 to 9 months after inclusion. A total of 548 children were included, 48 of whom were secondarily excluded and 117 of whom were lost to follow-up or had incomplete data; therefore, 383 children were eligible, 205 of them in the short intravenous treatment group and 178 in the long intravenous treatment group.At inclusion, median age was 15 months, median duration of fever was 43 hours, and median C-reactive protein level was 122 mg/L. A total of 37% (143 of 383) of patients had a vesicoureteral reflux grades 1 to 3. Patient characteristics at inclusion were similar in both groups, except for a significantly higher proportion of girls in the short intravenous treatment group. The frequency of renal scars at scintigraphy was similar in both groups. Multivariate analysis demonstrated that renal scars were significantly associated with increased renal height at initial ultrasound and with the presence of grade 3 vesicoureteric reflux.The incidence of renal scars was similar in patients who received 3 days compared 8 days of intravenous ceftriaxone. Increased renal height at initial ultrasound examination and grade 3 vesicoureteric reflux were significant risk factors for renal scars.99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children: relation to clinical and radiological findings.Seventy-two children, 59 girls and 13 boys, 0.1-15.9 (median 1.1) years of age, with acute pyelonephritis (APN) were investigated with the aid of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasonography (US) and a desmopressin test within 5 days of admission. Sixty-two children were reinvestigated approximately 2 months later when intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cysto-urethrography were also performed. During infection, 92% of the children showed changes in the DMSA scan with 69% by US, and the two investigations agreed in 58% of the kidneys. At follow-up, 68% showed changes in the DMSA scan, 47% by US and 48% by IVU. The DMSA scan and IVU agreed in 60% of the kidneys. Twenty-nine percent of the children had vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). The presence of grade greater than or equal to 3 VUR was associated with greater defects on the DMSA scan during infection, and at follow-up with a higher frequency of persistent changes compared with no VUR (P less than 0.02 and 0.01, respectively). During infection the size of the defect on the DMSA scan correlated with renal volume and C-reactive protein and inversely with the glomerular filtration rate, and at follow-up it correlated inversely with the renal concentration capacity. The DMSA scan is a sensitive method for diagnosing and localizing APN in children, and findings on DMSA scan show a weak but significant correlation with routine clinical and radiological parameters. It is suggested that persistent renal damage after APN in children without VUR may be more common than previously assumed.The importance of 99mTc DMSA scanning in the localization of childhood urinary tract infections.The use of 99mTechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc DMSA) scanning for the early diagnosis of upper urinary tract infections has been preferred for a few years. In this research we investigated the use of 99mTc DMSA scanning in the localization of renal parenchymal involvement in urinary tract infection. Twenty-four children presenting with first acute urinary tract infection were studied. Investigations included physical examination, white blood cell count (WBC), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), antibody-coated bacteria (ACB) and early 99mTc DMSA scanning. 99mTc DMSA scanning was taken as the gold standard method in determining renal parenchymal inflammation. According to the 99mTc DMSA scanning the sensitivity of clinical findings was 57.14%, WBC 23.80%, ESR 33.33%, CRP 14.28% and ACB 71.42% in the localization of urinary tract infection. We propose early 99mTc DMSA scanning performed around the time of infection as a good technique for localization of the level of infection in the urinary tract.Treatment of children with acute pyelonephritis: a prospective randomized study.The aim of this study was to compare, in children with acute pyelonephritis, the efficacy of 7 days' (group A) and 3 days' (group B) intravenous antibiotics, both followed by an oral treatment. Children were randomized after 3 days of intravenous treatment. Technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy was performed within the first days after admission and repeated 6 months later. Total or partial persistence of renal abnormalities on the 6-month DMSA scintigraphy was used as the endpoint of the study. Among the 92 children included in the study, 87 were followed for at least 6 months (43 in group A and 44 in group B) and were eligible for analysis. Late DMSA was abnormal in 9 kidneys of group A and 12 kidneys of group B, representing respectively 24% and 44% of kidneys with abnormalities on the initial DMSA (difference statistically not significant). When the patients were stratified according to the delay of treatment, the percentage of patients with sequelae in group A was comparable, whether the delay was less or more than 1 week. In group B, the percentage of patients with sequelae was significantly higher (P<0.01) when the delay was more than 1 week.[Usefulness of renal scintigraphy in the assessment of the first febrile urinary infection in children].The objective of this study was to compare the findings of renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection to determine which method is better in detecting patients at risk of renal injury or reflux.Thirty-three children between 0.2 and 12.3 years of age with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection were studied by means of clinical and laboratory assessment, renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy. In 24 patients (72.7%) a voiding cystourethrography was made. The patients were divided into two groups, those under 2 years of age (n = 14) and those over 2 years old (n = 19).Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 23 patients (69.7%) and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 2 (6.1%; p < 0.05). Children over 2 years of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (84.2% vs 50%; p < 0.05). There were no differences between girls and boys. Reflux was demonstrated in 13 patients (54.2%). Among those kidneys which presented abnormal cortical scintigraphy, vesicoureteral reflux was present in 76.5% of the studies. Furthermore, of those with abnormal ultrasonography vesicoureteral reflux was present in 17.6%.We found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection. The cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes. The incidence of vesicoureteral reflux in febrile urinary tract infection is high. When there is a renal cortical defect the risk of reflux is higher. This suggests that cortical scintigraphy should be added to the initial examination of children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection and this could be supplemented by voiding cystourethrography alone, with ultrasonography having a secondary role.Urinary proteins in children with urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to test our hypothesis that the urinary excretion of C-reactive protein (CRP), alpha 1-microglobulin (A1M), retinol-binding protein (RBP) and Clara cell protein (CC16) is increased in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) and relates to renal damage as measured by acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. Fifty-two children <2 years of age with UTI were enrolled in the study, 44 of whom were febrile. The control group consisted of 23 patients with non-UTI infection and elevated serum CRP (s-CRP) levels. Thirty-six patients had abnormal DMSA uptake, classified as mild, moderate or severe damage (DMSA class 1, 2, 3, respectively). There was a significant association between DMSA class and the excretion of urinary RBP (u-RBP) and u-CC16. There was also a significant difference in u-CRP levels between children with UTI and control children with non-UTI infections, although u-CRP excretion was not significantly correlated to DMSA class. In conclusion, the urinary excretion of the low-molecular-weight proteins RBP and CC16 showed a strong association with uptake defects on renal DMSA scans. The urinary level of CRP seems to distinguish between children with UTI and other febrile conditions. A combination of these biomarkers may be useful in the clinical assessment of children with UTI.Predictive factors for acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with first febrile urinary tract infection.We assessed predictive factors for acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.A total of 89 girls and 138 boys with a first febrile urinary tract infection were included in the study. We analyzed radiological (ultrasound, dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy, voiding cystourethrogram), clinical (age, gender, peak fever, therapeutic delay time) and laboratory (complete blood count with differential count, absolute neutrophil count, blood urea nitrogen, creatinine, urinalysis, Gram's stain, culture, C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate) variables. Dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy was performed within 5 days and at 6 months after diagnosis of urinary tract infection. Voiding cystourethrogram was performed after the acute phase of the urinary tract infection. Predictive factors for acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation were assessed using logistic regression analysis.Of 227 patients enrolled 140 had a refluxing and 87 a nonrefluxing urinary tract infection. On logistic regression analysis therapeutic delay time (p = 0.001) and presence of reflux (p = 0.011) were predictive of acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation (p = 0.001 and p = 0.0001, respectively) in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.Since vesicoureteral reflux is the common risk factor for acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation, voiding cystourethrogram must be considered as an initial study in patients with acute febrile urinary tract infection.Value of imaging studies after a first febrile urinary tract infection in young children: data from Italian renal infection study 1.We examined the diagnostic accuracy of routine imaging studies (ultrasonography and micturating cystography) for predicting long-term parenchymal renal damage after a first febrile urinary tract infection.This study addressed the secondary objective of a prospective trial evaluating different antibiotic regimens for the treatment of acute pyelonephritis. Data for 300 children < or =2 years of age, with normal prenatal ultrasound results, who completed the diagnostic follow-up evaluation (ultrasonography and technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning within 10 days, cystography within 2 months, and repeat technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning at 12 months to detect scarring) were analyzed. Outcome measures were sensitivity, specificity, and negative and positive predictive values for ultrasonography and cystography in predicting parenchymal renal damage on the 12-month technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans.The kidneys and urinary tracts were mostly normal. The acute technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans showed pyelonephritis in 54% of cases. Renal scarring developed in 15% of cases. The ultrasonographic and cystographic findings were poor predictors of long-term damage, showing minor sonographic abnormalities for 12 and reflux for 23 of the 45 children who subsequently developed scarring.The benefit of performing ultrasonography and scintigraphy in the acute phase or cystourethrography is minimal. Our findings support (1) technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy 6 months after infection to detect scarring that may be related to long-term hypertension, proteinuria, and renal function impairment (although the degree of scarring was generally minor and did not impair renal function) and (2) continued surveillance to identify recurrent urinary tract infections that may warrant further investigation.Urine interleukin-1beta in children with acute pyelonephritis and renal scarring.Acute pyelonephritis is a common infectious disease in children and can result in permanent renal damage. Interleukin (IL)-1beta is an important inflammatory mediator that appears early during bacterial infection. This prospective study examined urine IL-1beta levels in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, and also evaluated whether this cytokine correlated with renal scarring.A total of 75 children aged 1-121 months with a diagnosis of first-time febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) were studied. The following inflammatory markers were assessed: fever, white blood cell (WBC), neutrophil, C-reactive protein (CRP) and urine IL-1beta. Urine samples were collected for IL-1beta measurement by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay before and after antibiotic treatment of the infection. Follow-up DMSA scan was performed at 6-12 months after the acute pyelonephritis to detect renal scarring. Twenty children with other febrile illnesses served as non-renal febrile controls.The 75 children were divided into acute pyelonephritis (n = 41) and lower UTI (n = 34) groups according to the findings of DMSA scans. Fever, WBC count, neutrophil count and CRP were significantly higher in the children with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower UTI (all P < 0.001). The initial urine IL-1beta levels of children with acute pyelonephritis were significantly higher when compared with lower UTI and non-renal febrile controls (P < 0.001). Urine IL-1beta in children with acute pyelonephritis was positively correlated with fever, CRP, WBC, neutrophil and leucocyturia. Renal scarring was found in 12 (29.3%) of the 41 children with acute pyelonephritis. The mean age was significantly lower in the children with renal scarring compared with those without (P < 0.05).These results have shown that urine IL-1beta level may serve as a useful marker for the early detection of acute pyelonephritis in febrile children. Young children are at a risk of the development of renal scarring following acute pyelonephritis.Symptomatic urinary tract infection in preschool Australian children.To describe the demographic and clinical features, short-term outcomes, microbiology and renal tract abnormalities of a cohort of young Australian children with symptomatic urinary tract infection.A total of 304 children < 5 years with their first documented symptomatic urinary tract infection who presented consecutively to the Emergency Department of a paediatric hospital between March 1993 and December 1994 and without a known predisposing cause were identified and details of their acute illness were recorded. Renal tract sonography, micturating cystourethrography and Tc-99 m dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA) were routinely performed.Of those who presented with urinary tract infection, 169 were boys and 135 girls; 64% were less than 1 year of age. For children from the local community, the cumulative incidence of urinary tract infection within the first 5 years of life was estimated to be 1.9% for boys and 1.8% for girls. There were no significant differences in illness characteristics according to mode of referral or geographical locality. Presenting symptoms were generally nonspecific and not referrable to the urinary tract. There were no deaths. One per cent of children required ventilatory support, and bacteraemia occurred in 6%, all of whom were under 6 months of age. E. coli was the causal organism in 84%, and a high in vitro resistance to ampicillin/ amoxycillin (54%) was demonstrated by the pathogens isolated. Bacteriuria was eradicated in 99% with antimicrobial treatment. In this setting, the sensitivities of dipstick urinalysis (leucocyte esterase+/-nitrites) and pyuria on microscopy (>10 x 10(6) white cells L(-1)) were 85%. Abnormal DMSA scintigraphy was detected in 39%, vesicoureteric reflux in 28%, and obstructive uropathy in 1%.This study provides current and local data on a large sample of children <5 years with urinary tract infection, which are useful to clinicians who manage children at risk of the condition.Cortical scintigraphy in the evaluation of renal parenchymal changes in children with pyelonephritis.We designed a prospective study to evaluate the ability of dimercaptosuccinic acid cortical scintigraphy and ultrasonography to detect renal parenchymal lesions in children with pyelonephritis. One hundred eleven patients 1 week to 16 years of age (median 5.5 months) with a urine culture positive for pathogens were included in the study; cortical scintigraphy and ultrasonography were repeated in 25 children after a mean follow-up of 10.5 months. Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 74 children (67%), and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 39 (35%) (p < 0.001); results of the two examinations were discordant in 49 patients (kappa = 0.19). Children more than 1 year of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (85% vs 66%; p = 0.04). The presence of inflammatory signs (erythrocyte sedimentation rate or C-reactive protein) had an 89% sensitivity and a 25% specificity in identifying renal lesions. Among children with renal changes, vesicoureteric reflux was present in 39%. At follow-up examination, 16 children (64%) had scars. Thus we found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with pyelonephritis. We found that cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes, and we believe that it should be added to the initial examination of children with suspected pyelonephritis.Diagnostic significance of clinical and laboratory findings to localize site of urinary infection.The aim of this study was to define in children younger than 2 years of age the diagnostic significance of clinical and laboratory findings to localize site of febrile urinary tract infection. We reviewed the records of 185 children younger than 2 years of age admitted to hospital with febrile urinary tract infection. Patients were divided into having either acute pyelonephritis or acute cystitis according to the presence or absence of acute lesions on dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy. Clinical and laboratory [white blood cell count (WBC), urinalysis, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP)] findings were compared between the two groups using Student's t test, chi-square test, and multivariate analysis. Patients with pyelonephritis had statistically significant higher age, WBC, ESR, and CRP than those with cystitis. Although the sensitivity of the tests was 80-100%, their specificity was <28%. On multivariate analysis, 33% of patients with cystitis were diagnosed as having pyelonephritis, whereas 22% of those with pyelonephritis were considered to have cystitis. Given the low specificity of clinical findings and available laboratory tests to define the site of urine infection in this age group, we recommend DMSA renal scintigram as the test of choice to make the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in these patients.Diagnostic significance of 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in urinary tract infection.A total of 106 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (73 girls and 33 boys, 0-15.9 years of age) were studied by means of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasound, and a desmopressin test during infection and at follow up approximately two months later. At follow up they were also investigated by means of intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cystourethrography (MCU). During infection 23 children had a normal DMSA scan while 83 children had an abnormal one. The median C reactive protein and SD score for renal concentration capacity in the former group were 15 (range < 10-178) mg/l and -1.0 SD score (range -2.4 to 1.8), respectively, and in the latter group 98 (range < 10-320) mg/l and -3.1 SD score (range -5.7 to 1.1), respectively. In the former group there was no significant finding in any child on ultrasound or IVU and only one had significant vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) (grade 3). At follow up 51 children had a normal DMSA scan while 55 children showed persistent changes. The median SD score for renal concentration capacity in the former group was -0.9 SD score (range -3.2 to 1.4) and in the latter group -1.6 SD score (range -4.6 to 2.5). No significant changes were found in the former group on ultrasound or IVU and only two children had significant VUR (grade 3). In the latter group 20 children showed changes on ultrasound, 15 showed changes on IVU, and 23 had VUR. These results suggest that a normal DMSA scan during or approximately two months after urinary tract infection in children indicates a low risk of finding significant pathology of the urinary tract.Urinary lactic dehydrogenase and serum C-reactive protein as means of localizing the site of urinary tract infection in patients with ileal conduits.Many patients with ileal conduit urinary diversion have infected urine but far fewer have clinical pyelonephritis. A noninvasive diagnostic test to distinguish renal bacteriuria from conduit colonization in these patients would seem desirable. Urine total lactic dehydrogenase and lactic dehydrogenase isoenzymes, and serum C-reactive protein have been useful to distinguish pyelonephritis from cystitis in patients with intact urinary tracts. We used these tests in patients with ileal conduits who had urine containing more and less than 10(5) organisms per ml. All patients had elevated urine total lactic dehydrogenase-5 isoenzyme, and serum C-reactive protein. No statistically significant difference in any of these parameters existed between the groups. These results may indicate that all patients with conduits have pyelonephritis but only intermittently demonstrate bacteriuria, or that the conduit mucosa contributes lactic dehydrogenase to the urine. However, it does not appear that these tests alone can distinguish accurately renal bacteriuria from conduit colonization.Serum and urine levels of interleukin-6 and interleukin-8 in children with acute pyelonephritis.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common clinical disorder in younger infants and children and may result in permanent renal damage. The inflammatory cytokines interleukin (IL)-6 and IL-8 play an important role in response to bacterial infection. This prospective study investigated the association between serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8 levels and acute pyelonephritis confirmed by (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. A total of 78 children aged 1-121 months with a diagnosis of first-time febrile UTI were included. The following inflammatory markers were assessed: fever; white blood cells count (WBC); C-reactive protein (CRP); and serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8. The patients were divided into the acute pyelonephritis group (n=42) and the lower UTI group (n=36) according to the results of DMSA scan. Fever, WBC and CRP levels were significantly higher in children with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower UTI (all p <0.001). Significantly, higher initial serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8 levels were found in children with acute pyelonephritis than in those with lower UTI (all p <0.001). Serum and urine IL-6 in children with acute pyelonephritis were positively correlated with fever, CRP and leucocyturia. These results indicate that both serum and urine IL-6 and IL-8 levels, particularly IL-6, are useful diagnostic tools for early recognition of acute pyelonephritis in febrile children.Usefulness of procalcitonin and C-reactive protein rapid tests for the management of children with urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common problem in children. Because clinical findings and commonly used blood indices are nonspecific, the distinction between lower and upper urinary tract infection cannot be made easily in this population. However, this distinction is important because renal infection can induce parenchymal scarring. The objective of this study was to determine the accuracy of procalcitonin (PCT) compared with C-reactive protein (CRP) rapid tests to predict renal involvement in children with febrile UTI.PCT and CRP were measured in the blood of children admitted to the emergency room with fever, signs and symptoms of urinary tract infection and/or a positive urine dipstick analysis. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by a 99mTc-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan in the acute phase of infection in all children. Sensitivity, specificity and likelihood ratios were determined for both tests.Fifty-four children with a proven urinary tract infection were enrolled: 63% had renal involvement; and 37% had infection restricted to the lower urinary tract. No difference was found for age, sex and total white blood cell count between the groups. The calculated likelihood ratios of procalcitonin and C-reactive protein rapid tests were between 3.8 and 7 and 1.5 and 2.8, respectively. A positive PCT value predicted renal involvement in 87 to 92% of children with febrile UTI, compared with 44 to 83% using CRP values.A rapid determination of procalcitonin concentration could be useful for the management of children with febrile UTI in the emergency room.Cytokine profiles of pediatric patients treated with antibiotics for pyelonephritis: potential therapeutic impact.Urinary tract infections are common in infants and children. Pyelonephritis may result in serious complications, such as renal scarring, hypertension, and renal failure. Identification of the timing of release of inflammatory cytokines in relation to pyelonephritis and its treatment is essential for designing interventions that would minimize tissue damage. To this end, we measured urinary cytokine concentrations of interleukin-1 beta (IL-1 beta), IL-6, and IL-8 in infants and children with pyelonephritis and in healthy children. Children that presented to our institution with presumed urinary tract infection were given the diagnosis of pyelonephritis if they had a positive urine culture, pyuria, and one or more of the following indicators of systemic involvement: fever, elevated peripheral white blood cell count, or elevated C-reactive protein. Urine samples were obtained at the time of presentation prior to the administration of antibiotics, immediately after completion of the first dose of antibiotics, and at follow up 12 to 24 h after presentation. IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 concentrations were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Creatinine concentrations were also determined, and cytokine/creatinine ratios were calculated to standardize samples. Differences between pre-antibiotic and follow-up cytokine/creatinine ratios were significant for IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 (P < 0.01). Differences between pre-antibiotic and control cytokine/creatinine ratios were also significant for IL-1 beta, IL-6, and IL-8 (P < 0.01). Our study revealed that the urinary tract cytokine response to infection is intense but dissipates shortly after the initiation of antibiotic treatment. This suggests that renal damage due to inflammation begins early in infection, underscoring the need for rapid diagnosis and intervention.Procalcitonin is a marker of severity of renal lesions in pyelonephritis.In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin levels, a recently described marker of infection. We compared it with other commonly used inflammatory markers and evaluated its ability to predict renal involvement as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein, leukocyte counts, and procalcitonin levels were measured in 80 children, 1 month to 16 years of age, admitted for suspected pyelonephritis. Renal involvement was assessed by 99mTe-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 5 days after admission. The examination was repeated at least 3 months later if the first result was abnormal.In lower UTI, the mean procalcitonin (PCT) was 0.38 micrograms/L +/- 0.19 compared with 5.37 micrograms/L +/- 1.9 in pyelonephritis. In these two groups, respectively, leukocyte counts were 10939/mm3 +/- 834 and 17429/mm3 +/- 994, and C-reactive protein (CRP) levels were 30.3 mg/L +/- 7.6 and 120.8 mg/L +/- 8.9. When inflammatory markers were correlated to the severity of the renal lesion as ranked by DMSA scintigraphy, we found a highly significant correlation with plasma levels of PCT, but borderline significance with CRP and none with leukocyte counts. Patients without vesicoureteral reflux had a mean PCT of 5.16 micrograms/L +/- 2.33, which was not significantly different from that in patients with reflux who had a mean PCT of 5.76 micrograms/L +/- 3.49. For the prediction of renal lesions at admission, CRP had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 26.1%. The sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 70.3% and 82.6%, respectively.We conclude that serum PCT levels were increased significantly in children with febrile UTI when renal parenchymal involvement (assessed by DMSA scintigraphy) was present and allowed for prediction of patients at risk of severe renal lesions.Color and power Doppler sonography versus DMSA scintigraphy in acute pyelonephritis and in prediction of renal scarring.Capabilities of color and power Doppler sonography (DS) were prospectively evaluated for diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and for prediction of scarring by comparison with 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA).Fifty-seven children (mean age, 5 +/- 3 y) with acute pyelonephritis were investigated by biologic testing, DS (DS 1), and DMSA (DMSA 1). Patients who were <6 mo old or had high-grade reflux or obstruction were excluded. Forty-five children had a clinical follow-up examination, biologic testing, DS (DS 2), and DMSA (DMSA 2) at a mean of 7 +/- 2 mo after acute infection. Sonography (gray-scale and DS) was performed by 1 experienced radiologist who was unaware of patient data. DMSA studies were interpreted by 2 physicians who were unaware of patient data.Temperature, neutrophil count, and C-reactive protein value were significantly higher in patients with abnormal DMSA 1 findings than in those with abnormal DS 1 findings (P < 0.05). When compared with DMSA 1, DS 1 had a sensitivity and specificity of 80% and 81%, respectively. At follow-up, all clinical and biologic data had normalized. Scarring after infection occurred in 51% of children. When compared with DMSA 2, DS 1 had positive and negative predictive values of 57% and 75%, respectively, and DMSA 1 had respective values of 62% and 100%. Reflux was not considered a good predictor of scarring.DS and DMSA results were concordant in 81% of kidneys with acute pyelonephritis. The predictive value of DS for renal scarring was not considered sufficiently high for DS to be used in routine practice.99mTc-DMSA scintigraphy in acute urinary tract infection in children.24 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI) underwent systematically ultrasound studies (US) and 99mTc-DMSA renal scans. Among the 15 patients considered as acute pyelonephritis (APN) on clinical grounds, the scan was abnormal in 12 cases, in contrast with only 1 abnormal scan in the clinical subgroup of the lower UTI. Among the 10 abnormal scans that were repeated later on, 6 did completely normalize. US showed only once a parenchymal appearance suggestive for APN. Our findings suggest that the DMSA scan has to be considered at present as the most sensitive imaging technique for the detection of APN.Vesicoureteral reflux increases the risk of renal scars: a study of unilateral reflux.The aim of this study was to assess the impact of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on renal scar following acute pyelonephritis by comparing the refluxing renal units with nonrefluxing renal units in children with unilateral primary VUR. Forty-eight children with unilateral primary VUR diagnosed after the first pyelonephritis were enrolled. Mean age of patients was 1.0+/-1.6 years (29 boys and 19 girls). All patients underwent renal ultrasonography and renal 99 m-technetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan within three days following the diagnosis of pyelonephritis, and voiding cystourethrography (VCU) was performed soon after fever subsided and the infection was controlled. The DMSA scan was rechecked six months after the initial study when the first scan showed a renal defect. The first DMSA showed renal defects in 34 (70.8%) out of 48 of the refluxing renal units and in 13 (27.1%) out of 48 of the nonrefluxing renal units (P<0.01, OR: 6.54). At six months after the infection, 23 (47.9%) out of 48 refluxing renal units and seven (14.6%) out of 48 nonrefluxing renal units had renal scars on DMSA scan (P<0.01, OR: 5.39). The prevalence of renal scars did not vary significantly according to the grade of VUR. The CRP level on admission was significantly higher in patients with acute renal defect and scar. In conclusion, VUR increases the risk of post-pyelonephritic renal scars in children.Early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children fails to reduce renal scarring: data from the Italian Renal Infection Study Trials.The American Academy of Pediatrics recommendation for febrile infants and young children suspected of having a urinary tract infection is early antibiotic treatment, given parenterally if necessary. In support of this recommendation, data suggesting that delay in treatment of acute pyelonephritis increases the risk of kidney damage are cited. Because the risk was not well defined, we investigated renal scarring associated with delayed versus early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in children.The research findings are derived from 2 multicenter, prospective, randomized, controlled studies, Italian Renal Infection Study 1 and 2, whose primary outcomes dealt with initial antibiotic treatment and subsequent prophylaxis, respectively. From the 2 studies, we selected the 287 children with confirmed pyelonephritis on acute technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans who underwent repeat scanning to detect scarring 12 months later. The children were 1 month to <7 years of age when they presented with their first recognized episode of acute pyelonephritis in northeast Italy.Progressive delay in antibiotic treatment of acute pyelonephritis from <1 to >/=5 days after the onset of fever was not associated with any significant increase in the risk of scarring on technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid scans obtained 1 year later. The risk of scarring remained relatively constant at 30.7 +/- 7%. Clinical and laboratory indices of inflammation were comparable in all groups, as was the incidence of vesicoureteric reflux.Early treatment of acute pyelonephritis in infants and young children had no significant effect on the incidence of subsequent renal scarring. Furthermore, there was no significant difference in the rate of scarring after acute pyelonephritis when infants and young children were compared with older children.Role of Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy in the diagnosis of culture negative pyelonephritis.The aim of this work was to evaluate prospectively the proportion of children with a clinical and biological presentation of acute pyelonephritis, abnormal Tc-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy and negative or equivocal urine cultures. All patients aged 6 weeks to 15 years suspected of acute pyelonephritis (APN) were admitted to the Paediatric Department and underwent Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy within 3 days after admission and at 6 months. Of 166 patients enrolled in the study, 15 (9%) had negative or equivocal urine culture despite clinical and scintigraphic evidence of APN. Of these 15 children, renal ultrasound was normal in 7 patients and vesicoureteric reflux was found in 9 patients. Control DMSA 6 months after acute episode showed the disappearance of cortical lesions in eight and partial improvement in four patients. In this prospective series, as many as 9% of patients with APN would have been missed on the basis of equivocal or negative urine cultures. It is suggested that Tc-99m DMSA scintigraphy should be performed in children with severe infection without clear aetiology, especially in those with abnormal urinalysis.Lack of association between hemolysin production and acute inflammation in human urinary tract infection.Hemolysins are cytolytic proteins which have been extensively characterized at the molecular level, however, their in vivo functions remain unclear. This study analyzed the association of hemolysin production with the inflammatory response in patients with urinary tract infection (UTI). Infants and children with their first episode of UTI (n = 644) were followed prospectively. The body temperature, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), urinary leucocyte count and renal concentrating capacity were used as measures of the inflammatory response. The hemolytic genotype (hly) of the Escherichia coli strain from each UTI episode was defined by DNA-DNA hybridization, and the phenotype by hemolysis in blood agar. There was no significant increase in the level of fever, CRP, ESR, or decrease in renal concentrating capacity during UTI episodes caused by hly positive compared to hly negative E. coli. Multiple regression analysis did not demonstrate significant associations of hly with elevated fever, CRP, ESR or reduced renal concentrating capacity. In contrast, patients infected with P fimbriated E. coli strains had higher fever, CRP, ESR and lower renal concentrating capacity than those infected with other strains. This association was not influenced by the hly genotype of the P fimbriated strains. The frequency of hly+ strains was not significantly higher in the subset of patients assigned a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis compared to asymptomatic bacteriuria. This was in contrast to P fimbriae, which were accumulated in acute pyelonephritis. The results suggested that the acute inflammatory response to E. coli UTI is independent of hemolysin production. The inflammatogenic potential of uropathogenic E. coli clones was better described by the presence or absence of P-fimbriae than by hemolysin.[Technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in the first febrile urinary tract infection in children].The objective of this study was to evaluate the findings of 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection in relation with several clinical-biological parameters and other imaging studies and a long-term follow up.103 children between 1 month and 10 years old with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection were studied by means of clinical and laboratory assessment, renal ultrasonography and 99mTc DMSA renal scintigraphy in the acute illness period. Patients were divided into two groups, those under 2 years old (n = 63) and those over 2 years old (n = 40).Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 56 patients (54,5%). Children over 2 years of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than younger children (39,7% vs. 77,5%). Ultrasonography measuring renal volume showed a simple concordance with scintigraphy in 64% of the patients. Reflux was demonstrated in 23 patients (22,3%) without differences between patients with normal or abnormal cortical scintigraphy. After having studied the factors that were associated independently to the pathological results in the scintigraphy through a logistical multivariant regression, it was observed that the child's age, the elevation of the PCR and the alterations of the renal volume were significant according to statistics and also associated to a larger amount of pathological DMSA scintigraphy.DMSA scintigraphy associated with other diagnostic methods can improve the sensitivity and specificity to establish renal damage stage. During the follow-up the acute lesions disappeared or improved in all cases and the chronic lesions have not been modificated.Urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase and beta-2-microglobulin in the diagnosis of urinary tract infection in febrile infants.Urinary N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase (NAG) and beta-2-microglobulin (B2M) concentrations were measured in 24 pediatric patients with febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) and compared with the technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan results, in order to evaluate a noninvasive means to localize the site of UTI. Increased urinary B2M and NAG were not associated with renal inflammation (pyelonephritis), as defined by positive dimercaptosuccinic acid scan. Median NAG concentrations were 114.2 mumol/hour/mg creatinine (CR) (range, 5.7 to 305.4) in 17 febrile UTI patients vs. 13.8 (range, 3.4 to 104.3) in 17 age and sex-matched febrile controls with negative urine cultures, P = 0.0001. The sensitivity and specificity of NAG > or = 40 mumol/hour/mg of CR in predicting UTI in febrile patients, regardless of the site of infection, were 88 and 88%, respectively. Increased urinary NAG is associated with UTI in febrile patients regardless of the level of infection (scan status), and may be an informative indicator of UTI.Early 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.During a 2 year period, 175 children below 6 years of age (median 0.4 year) with non-obstructive symptomatic urinary tract infection were studied by 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. DMSA scintigraphy was performed at a median of 10 days after the start of treatment and was abnormal in 73 children (42%), equivocal in 29 (16%) and normal in 73 (42%). Reflux was seen in 27% of all children and in 38% of the renal units that were abnormal at DMSA scintigraphy. A decreasing frequency of abnormalities at DMSA scintigraphy was seen within the first 14 days after the start of treatment. C-reactive protein and grade of reflux correlated significantly with abnormal DMSA studies. To demonstrate renal involvement in acute urinary tract infection, DMSA scintigraphy should be performed within days after the start of treatment. It is noteworthy that reflux was seen in less than half of renal units with abnormal DMSA scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein and the site of urinary tract infections.Elevated surum levels of C-reactive protein have been found regularly in girls with acute clinical pyelonephritis but only infrequently in those with clinical cystitis. Based on these data, the suggestion has been made that elevated serum CRP concentrations may be useful in identifying patients with upper urinary tract infections. In a study in which the bladder washout test was used to localize the site of urinary tract infections, we identified nine girls with renal bacteriuria who did not have clinical findings suggesting acute pyelonephritis; four of these girls had serum CRP concentrations less than 10 micrograms/ml. Twenty-eight girls had bladder washout-proven lower urinary tract infections; three of these had serum CRP values greater than 30 micrograms/ml. These studies show that an elevated serum CRP concentration is not accurate in localizing the site of a urinary tract infection in girls who do not have clinical signs of acute pyelonephritis.Age-related radiological imaging in children with acute pyelonephritis.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) using clinical and laboratory parameters is often difficult in children. The aims of this retrospective study were twofold. Firstly, to correlate the clinical and laboratory manifestations of APN with the results of the dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan in different age groups. Secondly, to compare the DMSA renal scan, renal ultrasonography (RUS), and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in patients with clinical APN. The DMSA renal scan was utilized as the gold standard for renal involvement. We determined the sensitivity of these tests in febrile urinary tract infections (UTI) in three age groups: group I less than 2 years; group II 2-8 years; group III older than 8 years. During the period January 1992 through December 1998, 222 children presented with a febrile UTI. All patients had a DMSA renal scan, 208 had contrast VCUG, and 163 had RUS. The clinical and laboratory manifestation of pyelonephritis correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan in the older children than in the younger children; 85% of the DMSA renal scans were positive in group III; 69% in group II; 48% in group I (P<0.001). Vesicoureteral reflux detected by contrast VCUG was more prevalent in the younger age groups. Although high grades of reflux (grade IV-V) correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan, it did not reach a level of statistical significance (P>0.05). RUS did not correlate with a positive DMSA renal scan in any age group.Technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy in children with acute pyelonephritis: correlation with other imaging tests.INTRODUCTION. Urinary tract infection is the most common serious bacterial infection in children. The aim of this study was to compare the value of different laboratory and imaging techniques in detecting renal involvement in acute pyelonephritis. MATERIALS AND METHODS. In a cross-sectional study of patients 1 month to 14 years of age diagnosed with urinary tract infection were examined with systemic inflammatory markers, renal ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), and technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid ((99m)Tc-DMSA) renal scintigraphy. A total of 1467 pediatric patients were eligible for treatment of pyelonephritis. Evaluations included a complete blood count, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), urinalysis, urine culture, and measurement of serum blood urea nitrogen and creatinine levels. RESULTS. The results of (99m)Tc-DMSA scans were normal in 20.2%, mild decreased cortical uptake in 45.0%, moderate decreased cortical uptake in 12.3%, severe decreased cortical uptake in 12.0%, and decreased cortical function plus irregularity or scar formation in 10.5%. Voiding cystourethrography showed vesicoureteral reflux in 25.9%. The sensitivity of (99m)Tc-DMSA for prediction of vesicoureteral reflux was 84.1% with a negative predictive value of 80.6%. Significant differences were found in the level of blood leukocyte count (P = .03), urine leukocyte count (P = .003), ESR (P = .008), and age (P = .04) between patients with normal and abnormal (99m)Tc-DMSA scan results. CONCLUSIONS. We found that in patient with clinical signs of pyelonephritis, (99m)Tc-DMSA renal scintigraphy can detect pyelonephritis more accurately than the other inflammatory and imaging tests.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis: How helpful is procalcitonin?This prospective study aimed to investigate the diagnostic value of serum procalcitonin levels in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.We compared the symptoms and laboratory findings of fever, vomiting, abdominal/flank pain, leukocyte count, serum C-reactive protein and procalcitonin levels with the results of the DMSA scan obtained within the first 72 h after referral in children who were diagnosed as having acute pyelonephritis. Thirty-three children (31 female and two male) aged 1-11 years (mean 4.42 years) were enrolled in this prospective study.Twenty-one of 33 patients (64%) had positive DMSA scans. On the scans obtained after 6 months, five of 21 patients (23.8%) had renal scars. No correlation was found between clinical and laboratory parameters, alone or combined with each other, and positive DMSA scans. Serum procalcitonin levels were 0.767+/-0.64 and 1.23+/-1.17 ng . ml in children with normal and positive DMSA scans, respectively. The cut-off value for procalcitonin using receiver operating characteristic analysis was 0.9605 ng . ml, while sensitivity and specificity were 86.4% and 36.4%, respectively. However, if the cut-off value was chosen as 2 ng . ml, the sensitivity increased to 100% while specificity did not change markedly.The serum procalcitonin test, like other commonly used laboratory parameters, e.g. serum C-reactive protein and white blood cell count, was inadequate in distinguishing renal parenchymal involvement in acute febrile urinary tract infections.Chemokine response to febrile urinary tract infection.Mucosal CXC chemokines recruit inflammatory cells to the infected urinary tract. The chemokine response repertoire of the urinary tract and the relationship to disease severity have not been examined, however.This study quantified CXC (CXCL1, CXCL3, CXCL5, CXCL8, CXCL9, and CXCL10) and CC (CCL2, CCL4, and CCL5) chemokines in sequential urine samples obtained from 50 patients with febrile urinary tract infections during 24 hours after diagnosis.All patients had elevated chemokine levels, but bacteremic infections caused higher CXCL1, CXCL3, CXCL5, CXCL8, and CCL2 responses. CCL2 and CXCL8 levels were higher in patients with acute pyelonephritis symptoms and CCL2, CXCL3, CCL4, CXCL5, and CXCL10 were significantly correlated to C-reactive protein (CRP) and temperature. Women and men showed different chemokine responses.Febrile urinary tract infections are accompanied by a complex chemokine response. The response magnitude reflects disease severity, and the repertoire is influenced by gender and underlying disease.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections in infants and young children.The purpose of the study was to compare bacterial species, clinical, laboratory and imaging findings ((99m )Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan and voiding cystogram) in infants and children with high (>/=10(5) colony forming units (CFU)/ml, group A patients) and low (</=5 x 10(4) CFU/ml, group C patients) bacterial count in urine cultures during first episode of urinary tract infection. Group B included patients with intermediate CFU/ml. Included were 419 symptomatic patients with: (a) no previous antibiotic treatment, (b) urine samples for quantitative cultures taken by bladder catheterisation or suprapubic bladder aspiration, (c) growth of only one microorganism, and (d) age </=54 months (age of the oldest patient of group C). Out of 419 cultures, Escherichia coli grew in 315 (75.2%), gram-negative bacteria except E. coli in 91 (21.7%) and gram-positive in 13 (3.1%). Group C patients were significantly ( P <0.0001) more often affected with gram-negative pathogens except E. coli than group A patients (21/44 versus 67/360). Most of group C patients were younger than 24 months of age; none was older than 54 months. Comparison of the prevalence of clinical and laboratory (leucocyte count, CRP, ESR) findings between groups A and C showed no significant differences. There was no statistically significant difference in the prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations (except reflux) between groups A and C.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections mainly affect infants and young children and are often due to gram-negative bacteria other than E. coli. Clinical and laboratory findings, prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations are similar in high and low bacterial count urinary tract infections.Risk assessment of renal cortical scarring with urinary tract infection by clinical features and ultrasonography.To address some of the issues in the ongoing debate over the optimal diagnostic imaging following childhood urinary tract infection (UTI), by determining the risk of missing renal cortical scarring which would be detected on a technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) gold standard if ultrasound alone were used, factoring for clinical features (upper or lower tract), UTI recurrence, and age group (infants, preschool, or school age).Details of UTI clinical features and recurrence were recorded for 990 children with a proven UTI, and their DMSA and ultrasound results were compared for each kidney.The risks of missing DMSA scarring varied between 0.4% (school age children with solitary lower tract UTI) and 11.1% (infants with recurrent upper tract UTI).UTI clinical features are important in assessing the need for DMSA imaging. Current UK imaging guidelines are endorsed, although preschool children with solitary lower tract UTI remain a controversial group and more attention needs to focused on children with recurrent UTI.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, urinary tract infection and renal damage in children.We studied the relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, urinary tract infection and permanent renal damage in children.We retrospectively analyzed 303 children younger than 2 years with a first time, nonobstructive, culture verified urinary tract infection. The protocol included ultrasonography and voiding cystourethrography within 3 months after urinary tract infection, and (99m)technetium dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy after 1 to 2 years.Vesicoureteral reflux was found in 36 of 163 boys (22%) and in 44 of 140 girls (31%). Of the 303 patients 80 (26%) had permanent renal damage according to dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy. The rate of abnormality increased significantly with grade of vesicoureteral reflux in boys and girls. The relative risk of renal damage was significantly increased in patients with vesicoureteral reflux grade II and higher. Maximum C-reactive protein concentration, maximum temperature during urinary tract infection, presence of vesicoureteral reflux and febrile recurrences of urinary tract infection were significantly related to permanent renal damage. In stepwise logistic regression vesicoureteral reflux was the only independent variable for boys, while C-reactive protein and vesicoureteral reflux were independent factors for girls.There was a significant relationship between grade II vesicoureteral reflux and higher and permanent renal damage in boys and girls. However, while the association between renal damage and vesicoureteral reflux was evident in boys, the role of urinary tract infection and renal inflammation seemed to be equally or more important in girls. These findings support the concept that renal damage is associated with vesicoureteral reflux and is often congenital in boys, while in girls it is more related to urinary tract infection with vesicoureteral reflux as a reinforcing factor.Randomised trial of oral versus sequential intravenous/oral cephalosporins in children with pyelonephritis.The hypothesis was tested that oral antibiotic treatment in children with acute pyelonephritis and scintigraphy-documented lesions is equally as efficacious as sequential intravenous/oral therapy with respect to the incidence of renal scarring. A randomised multi-centre trial was conducted in 365 children aged 6 months to 16 years with bacterial growth in cultures from urine collected by catheter. The children were assigned to receive either oral ceftibuten (9 mg/kg once daily) for 14 days or intravenous ceftriaxone (50 mg/kg once daily) for 3 days followed by oral ceftibuten for 11 days. Only patients with lesions detected on acute-phase dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy underwent follow-up scintigraphy. Efficacy was evaluated by the rate of renal scarring after 6 months on follow-up scintigraphy. Of 219 children with lesions on acute-phase scintigraphy, 152 completed the study; 80 (72 females, median age 2.2 years) were given ceftibuten and 72 (62 females, median age 1.6 years) were given ceftriaxone/ceftibuten. Patients in the intravenous/oral group had significantly higher C-reactive protein (CRP) concentrations at baseline and larger lesion(s) on acute-phase scintigraphy. Follow-up scintigraphy showed renal scarring in 21/80 children treated with ceftibuten and 33/72 with ceftriaxone/ceftibuten (p = 0.01). However, after adjustment for the confounding variables (CRP and size of acute-phase lesion), no significant difference was observed for renal scarring between the two groups (p = 0.2). Renal scarring correlated with the extent of the acute-phase lesion (r = 0.60, p < 0.0001) and the grade of vesico-ureteric reflux (r = 0.31, p = 0.03), and was more frequent in refluxing renal units (p = 0.04). The majority of patients, i.e. 44 in the oral group and 47 in the intravenous/oral group, were managed as out-patients. Side effects were not observed. From this study, we can conclude that once-daily oral ceftibuten for 14 days yielded comparable results to sequential ceftriaxone/ceftibuten treatment in children aged 6 months to 16 years with DMSA-documented acute pyelonephritis and it allowed out-patient management in the majority of these children.Clinical differentiation of acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection in children.To evaluate clinical variables for diagnosing childhood acute pyelonephritis (APN) when technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy is not available.We retrospectively reviewed the records of 590 children with febrile UTI seen from January 1999 to February 2004. On the basis of DMSA scintigraphy performed within 7 days after admission, they were divided into APN (n = 237) or non-APN (n = 353) groups. Gender, age, clinical presentation, absolute neutrophil count, C-reactive protein (CRP), urinalysis, culture, and sonographic findings were recorded from charts.A CRP level of > or =66.4 mg/L, in patients with >2 days prior to admission had a sensitivity of 71.6% and a specificity of 72.5% for APN. Similarly, a CRP of >27.3 mg/L in patients with < or =2 days prior to admission and a white cell count of >14,990/mm3 had sensitivities of 68.6% and 62.0% and specificities of 66.1% and 63.0%, respectively. Combining two or more variables did not result in better discrimination.If a DMSA scan is not available, it is reasonable to treat a febrile UTI as APN if the CRP is >66.4 mg/L in a patient with >2 days of fever or if the CRP is >27.3 mg/L in a patient febrile for < or =2 days.Urine macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in children with urinary tract infection: a possible predictor of acute pyelonephritis.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) is an important pro-inflammatory cytokine expressed at sites of inflammation. We have assessed this factor (MIF) in urinary tract infections with the aim of determining a non-invasive and sensitive method to differentiate upper and lower renal involvement. Thirty-three pediatric patients with urinary track infection (25 with acute pyelonephritis, eight with acute cystitis) and 40 healthy subjects were recruited for this prospective case-control study. Pyelonephritis was differentiated from cystitis by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. Urinary MIF concentration was determined using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay method. The urine MIF/creatinine (Cr) ratio was significantly higher in pyelonephritis patients than in those with acute cystitis and the control group (P < 0.001). The optimal cut-point of 4.90 pg/micromol Cr for the urine MIF/Cr ratio has the potential to be a biomarker for distinguishing patients with acute pyelonephritis from those with acute cystitis. Determination of the urinary MIF was also useful in selecting the patients at risk of permanent renal damage. Of those patients with pyelonephritis, based on the DMSA scan at the time of infection, scarring on follow-up DMSA scan 9-12 months later occurred in patients with the highest urinary MIF/Cr ratios. We conclude that the urine MIF/Cr ratio is a sensitive test for differentiating acute pyelonephritis from acute cystitis and also for detecting children with acute pyelonephritis who are at a higher risk for permanent renal scars in the future.[Usefulness of procalcitonin for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children].Acute pyelonephritis can induce parenchymal scarring. The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of procalcitonin (PCT) to predict renal involvement in febrile children with urinary tract infection (UTI).In a prospective study serum PCT was measured and compared with others commonly used inflammatory markers in children admitted to the emergency unit with acute pyelonephritis. Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by a (99 m)Tc-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scar performed in the first 3 days after the admission.Among 42 enrolled patients, 19 (45%) had acute renal involvement (Group A) ; 23 (55%) (Group B) had normal DMSA scan (n = 16), or old scarring (n = 4) or various anomalies related to uropathy (n = 3). In group A, the mean PCT level was significantly higher than in the group B (5.4 ng/ml, vs 0.4 ng /ml, p < 10(-5)). In these 2 groups, mean C reactive protein (CRP) levels were 99.1 mg/l and 44.6 mg/l respectively (p < 0.001). For a level of serum PCT > or = 0.5 ng/ml, the sensitivity and specificity to predict the renal involvement were 100% and 87% respectively; for a level> or= 20 mg/l CRP had a sensitivity of 94% but a specificity of 30%.Serum PCT levels were significantly increased in febrile children with UTI when acute renal parenchymal involvement was present. PCT seems a better marker than CRP for the prediction of patients at risk of renal lesions.Procalcitonin for the early prediction of renal parenchymal involvement in children with UTI: preliminary results.In order to establish the most reliable marker for distinguishing urinary tract infections (UTI) with and without renal parenchymal involvement (RPI), we recorded the clinical features and admission leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), and serum procalcitonin (PCT) in 57 children (including 43 girls) aged 2-108 months admitted with a first episode of UTI. RPI was evaluated by Tc-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy within 7 days of admission. To establish cut-off points for ESR, CRP, and PCT, we used receiver operating characteristics curves and compared the area under the curve for ESR, CRP, and PCT. Twenty-seven children were diagnosed as having RPI based on positive renal scintigraphy. A body temperature of >38 degrees C, a history of diarrhea, and poor oral intake were more common in patients with RPI. ESR, CRP, and PCT, but not leukocyte count, were significantly higher in patients with RPI (P < 0.001). PCT was more sensitive and specific for the diagnosis of upper versus lower UTI than ESR and CRP. Using a cut-off value of 0.85 ng/ml, PCT had the best performance, with sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 89%, 97%, 96%, and 91% respectively. Serum PCT is a better marker than ESR, CRP, and leukocyte count for the early prediction of RPI in children with a first episode of UTI.Predictive value of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux in children.We aimed to determine the predictability of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children with urinary tract infection (UTI). Data of children with febrile UTI who underwent voiding cystoureterography between 2002 and 2005 were evaluated retrospectively for clinical (age, gender, fever > or = 38.5 degrees C, recurrent UTI), laboratory [leukocytosis, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), pyuria, serum creatinine (S(Cr))] and imaging (renal ultrasonography) variables. Children with VUR (group 1) vs. no VUR (group 2) and children with high-grade (III-V) VUR (group 3) vs. no or low-grade (I-II) VUR (group 4) were compared. Among 88 patients (24 male), 38 had VUR and 21 high-grade VUR. Fever > or = 38.5 degrees C was associated with VUR [odds ratio (OR): 7.5]. CRP level of 50 mg/l was the best cut-off level for predicting high-grade VUR (OR 15.5; discriminative ability 0.89 +/- 0.05). Performing voiding cystourethrography based on this CRP level would result in failure to notice 9% of patients with high-grade VUR, whereas 69% of children with no/low-grade VUR would be spared from this invasive test. In conclusion, fever > or = 38 degrees C and CRP > 50 mg/l seem to be potentially useful clinical predictors of VUR and high-grade VUR, respectively, in pediatric patients with UTI. Further validation of these findings could limit unnecessary voiding cystourethrography.Are younger children at highest risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis?The general belief about the relation between risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis and age is that infants are at highest risk and children older than 5 years at lower risk. This assumption has led to differences in treatment based on age. The aim of this prospective study was to investigate the occurrence of renal lesions in children aged 0-16 years.Between May, 1994, and January, 1996, all children aged 0-16 years who were admitted to our department with a diagnosis of probable pyelonephritis and a positive urine culture were included in this prospective study. All patients received antibiotics for 7-21 days. During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, scintigraphy with technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) and ultrasonography were done. Voiding cystourethrography was undertaken at least 6 weeks after the end of antibiotic treatment. When scintigraphy showed renal parenchymal lesions, repeat scintigraphy was done after at least 2 months to assess the progression of renal lesions. For the analysis, children were grouped by age according to presumed risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis: high risk (< 1 year), moderate risk (1-5 years), low risk (> 5 years).201 patients were enrolled in the study (119 < 1 year, 47 aged 1-5 years, 35 > 5 years). During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, renal lesions were found in 66 (55%) infants under 1 year, in 37 (79%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 24 (69%) children older than 5 years. Of these 127 children, 108 underwent repeat scintigraphy after an average of 3 months (50 < 1 year, 36 aged 1-5 years, 22 > 5 years). Overall, renal scars were found on repeat scintigraphy in 20 (40%) infants under 1 year, in 31 (86%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 14 (64%) children older than 5 years. 38 (36%) of these 65 patients had vesicoureteric reflux. Among 88 children who had a first documented urinary-tract infection and underwent repeat scintigraphy, renal scars were found in 20 (43%) under 1 year, in 26 (84%) aged 1-5 years, and in eight (80%) older than 5 years.This study did not confirm the conventional view that the risk of renal scars after pyelonephritis diminishes with age. We believe that all children, irrespective of age, will benefit from any measure that prevents the development of renal sequelae.Blood group non-secretors have an increased inflammatory response to urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to assess the possible relationship between secretor state and the inflammatory response to urinary tract infection (UTI). Girls with recurrent UTI were prospectively studied. They included 61 secretor and 23 non-secretor individuals with 604 episodes of recurrent UTI. The response to each UTI episode was measured as the levels of C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and the body temperature as well as renal concentrating capacity and pyuria. The levels of C-reactive protein, erythrocyte sedimentation rate and the body temperature were significantly higher in non-secretors than in secretors (p less than 0.04). As a consequence, non-secretors had an increased probability of being assigned a diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis rather than asymptomatic bacteriuria (p less than 0.05). The higher inflammatory response in non-secretors was independent of the Gal alpha 1-4Gal beta adhesin expression of the infecting Escherichia coli strains. The increased inflammatory response to UTI in non-secretors might explain the accumulation of these individuals among patients with renal scarring.Urinary interleukin-8 in acute pyelonephritis of children: a before-after study.The aim of this study was to assess urinary interleukin-8 (IL-8) levels in pyelonephritis and its relation with the clinical course of the infection and of inflammatory changes detected by renal scintigraphy.In this quasi-experimental before-after study, we evaluated 91 children aged 1 to 144 months (mean 34.4 +/- 35.2 months) with pyelonephritis. Inflammatory markers including erythrocyte sedimentation rate, C-reactive protein, leukocyte count, and urinary IL-8, together with the results of ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrography, and dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy were evaluated in these children. The ratios of urinary IL-8 to creatinine (IL-8/C) before and after the treatment were compared with each other.Urinary IL-8/C levels were significantly higher after the empirical treatment in comparison with those before the treatment (0.19 +/- 0.21 versus 0.51 +/- 0.53, P < .001). No correlation was found between the urinary IL-8 levels and leukocyturia, urine culture results, other inflammatory markers, or findings of imaging examinations.We found high urinary IL-8 levels in children with pyelonephritis. We also documented its increasing after the treatment. We conclude that evaluation of urinary IL-8 can be a noninvasive test for diagnosis of upper urinary tract infection and its response to treatment.Acute renal cortical scintigraphy in children with a first urinary tract infection.This prospective study, performed in 101 children with a first symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI), evaluates the diagnostic value of clinical, biological, and ultrasound parameters in detecting children with acute renal infection documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. In children with a positive DMSA scan, mean C-reactive protein (CRP) was higher than in children with a normal DMSA scan (114+/-64 vs. 67+/-38 mg/dl, mean+/-SD, P=0.0002). The sensitivity and specificity of CRP was 64% and 68%, respectively. In children with severe kidney involvement, mean CRP and white blood count (WBC) were higher than in children with mild/moderate disease (151+/-83 vs. 92+/-55 mg/dl for CRP, P=0.0149; 20,100+/-6,854 vs. 15,023+/-6,145 WBC/ mm3 for WBC, P=0.0131). The sensitivity and specificity was 85% and 20% for CRP, and 77% and 18% for WBC, respectively. One or more areas of abnormal cortical echogenicity were documented in 3% of kidneys with positive DMSA scans. Dilatation of the collecting system was observed in 24% of kidneys. The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography was 27% and 89%, respectively. In conclusion, clinical, biological, and ultrasound parameters do not accurately distinguish cystitis from pyelonephritis in children with UTI and do not identify children with severe renal damage. Accordingly, we recommend that DMSA scan should be added to the initial work-up of children with UTI.Bacterial attachment and inflammation in the urinary tract.The mechanism whereby attachment enhances Escherichia coli virulence in the urinary tract was studied by a detailed analysis of the host response to bacteriuria. Episodes of bacteriuria in 1473 children were followed prospectively from 1970 to 1984. To study the inflammatory response to the bacteriuric epidoses, we recorded body temperature, C-reactive protein, microsedimentation rate, urinary leukocyte count, and renal concentrating capacity. Bacterial isolates from each episode were identified and saved, and the adhesive capacity of 2669 E. coli strains was defined by their binding to galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-containing receptors. Inflammatory response was significantly higher and renal concentrating capacity significantly lower during episodes caused by attaching strains. There was a linear relation between the number of indicators of inflammation and the proportion of galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-binding strains present. Vesicoureteric reflux potentiated the inflammatory response. Attaching strains of E. coli thus appeared to be more capable of causing inflammation than were other bacteria. The potentiating effect of attachment on inflammation explains the over-representation of galactose alpha 1----4galactose beta-recognizing bacteria in patients with acute pyelonephritis.Is procalcitonin useful in early diagnosis of serious bacterial infections in children?To compare diagnostic accuracy of procalcitonin for early diagnosis of serious bacterial infection (SBI) in children presenting with fever and no focus of infection.Prospective, observational study involving 72 children (1-36 mo) presenting to the paediatric units of two university hospitals. All children had blood cultures, urine cultures, white blood cell counts (WBC), chest X-ray, C-reactive protein (CRP) and procalcitonin (PCT) done at presentation.Eight (11.1%) children had SBI (1 pneumonia, 2 meningitis, 4 septicaemia/occult bacteraemia, 2 pyelonephritis), 19 (26.4%) had possible bacterial infection (received antibiotic treatment, but no organism grown) and 45 (62.5%) had viral or possible viral infection (virus isolated and/or uneventful recovery without antibiotics). PCT (>2 ng/l), CRP (>50 mg/l) and McCarthy's score (<9) had sensitivities and specificities of 50%/85.9%, 75%/68.7% and 87.5%/67.2%, respectively. Negative and positive likelihood ratios for CRP (>50 mg/l), PCT (>2 ng/l), white blood cells (>15 x 10(5)/l) and McCarthy's score (<9) were 0.36/2.4, 0.58/3.5, 0.94/1.1 and 0.19/2.7, respectively. A combination of PCT, CRP and WBC generated a positive likelihood ratio of 10.6, changing the post-test probability to 54%.For early diagnosis of SBI in children presenting with fever and no focus of infection, the diagnostic utility of procalcitonin is similar to the traditional markers infection and clinical scoring. While a low procalcitonin level cannot be used to exclude SBI in this population, a combination of PCT, CRP and WBC may be more useful in predicting SBI.The role of serum and urine interleukin-8 on acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring in children.Interleukin (IL)-8 acts as a potent neutrophils chemoattractant responsible for the migration of neutrophils into the infected renal tissue to protect against invading pathogens. The aim of this study was to assess the role of IL-8 on acute-phase pyelonephritis and later renal scarring in children.A total of 124 children with a first-time febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) were studied. The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis was confirmed by Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan. Serum and urine samples were obtained from 124 children with UTI and 20 healthy children for IL-8 measurement.The 124 children were divided into acute pyelonephritis (n = 70) and lower UTI (n = 54) groups according to the results of DMSA scans. The initial serum and urine IL-8 values of children with acute pyelonephritis were significantly higher when compared with lower UTI and healthy controls (all P < 0.001). Renal scarring was seen in 26 (38.8%) of these 67 children with acute pyelonephritis at follow-up DMSA scans. Both the initial serum and urine IL-8 concentrations were significantly higher in children with renal scarring than in those without (both P < 0.001). The mean age of children with renal scarring was also significantly lower than those without scarring (P = 0.004). Multivariate analysis showed that the highest initial IL-8 values, age <20 months and reflux grades > or =III all were independent predictors of renal scarring.Those children younger than 2 years of age with the highest IL-8 concentrations during the acute phase of pyelonephritis as well as children with reflux grades of III or greater are at a high-risk for developing renal scarring in the future.Does early treatment of urinary tract infection prevent renal damage?Therapeutic delay has been suggested as the most important factor that is likely to have an effect on the development of scarring after acute pyelonephritis. However, this opinion has not been supported by prospective studies, so we tested it.In a prospective clinical study, we evaluated whether the time interval between the onset of the renal infection and the start of therapy correlates with the development of acute inflammatory changes and the subsequent development of renal scars, documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy. A total of 278 infants (153 male and 125 female) aged 0.5 to 12.0 months with their first urinary tract infection were enrolled in the study.The median time between the onset of infection and the institution of therapy was 2 days (range: 1-8 days). Renal inflammatory changes were documented in 57% of the infants. Renal defects were recorded in 41% of the patients treated within the first 24 hours since the onset of fever versus 75% of those treated on day 4 and onward. Renal scarring was developed in 51% of the infants with an abnormal scan in the acute phase of infection. The frequency of scarring in infants treated early and in those whose treatment was delayed did not differ, suggesting that once acute pyelonephritis has occurred, ultimate renal scarring is independent of the timing of therapy. Acute inflammatory changes and subsequent scarring were more frequent in the presence of vesicoureteral reflux, especially that which is high grade. However, the difference was not significant, which suggests that renal damage may be independent of the presence of reflux.Early and appropriate treatment of urinary tract infection, especially during the first 24 hours after the onset of symptoms, diminishes the likelihood of renal involvement during the acute phase of the infection but does not prevent scar formation.Alterations of peripheral leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, and C-reactive protein in febrile urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to assess the usefulness of peripheral leukocyte count, differential leukocyte count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and C-reactive protein (CRP) level in febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) for defining the UTI level.A total of 61 children aged between 1 and 10 years with documented febrile UTI (axillary temperature > or = 38 degrees C) were studied. They had a urine culture positive for infection. Laboratory investigations including peripheral total and differential leukocyte counts, ESR, and CRP were assessed in relation to the inflammatory responses. Leukocyte count results were available in all of the patients, ESR in 41, and CRP in 36.Leukocyte count was normal in 6 patients (9.8%). Lymphocytic leukocytosis was seen in 1 patients (1.6%), neutrophilic leukocytosis in 25 (41.0%), and relative neutrophilia in 29 (47.5%). Thirty patients (73.2%) had a high ESR and 23 (63.9%) had a positive CRP. In children with a high ESR, 12 (29.3%) had neutrophilic leukocytosis and 14 (34.1%) had relative neutrophilia. Relative neutrophilia and neutrophilic leukocytosis with positive CRP both were found in 11 patients (30.6%). Negative CRP with absence of neutrophilic leukocytosis was found in a significantly higher proportion of patients. There were no direct correlations between the severity of systemic inflammatory responses and urinary tract inflammatory response.Findings of this study showed that ESR and differential leukocyte count are two valuable tests in febrile UTI and may be useful for localization of UTI level, but the total leukocyte count and CRP level as in qualitative methods are not useful, and many patients with febrile UTI do not have leukocytosis.Risk factors in the development of early technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy lesions during first urinary tract infection in children.To establish the variables that correlate with uptake defects in dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI).A prospective observational study was conducted in a cohort of 158 consecutive children with a first episode of symptomatic UTI. The therapeutic delay time (TDT) was recorded. DMSA scintigraphy was performed in all children and voiding cystourethrography in 150 of them.85% of the patients were younger than 2 y. Mean TDT was 33.5 h. The aetiological agent was Escherichia coli in 140 children. DMSA scintigraphy was normal in 81. Vesicoureteric reflux was detected in 33. After a multivariate logistic regression analysis the following variables were retained in the final model: TDT > or = 48 h, growth of bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and C-reactive protein > or = 30 mg l(-1).TDT > or = 48 h, bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and CRP > or = 30 mg l(-1) influence the findings detected in the DMSA scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of UTI.Urinary macrophage migration inhibitory factor in children with urinary tract infection.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) plays an essential pathophysiological role in inflammatory reactions. The aim of this study was to investigate the clinical utility of urine MIF (uMIF) level in predicting urinary tract infections (UTI). This multicenter, prospective study was conducted over a 1-year period between March 2008 and March 2009. Sixty patients with symptomatic culture-proven UTI and 29 healthy children were recruited. Urine MIF was measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The mean MIF level was found to be significantly higher in the UTI group than in the control group (1082.82 vs. 211.45 pg/ml, p = 0.0001). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis revealed that the optimal cut-off uMIF level was 295 pg/ml for uMIF to predict UTI. The sensitivity and specificity of this cut-off level were 91.7% and 69%, respectively. Mean uMIF/creatinine (Cr) was also significantly higher in the UTI group than in the control group (2400.69 vs. 267.56 pg/mgCr, p = 0.0001). At a cut-off of 815 pg/mgCr for uMIF/Cr, the sensitivity and specificity were 95 and 79%, respectively. The area under curve (AUC) was 0.848 (standard error 0.040, 95% confidence interval 0.756-0.915) for uMIF and 0.889 (0.034, 0.805-0.946) for uMIF/Cr. Urine MIF/Cr was significantly higher in the patients with a positive leukocyte esterase reaction in the urine (p = 0.047), leukocytosis (p = 0.0001) and positive C-reactive protein level in serum (p = 0.003). The uMIF level was not related to leukocytosis, positive CRP level in serum and leukocyte esterase reaction in the urine. Neither uMIF nor uMIF/Cr were correlated to the positive urine nitrite test, pyuria, urine pH and specific gravity (p > 0.05). These results suggest that urine MIF and uMIF/Cr can be used for the early prediction of UTI in children.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infection.Ninety-four children with febrile urinary tract infection were studied prospectively to determine the relationship between vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis, and to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of commonly used clinical and laboratory observations. By using renal scan with dimercaptosuccinic acid labeled with technetium 99m as the standard of reference, we documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with pyelonephritis. Of the 70 E. coli urinary isolates, 48 (69%) were P-fimbriated, including 30 (64%) of 47 isolates from patients with pyelonephritis and 18 (78%) of 23 isolates from patients with normal renal scans. The prevalence of P-fimbriated E. coli in patients with pyelonephritis and vesicoureteral reflux was 46%, compared with 71% in those with pyelonephritis who had no concurrent vesicoureteral reflux (p = 0.222). Multiple clinical and laboratory variables commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis did not adequately predict the presence or absence of parenchymal involvement. These data show the following: (1) Acute pyelonephritis in the absence of demonstrable vesicoureteral reflux is common. (2) Febrile urinary tract infections in children are commonly associated with P-fimbriated E. coli, both in the presence and absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (3) The presence of P fimbriae alone does not fully explain the pathophysiology of renal parenchymal invasion by bacteria in the absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (4) The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infections on the basis of clinical and laboratory observations is unreliable.Renal scarring after acute pyelonephritis.Seventy six children, 18 boys and 58 girls, aged 0-15.9 (median 1.0) years, with acute pyelonephritis were prospectively studied with a technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan during infection and two months later. Fifty nine of these children were also studied two years after the infection. Seventeen children with a normal DMSA scan during infection or at two months after infection, or both, were not investigated by a DMSA scan at two years after acute pyelonephritis. A micturition cystourethrogram was performed in all the children after two months. Changes on the DMSA scan were found in 65 (86%) children during acute pyelonephritis, in 45 (59%) children at two months, and in 28 (37%) children at two years after infection. Vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) was found in 19 (25%) children at two months. Renal scarring was significantly correlated with the presence of gross VUR and recurrent pyelonephritis, but 62% of the scarred kidneys were drained by non-refluxing ureters. Children with scars were older at the time of acute pyelonephritis than those without scars but no difference was found between the groups with regard to duration of illness, levels of C reactive protein and maximum white cell count, glomerular filtration rate, nor renal concentration capacity at the time of infection. It is concluded that renal scarring after acute pyelonephritis in children is more common than has been previously thought. Although children with gross VUR and recurrent pyelonephritis are at the greatest risk, renal scarring is more often seen without these risk factors.[Value of the C reactive protein, urinary lactic dehydrogenase and renal capacity of concentration in the topographic diagnosis of the urinary infection in infancy (author's transl)].In 39 children with urinary infection renal capacity of concentration, serum C-reactive protein and presence of urinary lactic dehydrogenase are studied pointing to the establishment of the topography of the damage. C-reactive protein levels higher than 20 micrograms/ml are 100 per 100 reliable in the diagnosis of pyelonephritis. Moreover, value of this test is confirmed as a guide of therapeutic efficacity. Difficulty of concentrating urine above 800 mOsm/l is 70 per 100 reliable and is a useful method for demonstrating parenchymal damage. The urinary lactic dehydrogenase was superior to 20 units/l in 64 per 100 of the cases, but other studies are necessary for interpretation of these data. These findings are similar to those obtained in the study of the isoenzymes.Correlation of renal ultrasonographic findings with inflammatory volume from dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans in children with acute pyelonephritis.We correlated abnormal findings on renal ultrasonography (US) and inflammatory volume (Volume) on technetium dimercaptosuccinic acid renal single photon emission computerized tomography (DMSA) in children with acute pyelonephritis (APN) with renal scars.A total of 31 males and 14 females (9 days to 9.8 years old) who fulfilled diagnostic criteria for APN and who underwent initial DMSA between January 1995 and July 2002 and followup DMSA at least 6 months later were enrolled in the study. APN was diagnosed by initial DMSA, and placement in the scar or scar-free group was determined by followup DMSA. Photopenic areas on initial DMSA were calculated as Volume, and were compared to US findings.Ultrasound demonstrated 35 abnormal kidneys (38.9%) among these children with APN. Significant differences in age, Volume (11.19 +/- 2.52 ml vs 3.02 +/- 0.75 ml, p <0.005), C-reactive protein (CRP) and photopenic lesion on initial DMSA were found between children with abnormal and normal US. Of 65 children with initial APN foci 33 (50.8%) recovered, and the others had development of scars. The sensitivity of US for detecting APN (identified by DMSA scan) was 49.2%, and the specificity was 88% (OR 7.1, 95% CI 2.18 to 24.41). The sensitivity of US for predicting renal scarring was 59.4%, and the specificity was 60.6% (OR 2.3, 95% CI 0.82 to 7.65). Patients with abnormal US findings and high serum CRP (greater than 70 mg/l) had a large Volume (10.96 +/- 3.05 ml) and a 76.2% chance of being in the scar group.US findings are significantly correlated to Volume in APN. Along with a high level of CRP, US is helpful in predicting development of renal scarring.Renal cortical scintigraphy in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.Comparative clinical studies have shown renal cortical scintigraphy, using technetium-99m (99mTc)-labeled glucoheptonate or dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA), to be significantly more sensitive than either intravenous pyelography or renal sonography in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis. However, due to uncertainties about the diagnostic accuracy of the clinical and laboratory parameters used in these studies, true sensitivity of renal cortical scintigraphy was unknown. Therefore, we evaluated the accuracy of [99mTc]DMSA scintigraphy in the diagnosis of experimentally induced acute pyelonephritis in piglets using strict histopathologic criteria as the standard of reference. The sensitivity and specificity of the DMSA scan for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis were 91% and 99%, respectively, with an overall 97% agreement between the scintigraphic and histopathologic findings. Based on the results of this experimental study, we used the [99mTc]DMSA scan as the standard of reference for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis, and conducted a prospective clinical study of 94 children hospitalized with the diagnosis of acute febrile urinary tract infection (UTI). The aims of this study were (1) to determine the relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, acute pyelonephritis, and renal scarring, and (2) to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of the clinical and laboratory parameters commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis. We documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with acute pyelonephritis. The prevalence of P-fimbriae in the E coli isolates was 64% in the patients with acute pyelonephritis and 78% in those with a normal DMSA scan. Even in patients without reflux, P-fimbriae were found in 71% of isolates from the patients with acute pyelonephritis and in 75% of those with a normal renal scan. Follow-up DMSA scans were obtained in 33 patients with acute pyelonephritis in 38 kidneys. We found complete resolution of the acute inflammatory changes in 58% of the involved kidneys and renal scarring in the remaining 42%, including 40% of the kidneys associated with reflux and 43% of those without reflux.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)Oral versus initial intravenous therapy for urinary tract infections in young febrile children.The standard recommendation for treatment of young, febrile children with urinary tract infection has been hospitalization for intravenous antimicrobials. The availability of potent, oral, third-generation cephalosporins as well as interest in cost containment and avoidance of nosocomial risks prompted evaluation of the safety and efficacy of outpatient therapy.In a multicenter, randomized clinical trial, we evaluated the efficacy of oral versus initial intravenous therapy in 306 children 1 to 24 months old with fever and urinary tract infection, in terms of short-term clinical outcomes (sterilization of the urine and defervescence) and long-term morbidity (incidence of reinfection and incidence and extent of renal scarring documented at 6 months by 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scans). Children received either oral cefixime for 14 days (double dose on day 1) or initial intravenous cefotaxime for 3 days followed by oral cefixime for 11 days.Treatment groups were comparable regarding demographic, clinical, and laboratory characteristics. Bacteremia was present in 3.4% of children treated orally and 5.3% of children treated intravenously. Of the short-term outcomes, 1) repeat urine cultures were sterile within 24 hours in all children, and 2) mean time to defervescence was 25 and 24 hours for children treated orally and intravenously, respectively. Of the long-term outcomes, 1) symptomatic reinfections occurred in 4.6% of children treated orally and 7.2% of children treated intravenously, 2) renal scarring at 6 months was noted in 9.8% children treated orally versus 7.2% of children treated intravenously, and 3) mean extent of scarring was approximately 8% in both treatment groups. Mean costs were at least twofold higher for children treated intravenously ($3577 vs $1473) compared with those treated orally.Oral cefixime can be recommended as a safe and effective treatment for children with fever and urinary tract infection. Use of cefixime will result in substantial reductions of health care expenditures.Proinflammatory cytokines and procalcitonin in children with acute pyelonephritis.This prospective study, performed in 76 children with a urinary tract infection (UTI), evaluates the diagnostic value of procalcitonin (PCT) and proinflammatory cytokines (IL-1beta, IL-6 and TNF-alpha) in children with acute pyelonephritis documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy (DMSA). Renal parenchymal involvement was assessed by (99m )Tc-DMSA scintigraphy within 7 days of admission. The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis was confirmed only in patients with reversible lesions on scintigraphy. According to DMSA scan results, patients were divided into two groups, lower UTI or acute pyelonephritis. In acute pyelonephritis, serum PCT level was found to be significantly higher than it is in the lower UTI (p <0.001). Also, significantly higher serum proinflammatory cytokines (IL-1beta, IL-6 and TNF-alpha) levels were detected in those with acute pyelonephritis than those with lower UTI (p <0.001). We conclude that both serum PCT and proinflammatory cytokine levels may be used as accurate markers for diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis.